A
SKETCH
OF
OLD ENGLAND,
BY A NEW ENGLAND MAN.
LETTER I.
Dear Brother
,
London.
I am
now comfortably and quietly settled in lodgings,
with an elderly lady, who has good blood in her veins; that is
to say, if blood be an hereditary commodity, which some
people doubt, but which I do not, for there are diseases bodily
and mental in most of the old families here that have descended
through half-a-score of wealthy generations. She claims descent
from Tudors and Plantagenets to boot, and combines the
conflicting
claims of both York and Lancaster. Though too well
bred to boast, she sometimes used to mention these matters,
until one day I advised her, in jest, to procure a champion to
tilt against young parson Dymoke for the broom at the ensuing
coronation. The good old soul took the joke ill, and I was
sorry for it. What right had I to ridicule that which, to her,
was an innocent source of happiness? I despise the cant of
sentiment, but I promise never to do so again.
She has a number of noble relatives among the respectable,
old-fashioned nobility, who still possess some of that sturdy,
antique morality and honesty, now so scarce among this class
throughout all Christendom. Their occasional visits in the
dusk of the evening, and the contemplation of her own august
descent, seem to constitute her little fund of worldly
enjoyment
.
It is so blameless, that I humour her by often enquiring
the names of her visitors; which gives occasion to a variety of
family details and claims of kindred, distant enough to be sure,
but still sufficient to support the little edifice of vanity, erected
in her heart upon the tombs of her ancestors. The old matron
is excessively methodical, and particularly neat in her dress
hates Napoleon Buonaparte with a zeal past all human
understanding
,
and has brought to war against him most exclusively
several passages of the Old and New Testaments.
Comfort, neatness, and economy distinguish her household,
from the cellar to the garret. Nothing is wasted, nothing is
wanting. Such, indeed, is her economy, that I verily believe
she never throws away a pin for want of a head, or a needle
for being without an eye. This economy is neither the
offspring of meanness nor avarice, but the rational result of a
determination to preserve her independence. Her means are
just sufficient, with this rigid economy, to enable her to appear
with that sober sort of gentility, which it is her pride and
delight
ever to exhibit. Were she to relax in any one respect the
nice system would lose its balance and fall to the ground. To
sum up all, she is so perfectly upright in all her dealings, that,
I am satisfied, no prospect of impunity, no certainty of
escaping
discovery or suspicion, would tempt her to defraud the
living or the dead, or receive more than her due. It is amusing
to see her uneasiness at incurring the slightest obligation, or being
subjected to the smallest debt. I happened to pay the postage
of a letter one day for her in her absence, and she was quite
unhappy because I could not make change, and release her
from the obligation. She and I are great friends after the
cold
English fashion
. If I be sick, every attention is scrupulously
paid, but paid as if from a sense of propriety, not from the
heart. Our occasional conversations are friendly, but formal;
rather genealogical I confess, but let that passthe old lady
comes from Wales. Still I cannot help respecting her most
sincerely, and I feel more at home in her house than any place
where I have sojourned since I left my own home. I have
been the more particular in my sketch, because she belongs to
a class of females which once gave a character to England,
and to English domestic life, of which the country yet feels the
benefit, in the enjoyment of a reputation for integrity, founded
on the past, rather than the present. It was this homely
honesty
,
this inflexible regard to principle, which made amends
for the absence of those easy and sprightly manners, which
attach
a stranger, who is generally more in want of courtesies
than benefits, and consequently forms his estimate of a people
from their general deportment, rather than from any particular
act of kindness. This class is, however, I regret to say, daily
mouldering away amidst the speculating extravagance and
splendid pauperism of the times. They cannot keep pace
with the more numerous class of the nobility and gentry,
because
their pride will not stoop to an alliance with vulgar
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. c
wealth, nor their principles bend to earn the rewards of the
government by the sacrifice of their integrity.
Our house is situated in one of the old streets, running into
******, which, though rather narrow, was considered quite
genteel until lately, but a corrector of enormities in beards
made a lodgment directly over the way, and poked his pole at
an angle of some forty degrees, almost into the old lady's
window
.
This awful invasion put to flight two persons of quality,
who lodged in the house. 'Tis an ill wind that blows nobody
good, and I was wafted by this breeze into lodgings that suit
me exactly. Adieu.
LETTER II.
Dear Brother
,
London.
I invaded London under cover of a great fog, somewhat
similar to that recorded on new year's eve in 1730, when, it is
stated, that many persons fell into Fleet-ditch, and several
prominent noses sustained serious damage by coming in contact
with each other. Among the few objects I could see, was a
person with a lantern, who, I suppose, like sop, was looking
about for an honest man. You may think, my dear brother,
how scarce honest men must be in London. Alighting from
the stage, there was a great contest for the privilege of carrying
my trunks, like that of the Greeks and Trojans for the body of
Patroclus. In conclusion, the
Greek
carried the day, as I
found, for a good-natured person apprised me, that if I
permitted
their attendance, I should probably never see my trunks
again. I was not aware of the necessity of this caution, as
you know in our own dear honest country, no man hesitates a
moment to trust his baggage with the first porter that offers, be
he black or white. This is not one of those solitary instances
from which no general conclusions can be drawn. It furnishes
decisive proof, that at least one class of people of this country
is not as honest as the same class in ours.
To escape the hacks I called a hack, and by that means fell
out of the frying-pan into the fire; that is, if rushing upon a
positive evil to escape a probable one, will justify the old
proverb
.
He charged me three times the amount of his fare, and
gave me a few bad shillings in change. These bad shillings
are, in truth, as common as counterfeit notes in our country,
and strangers should be equally aware of them. Well, he
drove me to the ****** coffee-house, the name of which,
being derived from my own country, attracted the yearnings
of my inclination. Here the master of the house very soon
satisfied me I had been cheated. But as hackney-coachmen
are for the most part rogues in grain, all over the world, new
and old, I determined, in my own mind, to let John Bull off
that time, and not denounce him on the score of this universal
characteristic of a particular species of men.
The master of the house advised me to buy a Picture of
London
,
which I did, (not the bastard work yelept the
new
Picture
,
but the genuine standard work) and much consolation did
it afford me. Among the first choice passages I fell upon, were
the following: Any man who saunters about London, with
pockets on the outside of his coat, or who mixes in crowds
without especial care of his pockets,
deserves no pity on
account
of the losses he may sustain
. Again: Persons should
be very particular as soon as they have called a
hackneycoach
,
to observe the number, before they get into it. This
precaution guards against imposition, or unforeseen accidents.
There is no other method of punishing coachmen who
misbehave
,
nor chance of recovering property carelessly left in the
coach, but by the recollection of the number. Now, brother,
I could not come within a thousand of the number of my coach,
for I had no idea of being cheated by a hackney-coachman in
this honest country.
For the benefit of any of your honest neighbours, who may
chance to visit this city, and be cheated before they can get a
Picture of London, I will extract one or two more passages
from that valuable work:
One of the most dangerous classes of swindlers are those
pretended porters or clerks, who attend about the doors of inns
at the time the coaches are unloading; or who watch the
arrival
of post-chaises at the doors of the coffee-houses. These
fellows, by various artifices, frequently obtain possession of the
luggage of a traveller, who has occasion to lament the want
of suspicion, in the loss of his clothes and other effects.
Mock auctions, in which plated goods are sold for silver,
and a variety of incredible frauds practised upon the unwary,
ought to be cautiously avoided. They may be in general
known by a person being placed at the door to invite in the
passing stranger.
Strangers having business at Doctors' Commons, should
previously know the address of a proctor, as all the avenues
are beset by
inferior clerks or porters
, who watch and accost
strangers, whom they take into some office, where they are
paid in proportion to the nature of the business, which is
conducted
not in the most respectable way, and never without
extra charges unwarranted by the profession.
In asking questions, or enquiring the way, it is necessary
always to apply at a shop, or a public-house, and never to
rely upon the information which may be given by persons in
the streets.
Such, brother, are a few of the dangers which beset the
traveller, in his adventurous pilgrimage through this wilderness
of two-legged beasts of prey.
My experience at Liverpool and elsewhere having taught me
somewhat, I began to smell a rat, almost the first moment I
entered the coffee-house. The waiters were excessively
officious
,
and so anxious to put themselves in my way, when there
was no occasion, that I was quite out of patience. The
master
of the house too, a most important little busy body, made
me bow upon bow: all which being contrary to the very nature
of an Englishman, I took it for granted that he meant to cheat
me. Accordingly, the first day at dinner, he gave me a bottle
of half-guinea wine, of the most pestiferous quality, which he
pronounced such as Lord Somebody always called for at his
house. The next day he gave me still worse, finding I put up
with the first, and charged me still higher, on the score of its
being a favourite wine of some noble Earl. The third day it
was still worse and still dearer, because his Grace of
always drank it in preference to any other. Thinking it best
to get out of the way, before mine host came to the king's
favourite
wine, which, according to the preceding steps of the
climax, must have been execrable, I got a friend to
recommend
me to another lodging, who accordingly negotiated the
terms, and stood security for my character with the excellent
lady, with whom I still remain. On leaving the coffee-house,
I was beset by the whole clan of domestics, from the
headwaiter
in broad-cloth to
boots
in dirt. The landlord made me
a sort of half bow, and I complimented him on his Grace's
favourite wine, and thus we parted, never, never, never, to
meet again, as your sentimental letter-writers say.
The physiognomy of London is by no means inviting,
especially
that part which was laid out, and built, before the
nobility
and the rich took it into their wise heads to spend their
incomes in town, rather than among their tenants in the
country
.
In some of the new and fashionable squares the buildings
are sufficiently aristocratic; but with here and there an
exception
,
the houses bear the stamp of something like republicanism
or equality. In general, they are quite comfortable in
appearance
,
but nothing more. The greater proportion of fine
buildings
is the offspring of public spirit, which certainly, at times,
has produced as great wonders in England as in any other part
of the world. The merchants, the companies of artizans,
indeed
almost all classes of people, except the nobility, have
vied with each other in public works, either of splendor or
utility, or generally both combined. The nobility have
contented
themselves with building palaces for their own private
use. It may be said, perhaps, that vanity must have its
gratification
in some way or other, and that those who cannot
build a palace individually, must compound by doing it in
company with others; thus making a general rather than an
individual
property. It may be so, but still the public is a gainer
by the latter plan, since we can go into some of these for
nothing
,
whereas the palaces are only shown for money.
One thing that has disgusted me most in this city, is the
incredible quantity of wretched and profligate beggars who
infest many parts, whose ragged, filthy, and debauched
appearance
turns pity into absolute disgust. I was, the other
day, admiring the magnificence of a new palace in one of the
fine squares, with my head full of the splendors of this
people
,
when, all at once, my visions of glory were put to flight
by the irruption of a family of most wretched beings of all ages,
from the gray-headed parent to the little infant holding by the
mother's hand. Their story was that of thousands, nay,
hundreds
of thousands, in this government-ridden nation: want of
employment and want of food. If true, it proved how much
they were to be pitied; if false, how yet much more they were
to be pitied. If necessity drove them to this wretched mode
of life, they might still derive some consolation from within;
if choice, then were they wretched indeed. The splendorso f
the palace vanished like those of the wicked enchanters of old,
and little else remained on my mind but the impression that its
walls were reared upon the miseries of thousands of such as
were now begging at the door.
Another bad feature in the physiognomy of London, is the
number and the profligacy of certain ladies, anciently called
the
Bishop of `Winchester's Geese
. Their effrontery, their
shocking depravity, disgusting indecency, and total
destitution
of every female characteristic, are horrible. Indeed,
brother
,
every species of vice is displayed here in its naked
deformity
,
and with a broad and vulgar grossness, that renders
London a complete contrast to Paris, at least, in outward
appearance
.
LETTER III.
Dear Brother
,
London.
Almost
the first thing that strikes an American, used to the
clear skies and glowing sunshine of his own country, is the
humidity
of the atmosphere, and the frequent absence of the god
of day. St. Simon and Jude's day is almost every other day
here. It rains or snows about one hundred and fifty days in
the year; and of the remainder, between fifty and sixty are
cloudy. The result is, that the verdure of the country is
excessively
luxuriant, although, to my mind, the landscapes
rather
weep than laugh. The grass and the foliage are so deadly
green, that they almost look blue, and resemble the effect of
distance, which, you know, communicates a bluish tint to the
landscape. But the grass grows and the cattle get fat, and the
roast beef of Old England is the better for it, undoubtedly.
To me, however, who you know love the sunshine like a
terrapin
,
there is something chilly and ungenial in the English
summer, and it offends me hugely to hear a fat, puffing,
beer-drinking
fellow, bawling out to his neighbour, A fine day,
when the sun looks as if it might verify the theory of one of the
old Greeks, that it was nothing more than a great round ball
of copper. Whether this melancholy character in the climate,
or the practice of drinking beer in such enormous quantities, or
both combined, have given that peculiar cast of bluff and gruff
stupidity, observable in the common people of England, I
cannot say; but certainly, if a man who drinks beer thinks
beer, the question is decided at once.
To describe, or even to name, all the villages and seats which
I passed, in going out of London at different times, is a task I
shall not undertake, and which indeed can only be done by a
person with more time on his hands than he knows what to do
with, and more patience than time.
Richmond Hill and village, with Twickenham on the
opposite
side of the Thames, about ten or twelve miles from
London
,
is all classic ground, and worthy to be so. It is, to my
mind, the most charming scenery in the
old
world. What
makes it the more agreeable to my eye is, that there is plenty
of wood, which is wanting in most of the English landscapes,
except about the great forests. What with their smooth lawns
and trim edges, the landscapes put one in mind of a well
shaven beard. But what gives the charm to these scenes is,
that they are connected with the shades of Pope and Thomson.
The latter lies buried in Richmond church; and thither I went
on a pilgrimage, the least a man can do in gratitude for the
many hours his genius has embellished and consecrated to pure
and innocent enjoyment.
Until the year 1792, there was no inscription over his grave,
which is in the north-easterly corner of the church. The
Earl of Buchan, Washington's old correspondent, at that time
placed over it, against the wall, a brass plate with this
inscription
:
In the earth, beneath this tablet, are the remains of James
Thomson, author of the beautiful poems of the Seasons, the
Castle of Indolence, &c. &c., who died at Richmond on the
27th day of August, and was buried on the 29th, O. S. 1748.
The Earl of Buchan, unwilling so good a man, and so
admirable
a poet, should be without a memorial, has denoted the
place of his interment, for the satisfaction of his admirers, in
the year of our Lord 1792.
But such memorials are rather benefits bestowed upon the
giver, than the receiver. No one will ever want a memorial
of Thomson, whose Seasons will continue while those he has
painted shall roll on their course, and men can read and relish
nature and truth. But for this memorial, it might, however,
have been speedily forgotten that such a man as my Lord of
Buchan ever existed.
I afterwards visited a house called Rossdale, where the poet
resided, and wrote the Seasons, and where many reliques are
still preserved. I was particularly struck with a little, round,
old-fashioned table, on which he was accustomed to write, and
which excited my reverence infinitely more than Arthur's
Round Table, which I afterwards saw at Winchester. There
are also two brass hooks, where he always hung his hat and
cane, for he was a man of habits, and seldom deviated from
them. In the garden was his favourite haunt, a
summer-house
,
overshadowed with luxuriant vines. Solitude and
solitary rambling constituted the pleasures of Thomson; and
it was doubtless from these habits of walking alone, observing
all the latent, and inherent, and even accidental charms of
nature, and reflecting upon them as he rambled along, that he
was enabled to combine natural and moral beauties so
delightfully
in his pictures. I wish he had been buried somewhere in
the fields, where the grass and the flowers might have sprung
on his grave, and realized the inimitable beauty of the verses
of Collins to his memory
In yonder grave a druid lies,
Where slowly winds the stealing wave,
The year's best fruit shall duteous rise
To deck their Poet's sylvan grave.
Twickenham, where Pope's villa once was, is a village
opposite
Richmond, to which you pass by a bridge. The house
which the poet inhabited is pulled down, but the famous grotto
remains, a pretty and fantastic monument of expensive folly.
Pope had better have held his tongue about Timon's villa,
and its fripperies; for, to my taste, this grotto is totally
unworthy
of any reputable nymphs of either wood or water. It is
neither splendid by art, nor magnificent, nor solemn by nature,
and is, in truth, an excellent place for keeping milk and butter
cool. I felt no reverence whatever for it, and heartily wished
the grotto, rather than the house, had been destroyed.
Perhaps I am singular; but though I am one of Pope's
greatest admirers, and think him in many, very many respects,
unequalled, as well as inimitable, his name, somehow or other,
does not carry with it those warm and affecting feelings of
admiration, as well as regret, which are conjured up by the
recollection of many other bards. It is true, he was rich,
was cherished by the great, and lived all his days in sunshine.
He reaped, during his life, that fame, as well as fortune, the
one of which few poets receive till after death, and the other
most want while alive. There was nothing in his whole life
either romantic or affecting, nothing to call forth sympathy.
But these circumstances, of themselves, are not sufficient to
account for my want of enthusiasm at visiting the spot where
he lived, wrote, and died.
It is for these reasons, probably, combined with the causes
before mentioned, that Twickenham and Pope's grotto does not
elevate the heart with those affecting, yet lofty emotions, that
arise from contemplating the little round table, and the
vinecovered
summer-house, of the author of
Liberty
, the
Seasons
,
and the
Castle of Indolence
. Pope is the poet of those who
reason rather than feel; the poet of the understanding, and of
men past the age of romantic delusions: Thomson is the poet
of youth, nature, and an uncorrupted heart. The one is a
man of the world, the other a druid of the woods and
melancholy
streams, the beautiful and sublime of nature.
I do not know any thing more affecting than a passage in
Fielding's
Tom Jones
, which is recalled to my mind by these
speculations. He was always poor, and in his latter days a
martyr to disease, slow, yet sure in its progress. It was,
perhaps, while tasting in advance the immortality he has
since attained that he broke out into the following
invocation
:
Come, bright love of fame, inspire my glowing breast!
Not thee I call, who over swelling tides of blood and tears
dost bear the hero on to glory, while sighs of millions waft his
swelling sails; but thee, fair, gentle maid, whom Mnesis, happy
nymph, first on the banks of Hebrus did produce; thee, whom
Monia educated, whom Mantua charmed, and who, on that
fair hill, which overlooks the proud metropolis of Britain,
satest with thy Milton tuning the heroic lyrefill my ravished
fancy with the hope of charming ages yet to come. Foretell
me that some tender maid, whose grandmother is yet unborn,
hereafter, when, under the fictitious name of Sophia, she reads
the real worth that once existed in my Charlotte, shall from
her sympathetic breast send forth the heaving sigh! Do thou
teach me not only to foresee, but feed on future praise!
Comfort
me by a solemn assurance, that when the little parlour, in
which I sit at this instant, shall be reduced to a
worse-furnished
box, I shall be read with honour, by those who never
knew or saw me, and whom I shall never see or know
.
The man who could dream, and dream truly too, could not
be miserable, even amid the neglect of fortune and the scorn of
fools. This secret consciousness is the staff which supports
and rewards genius in its weary pilgrimage.
LETTER IV.
Dear Brother
,
London.
In
the neighbourhood of Richmond, I was attracted by the
appearance of a grand house, which, upon inquiry, I learned
was built by a noted brewer of that village. This monument
of the inveterate beer-drinking propensity of the nation, is one
of the largest private dwellings I have seen in this country.
The story went, that it was finally devised to an Oxfordshire
baronet, who, not dealing in beer, could not afford to keep up
the establishment. He accordingly sold every thing about it
but the walls, and here it stands ready for the next portly
brewer, who shall be smitten with the desire of building up a
name in stone and mortar. The labours and the parsimony of
years are very often employed in this manner, by the rich
tradesmen of London, whose estates, not being in general
entailed, like those of the nobility and gentry, are for the most
part divided in such a manner, that not one of the heirs can
afford to live in the great house. It is therefore either sold
out of the family, or its deserted walls remain as a monument
of ostentatious folly.
I also reconnoitred Osterley house, which attracted my
notice, not so much for its magnificence, as its history. Every
schoolboy has heard of Sir Thomas Gresham, the great
merchant
,
who built the Royal Exchange, and gave such grand
entertainments to Queen Elizabeth, who loved nothing better
than feasting at the expence of other people. There is an old
story, that Elizabeth, being at a great entertainment at Osterley,
found fault with the court, as being too large, and gave her
opinion, that it would look better divided in two parts. Sir
Thomas, like another Aladdin, but by means of an agent more
powerful even than the genius of the lamp, that very night
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. d
caused the alteration to be made, so that next morning the
queen, looking out, saw the court divided according to her
taste. Her majesty, it is said, was exceedingly gratified with
this proof of his gallantry; but passed what was considered
rather a sore joke upon Sir Thomas, saying, That a house
was much easier divided than united. Lady Gresham and
Sir Thomas, it seems, were at issue on the point of domestic
supremacy; and Elizabeth, who hated all married women,
was supposed to allude to this matrimonial schism.
In going towards Uxbridge, which is twelve or fifteen miles
from this city, on the road to Oxford, there is a fine old place
called Harefield, where once resided the famous Countess of
Derby, the friend and admirer of that illustrious republican
poet, John Milton. It was here that Milton's Arcades were
represented, and in this neighbourhood the poet resided some
years with his father. It was for the son of this lady he wrote
the richest, the most poetical of all human productions, the
Masque of Comus
. Nobility becomes really illustrious when
connected by friendship and benefits with the immortality of
genius. Milton was an inflexible Republican in his political
principles, and sided with the Parliament in its attempts to
resist the tyrannical encroachments of Charles the First. In
this situation he had an opportunity of saving the life of Sir
William Davenant, who was taken up on a charge of being
an emissary of Charles the Second, then in exile. On the
Restoration Milton was excepted from the general amnesty,
but was finally pardoned, as it is said, by the intercession of
Sir William Davenant, who thus repaid his former good offices.
His politics prevented his being a fashionable poet. His
Paradise Lost
was sold to the bookseller for one-tenth of the
sum since paid for a dainty song by Tom Moore, set to music;
and the bad taste or servility of the critics suffered it to be
forgotten, till Addison at length did ample justice to its
beauties
.
Milton is rather in the back-ground at present, being
quite eclipsed by the superior merits of Mr. Croly, Mr. Southey,
Lord Byron, and the Great Unknown. The
Quarterly
Review
will certainly, ere long, convict him either of a want
of genius, or a lack of religion, if it be only on account of
his having been a Republican.
I dined at Uxbridge; and as no experienced English
traveller
ever omits making honourable or dishonourable mention
of the inns, I must inform you, for your particular satisfaction,
that those of Uxbridge, although specially noted by Camden,
are none of the best.
Pursuing my route towards Oxford, I again got upon classic
ground, about
Stoke Pogeis
, in the neighbourhood of which
the poet Gray resided with his mother. He was a frequent
visitor to the noble family there, and wrote his Long Story
at the request of the ladies. To me it appears the very worst
thing he ever did write; a very dull and doggrel ditty, with
only one line in it worth preserving. Gray was ashamed of it,
and tried to destroy all the copies; but the industry of editors,
and the cupidity of booksellers, unhappily preserved it for
posterity
to wonder at. The Muses used to keep a little court at
different times hereabouts. Milton lived not far off at Horton;
Waller at Beaconsfield; and Pope occasionally in Windsor
Forest. Edmund Burke also once occupied Waller's mansion
at Beaconsfield; and if being under the dominion of
imagination
constitutes a poet, may certainly be classed with the
trio. In the neighbourhood of Beaconsfield they shew an old
hollow tree, in which, it is affirmed, Waller wrote many of his
poems. I do not believe much of the story, yet still it is
pleasant
to see old hollow trees derive an interest from these
associations
,
that the residence of monarchs cannot confer upon the
most splendid palaces. In deviating, just as the roads
occasionally
offered inducement, I had a view of a fine old palace,
once the property of the Hampdens, a name so well known in
our country for inflexible patriotism, that it is often adopted
with that of Russell and Sydney, by those who advocate the
rights of the people. The family of Hampden was of great
antiquity, of the genuine old Saxon blood, without any
mixture
of Norman. The gentry who came over with William
the Conqueror were mere upstarts of the day before yesterday,
compared with the Hampdens. But I was not thinking of their
antiquity. As I contemplated the venerable pile, I was
recalling
to mind that noble Englishman, who was the first to put
himself in the breach between an arbitrary king and an abused
people; of the man who dared to appeal to the laws of his
country against the oppression of his sovereign to judges who
betrayed their trust, and sacrificed their conscience at the shrine
of a time-serving interest. Eight out of twelve decided against
Hampden; but though he lost his cause with the judges he
gained it with the people, and the decision became one of the
principal grounds of the revolution that followed. Of such a
man it is of little moment who were his ancestors; the blood
that flowed in his veins was noble of itself without tracing it to
a noble ancestry.But the name and the race are now no more,
or, beyond doubt, we should see some of them at this moment
foremost in the ranks, resisting the torrent of corruption,
venality
and boundless extravagance of this government. The
great John Hampden is acknowledged, even by Hume, the
apologist of the Stuarts, to have been a man of the purest
patriotism; and such was the spotlessness of his character,
that not one of the apologists of kingly pretension has
ventured
to impeach his motives or attack his memory. He was
a near kinsman of Cromwell, and fell in action early in the
commencement of the war between the people and the king.
His grandson became involved in the South Sea scheme, and
died by his own hands; he was succeeded by his brother, who
dying without issue, the estates fell to a Trevor, who now bears
the title of Viscount Hampden. To the disgrace of his
country
,
I believe Hampden's life has never been writtenat least,
I have not been able to procure it at any of the booksellers!
It is said he was one of those who took passage with Cromwell
for New-England, and were stopped by an order of council.
I cannot but regret that he did not reach our country, for
perhaps he might have left there a posterity worthy the soil of
freedom. Hampden was always a friend to our New England
may we never lose the recollection of his virtues or his
friendship!
It is traditionary of the Hampdens, that they owned vast
possessions in the time of Edward the Third, a considerable
portion of which was forfeited by the heir of the family, (in
consequence of some provocation not exactly known,) for
giving the Black Prince a box on the ear. There is extant a
couplet, which has reference to that circumstance.
Tring, Wing, and Ivengo did go,
For striking the Black Prince a blow.
You see, brother, the Hampdens were, from the first, gifted
with the spirit of freemen. It is a pity the race is extinct; for
never did England more require such men as Hampden and
Sydney. She has yet a Russell in the person of Lord John,
one of the most respectable and patriotic noblemen in the
kingdom.
Leaving this old nest of the eagles, I returned into the
Oxford road, and pursued my way towards that famous city
of the Muses, that is to say, the Prize Muses; for the Sacred
Nine of Oxford never sing now, except when tempted by a
medal. Palaces and fine seats were sprinkled thickly by the
road-side; but as they contained little else but a collection of
pictures to attract the stranger, I passed them by. Few things,
in this world of trouble, are more intolerable than a visit to
one of these
show-places
, where one is not only obliged to pay
for opening every door, but, what is still worse, to listen to the
eternal gabble of a cicerone by rote, who will by no means
permit a man to consult his own taste in the selection of objects
of admiration. The only way to silence one of those is to
give him a shilling when he expects half a guinea. He will
never speak more, depend upon it.
The sunset, I remember, was exceedingly unpropitious to
my entrance into Oxford, for it set in a profound English mist.
I had been forewarned and fore-armed of the beauties of the
place, and that I should enter it by one of the finest and
longest streets in the world. It certainly was long enough, for I
thought never to have got to the end of it; but its beauties
were too modest to meet the ardent gaze of a stranger, and
retired
quietly behind the fog.
I was ready to be pleased with every thing; and never, I
believe, were the noble fanes of Oxford admired by a more
enthusiastic votary. Learning was, for once in her life, lodged
in palaces, some of which were so lofty and majestic, that I
actually mistook them for poor-houses, which are beyond all
comparison the most sumptuous edifices in this country. I
cannot describe them, nor recollect half that I saw in this
Gothic heaven. I had introductions to some of the jolly
fellows;
but they were of very little use to me, owing to a
most untoward matter, which I shall proceed to disclose,
which disturbed the prize muses, and occupied the exclusive
attention of every member of the university, from the
vice-chancellor
,
in his white band, to the students in their black
caps. To explain it properly, I must furnish you with a few
preliminaries, concerning the peculiar constitution and
privileges
of the university, without which it would be difficult
to comprehend the nature of the case.
The University of Oxford is governed by its own peculiar
laws, which are administered, or ought to be, by a great officer,
called the chancellor; but as almost every great office is
executed here by a deputy or sub-deputy, the chancellor
nominates
to the university two persons, one to be chosen high
steward, the other vice-chancellor. The high steward assists
the proctors, if required, in the performance of their duties, and
hears and decides all capital cases, arising within the
jurisdiction
of the university, when required by the chancellor.
The vice-chancellor is, in almost every other respect, the
deputy of the chancellor; he receives the rents due to the
university, licenses taverns, &c. and, to use the words of an
old author, he takes care that sermons, lectures, disputations,
and other exercises be performed; that heretics, panders,
bawds,
Winchester geese
, &c. be expelled the university, and
the converse of the students; that the proctors and other
officers do their duty; that courts be duly called and law-suits
determined, without delay; in a word, that whatever is for the
honour or the profit of the university, or may conduce to the
advantage of good literature, may be carefully obtained. The
vice-chancellor, at his entrance into office, chooses two
provice-chancellors
out of the heads of colleges, to one of whom
he deputes his power during his absence. The high steward is
chosen for life, but the vice-chancellor is nominated annually,
and is always a person in holy orders as well as the head of a
college. Now for the affair which so effectually disturbed the
repose, not to say the profound sleep, of this temple of the
Muses.
It seems a ferocious tailor, not having the fear of the
vice-chancellor
before his eyes, had brought a suit against a student
of
Brazen-nose
, in the court of King's Bench, when the statute
prescribed that he should bring it before the vice-chancellor.
The vice-chancellor, indignant at this contempt of his authority,
hereupon summoned the tailor before him, and addressed him,
as is affirmed, in something like the following, when he found
that the souls of nine stout heroes were domiciled in the body
of this ninth part of a man:
Avaunt and quit my sight!
Thy shears are edgeless: thou hast no thread and needle
In those paws, that thou dost stitch withal.
Approach thee like an Edinburgh Reviewer,
French sans-culotte, or damned democrat,
The Carbonari, half-starv'd radical,
Or Cato Street conspirator!
Nay, come like nonconformists in a row,
And swear that church and tithes shall be no more;
Moot points of logic with a cambric needle;
Or, cross-legg'd, like a rascal papist, sit,
With thimble on thy pate instead of helmet,
And dare me to the shopboard with thy shears,
But never dare me to the king's bench court
Skip, stitch-louse, skip, I say!
Ay, ay, cried this unparalleled tailor; ay, ay, Mr. Vice,
you may talk Latin as much as you please; but, in plain
English
,
I must have my money, and, what's more, I will. I
have had enough of dunning; and as for bringing a suit
in your courts here, I recovered one not long ago, and
was almost ruined by it. The vice-chancellor, it is affirmed,
did not swear: but it was the general opinion he would have
done it, had he not been a clergyman.
The recreant tailor brought the curse of Ernulphus upon him;
he was cursed in all the moods and tenses; in Latin and
English
;
and would have been cursed in Greek and Hebrew, had
any of the present professors been sufficiently versed in those
tongues. He was formally excommunicated; his shop
windows
hermetically sealed, and himself prohibited from
labouring
in his vocation for the fiery students of Brazen-nose; his
business was doomed to destruction here, and his soul
hereafter
.
Still the thrice, and nine times valiant tailor, refused
to take a single back-stitch or herring-bone, either to the right
or to the left; he continued to demur to the jurisdiction of the
vice-chancellor, and to stand by the King's Bench, which,
next to the shopboard, he looked upon to be the purest seat of
justice in the kingdom. I defy the dl and all his imps!
said the tailor, snapping his fingers; which saying was held
to be a reflection upon the vice-chancellor and the scholars.
In this state the matter remained all the time I staid at
Oxford
,
which was nearly a week. The tailor was the greatest
man of the age; another Caliph Omar, enemy to learning and
orthodoxy. His name was in every body's mouth, and the
Muses, all nine of them, sung in praise of this ninth part of a
man. The Senior Wrangler was deputed to argue with him,
but the tailor got him betwixt the sharp shears of his logic, and
almost cut him in two. A
Terr Filius
was next sent; but,
though his speech was bitterly satirical, the tailor remained as
immovable as the sun himself. At prayers, and lectures, the
students could think of nothing but the tailor; the jolly fellows
could not sleep quietly upon the Pennyless Bench over
their ale, for thinking of the tailor; the sempstresses, who are
very pretty at Oxford, marked nothing on their linen, but
tailor
;
the little boys at catechism, answered nothing but the
tailor to all questions; and several children, born about this
time, cried for their nurses' thimbles before they were a day
old. Never, in fact, since the days of the furious contests
between
the students of the north and south, recorded by
Anthony
Wood, was the seat of the prize Muses in such a
consternation
.
I left the place before the matter was settled, with
a determination that if the tailor were ever restored to the use
of his weapons, and I ever had an opportunity, he should make
me a full suit of the cloth called Thunder and Lightning,
which cannot but equal armour of proof, considering his
indomitable
and valorous propensities.
Notwithstanding, however, the confusion which I have
described
,
I gained sufficient opportunity to put my nose into
some of the old rusty remains of antiquity, which abound in
this place. Among these, the Bodleian Library, the
Ashmolean
Museum, and the Arundel and Pomfret Marbles, are
particularly
curious and interesting. In the libraries are many
notices of the early events which occurred in different ages,
which throw vast light upon the state of manners, and mark
the gradual changes produced by time and circumstances. As
such, they are highly worthy of notice, and if I had possessed
sufficient time or patience, I would have made copious extracts
from them. As it was, I could only copy a few of such as I
considered might contribute to the future instruction or
amusement
of my friends. I will select some of these, pretty much
as they occur in my memorandum-book. They are principally
taken from Anthony Wood, whose work is a sort of
storehouse
of Oxford antiquities. The nature of his book may be
gathered
from Wood's complaint of one John Shirley,
Terr Filius
of Trinity College, in 1673, who said, That the society of
Merton would not let me live in the college, for fear I should
pluck it down to search after antiquities; that I was so great
a lover of antiquities, that I loved to live in an old cockle-loft,
rather than in a spacious chamber; that I was
vir caducus;
that I intended to put into my book pictures of mother Louse
and mother George, two old wives; that I would not let it be
printed, because I would not have it new and common. This
is the character of Anthony's book, given by a wag, with some
little exaggeration, of course.
The state of learning at Oxford, in the thirteenth century,
may be gathered from the following: In the year 1284, John
Peckham, Archbishop of Canterbury, came to Oxford, to
visit Osney Abbey; which being finished, he called together the
masters of the University, who appearing before him, he made
a grave speech; then told them of divers erroneous opinions,
which they, not becoming their wisdom, did entertain; and
that neither by reason, nor upon any scholastical ground, but
for the cause of commotion, did
impudently
affirm and defend,
against the instructions and lessons of the ancient philosophers,
and other wise men. Among their grammatical errors, it
seems they held
Ego currit
, and
Ego legit
, to be good
Latin.
As late as the beginning of the sixteenth century, the study
of Greek was entirely unknown at Oxford; and, with the
exception
of Thomas Linacre, and one or two others, who were
trying to introduce it into the University, the members treated
the study of Greek with contempt. King James the First, with
his Queen, in 1605, visited Oxford, and was entertained there
with speeches, sermons, comedies, mysteries, and tragedies,
for some days. Several regulations were made for their
reception
,
among which, the most remarkable, are the following:
The University College, All Soules, and Magdalen
College
,
do sett up verses at his Majesty's departure, upon such
places where they may be seen as he passeth by.
Doctor Parry to preach a Latin sermon three quarters of an
hour long. It is stated afterwards, that his Majesty yawned
mightilye, on this occasion; indeed, he seems to have been
mightilye tired of the whole visit, if we may credit the
chronicler, who gives the following account of his behaviour
at a comedy:
The Comedy, quoth he, began at between nine and ten,
and ended at one; the name of it was
Alba
, whereof I never
knew the reason; it was a pastoral, much like one I had seen
in King's College, Cambridge. There were many rusticall
songes and dances, which made it very tedious, insomuch that
if the chancellors of both University had not entreated his
Majesty earnestly, he would have been gone before half the
comedy had been ended.
Neither did His Majesty, it seems, relish their tragedy
better
than their comedy. The same writer, who, you may
depend
upon it, was a
Cantab
, proceeds to recordThe next
morning and afternoon we passed in hearing sermons and
disputations
.
The same day after supper, about nine of the clock,
they began to act the tragedy of
Ajax Flagellifer
, wherein the
stage varied three times; they had all goodly antique apparel,
for all that, it was not acted so well by many degrees as I have
seen it in Cambridge. The King was very weary before he
came thither, and much more wearied by it, and spoke many
words of dislike.
A comedy called
Vertumnus
was next day represented, and
though allowed by our
Cantab
to be much better performed
than the others, yet the King was so overwearied, that after
a while he distasted it and fell asleep; when he awakened, he
would have him gone, saying, I marvel what they think me to
be, with such other like speeches, shewing his dislike thereof;
yet did he tarry till they had ended it, which was after one
o'clock. The only thing that pleased his Majesty, was a
discreet
and learned speech by Dr. Warner, dissuading men from
tobacco, by good reasons and apt similes, backed by twenty
syllogisms, which so delighted the great opponent of tobacco,
that he said to the nobles about him, God keep this fellow in
a right course, he would prove a dangerous heretic; he is the
best disputer I ever heard.
The poverty of the students at Oxford, in the middle of the
sixteenth century, was such, that many of them were obliged
to get a license from the chancellor to beg, and it appears that
it was at that time common for them to go a-begging with
bags and wallets, and sing
Salve Regina
at rich men's dores.
The students were about this time (1559) so poor and
beggarly
,
that many of them were forced to obtain licence under
the commissary's hand to require alms of well-disposed people;
and indeed the want of exhibitions and charity of religious
people, was so much, that their usual saying now was,
Sunt mut mus, nostraque fama fames
.
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. e
The following clerical anecdotes may amuse you, at the
same time that they illustrate the style of preaching, as well as
the charity of the priests of those times:
Richard Tavener, Esq., did several times preach at Oxford,
and when he was high sheriff of the county, came into St.
Mary's church, out of pure charity, with a gold chain about
his neck, and a sword, it is said, by his side. One of his
sermons
began as follows:
Arriving at the mount of St. Mary's, in the strong stage
(the stone pulpit) where I now stand, I have brought you some
fyne bisketts baked in the oven of charitye, carefully conserved
for the chickens of the church, the sparrows of the spirit, and
the sweet swallows of salvation. Mr. Sheriff Tavener must
have been another Friar Gerund.
Two itinerant priests coming, says Anthony Wood, towards
night, to a cell of Benedictines near Oxford, where, on a
supposition
of their being mimes or minstrels, they gained
admittance
.
But the cellarer, sacristan, and others of the brethren,
hoping to have been entertained by their buffoonery, and
finding
them to be nothing more than two poor priests, who had
nothing but spiritual consolation to offer in return for their
hospitality, disappointed of their mirth, they beat them soundly
and turned them out of the monastery.
The same author gives a character of Sir Walter Raleigh,
who was of Oriel College, which I copied for two reasons.
Raleigh ought ever to be remembered and honoured in our
country, as one of the first who employed his influence and his
fortune in laying the foundation of our western empire. His
eminent worth, says Wood, speaking of Raleigh, both in
domestic polity, foreign expeditions and discoveries, arts and
literature, both practive and contemplative, was such, that
they seemed at once to conquer both example and imitation.
Those that knew him well, esteemed him to be a person born to
that only which he went about, so dexterous was he in all or
most of his undertakings, in court, in camp, by sea, by land,
with sword, with pen
.
There is something, I think, singularly and oddly affecting
in the following notices of the early Protestant martyrs, which
I got out of Strype's Memorials, an old book in the Bodleian:
I cannot here omit, he says, old Father Latimer's habit
at his appearing before the commissioners, which was also his
habit while he remained prisoner at Oxford. He held his hat
in his hand; he had a kerchief on his head, and upon it a
nightcap or two, and a great cap such as townsmen used, with
two broad flaps to button under his chin: an old thread-bare
freez-gown of Bristow, girded to his body with a penny leather
girdle, at which hanged, by a long string of leather, his
testament
and his spectacles, without case, hanging about his neck
upon his breast. What would our modern English bishops,
with their twenty, thirty, aye, fifty thousands a year, say to this
costume of one of the noblest of their tribe? I mean those
consistent
ones, who, it has been aptly said,
All over luxury, they at vice declaim,
Chide at ill lives, and at good livings aim;
On down they sleep, on downy carpets tread,
Their ancestors, th' Apostles, wanted bread!
At home they lie, with pride, spleen, plenty stor'd,
And hire some poor dull rogue to serve the Lord.
In October, continues Strype, Ridley and Latimer
were brought forth to their burning; and passing by Cranmer's
prison, Ridley looked up to have seen him, and to have taken
his last farewell. But he was not then at the window, being
engaged in a dispute with a Spanish friar. But he looked
after them, and devoutly falling on his knees, prayed to God
to strengthen their faith and patience in that their last but
painful passage.
I will conclude this letter with some curious particulars
relating
to the first introduction of newspapers into England,
which took place little more than two hundred years ago.
I am indebted to honest Anthony Wood for the succeeding
list, and the particulars collected with so much industry. The
first paper mentioned by him is,
Mercurius Rusticus
, or the
Countrie's Complaint. It first appeared, he says, the 22d of
August, 1642, in a single quarto sheet, and extended to only
nineteen or twenty numbers. I believe Wood is mistaken here
with regard to this being the first. Cleveland, in giving an
account of the London periodicals and diurnals, states, that
the original desiner of this kind was Dutch
Gallo Belgicus
,
the
Protoplast
, and the modern Mercuries but
Hans en
Kelders
.
I have somewhere read, that the
Mercurius-Gallo-Belgicus
is mentioned in Carew's Survey of Cornwall, first
published in 1602, and by Donne in some verses of the date of
1611. If the
Mercurius Rusticus
was the first of these
diurnals
,
there is probably some error in the date as set down by
Wood.
There was a second part of
Mercurius Rusticus
, giving an
account of some outrages committed on the cathedrals in
various parts of England. These were all collected in a
volume, four or five years after their first publication; but I
believe no copy is extant at this time. It would be an
invaluable
accession to the treasures of his Grace of ******,
or my Lord *******. These papers were written by one
Bruno Ryves, a Dorsetshire man, first one of the clerks in
New College, then chaplain to Magdalen, and then a most
noted and florid preacher at Stanwell, in the County of
Middlesex
.
He afterwards became rector of St. Martin's, London,
and chaplain to Charles the First. When the Presbyterians
got the upper hand, they turned him out of his rectory, and he
fared ill enough, until the Restoration, when he enjoyed several
rich benefices, was sworn scribe to the order of the garter,
and died in 1677.
Mercurius Aulicus
, the next paper of this kind, was begun
at Oxford, where the court then was, in 1642, and continued
to be published once a week, till the latter part of 1645, when it
ceased to appear with any degree of regularity. Wood says,
it had a great deal of wit and buffoonery; and that Nedham,
the writer of
Mercurius Britannicus
, was no more to be
compared
with
Aulicus
, than a dwarf to a giant.
Mercurius
Aulicus
, according to Nedham, was the work of several
hands, such as George Digby, Secretary Nicholas, and
Birkenhead
,
the scribe. He also says, that each college was assessed
both for a weekly contribution of money and wit. But Wood
says, that notwithstanding what this liar affirms, all Oxford
knew, that John Birkenhead began, and continued them, only
that in his absence his place was supplied by Peter Heylin.
Birkenhead was the son of a saddler in Cheshire, and became
amanuensis to Archbishop Laud, who got him elected a fellow
of All Souls. When the king retired to Oxford, on account of
the troubles, Birkenhead began the
Mercurius Aulicus
, which
so pleased the King, that he got him appointed reader or
professor
of Moral Philosophy. Being turned out by the
parliamentary
ascendency, he went to London, where he was several
times imprisoned, and lived by his wits, in helping young
gentlemen
out at dead lifts, in making poems, songs, and amorous
epistles, to their respective mistresses, &c. On the Restoration
times mended with him. He became successively Doctor of
Civil Law, member of parliament, knight, a Master of Requests
and of the Faculties, and member of the Royal Society. He
died in 1679.
Mercurius Britannicus, Mercurius Pragmaticus
, and
Mercurius
Politicus
, were all written by Marchmont Nedham, a
native of Oxfordshire, who was educated at All Souls college,
and afterwards went to London, where he officiated as a
schoolmaster or usher at Merchant Tailors. He belonged
subsequently to Gray's Inn, where he obtained a comfortable
subsistence, until the commencement of the parliamentary war,
when, soon siding, says the author, with the rout and scum
of the people, he made them weekly sport by railing at all
that was noble and intelligent, in his paper called
Mercurius
Britannicus;
wherein his aim was to sacrifice some noble
lord, or even the king himself, to the beast with many heads.
This prodigy of editorial consistency, however, was either
bribed or persecuted into loyalty, since he afterwards was
introduced
to King Charles, kneeled down, and begged his
forgiveness
,
and had the honour to kiss his majesty's hand. He
then attacked his old friends, the Presbyterians, in
Mercurius
Pragmaticus
, for which he was caught, imprisoned in
Newgate
,
and escaped with his ears, through the interposition of
Lenthall, the Speaker, and Bradshaw, President of the High
Court, which brought Charles to the block. These obtained
his pardon, I suppose, on condition of his once more changing
sides. Accordingly, he commenced a new journal, under the
title of
Mercurius Politicus
, in which he treated the cavaliers
with as much severity as he had formerly done the
Presbyterians
.
His writings had great influence on the popular
feelings
;
for he was a good scholar, a poet, and a great wag,
witty, humorous, and conceited. The royal party pitied him
while he continued on their side, but afterwards, he was so
much hated by them, that, according to our author, there were
many, even in his time, who could not endure to hear
Nedham's
name mentioned. He died in 1678.
The
Mercurius Britannicus
was published once a week, on
Monday, from 1643 to 1647, when the
Mercurius Pragmaticus
,
for King Charles, was commenced and ended shortly
afterwards
,
by Nedham again changing sides, and joining his old
friends, the Presbyterians, or people. The next series, the
Mercurius Politicus
, it is said, contained many essays against
monarchy, and in support of a free state; so much so, that
the author was more than once stopped by the interference of
the Council of State. Their last order suppressed the paper
for the future, in consequence of which, Muddiman and Dury
began the publication of a semi-weekly paper, called the
Parliamentary
Intelligencer
. To this succeeded the
Mercurius
Publicus
, which was continued by Dury till 1663, when Roger
L'Estrange took charge of it, and changed the title
successively
to the
Public Intelligencer
and
The News
. These
continued
till 1665, when L'Estrange gave them up, in
consequence
of the publication of other and cheaper semi-weekly
papers. These were the
Oxford Gazette
, by Henry
Muddiman
,
afterwards called the
London Gazette
, when the court
removed to London, and placed under the superintendence of
Williamson, under-secretary of state, who employed Charles
Perrot, A. M. to do the business under him, till the year 1671.
From that time to the period of Wood's writing, they were,
he says, constantly written by the under secretaries of state,
and so continued.
As the progress of intelligence, and the reception of more
free principles prepared the minds of the people to become
interested
in the affairs of government, newspapers and periodical
journals continued to multiply, until it became impossible to
keep an account of their successive appearance. Magazines,
reviews, and political, and scientific, and literary, and
philosophical
journals, multiplied apace, until the present time, when
our daily opinions can scarcely be said to depend upon any
other basis, than the varying interests and temporary
supremacy
of some one or other of these periodical or diurnal
oracles. It is well for us, indeed, that those fundamental
rules, those moral axioms, on which the relative duties of man
to man, and man to society rest, are beyond the reach of the
caprices of fashion, or the schemes of politicians; else we
should be in danger of having no stationary land-marks, no
God Terminus in morals, to designate either our rights or our
duties.
I must not forget to tell you, that there is no place in
all Christendom, where they say their prayers so fast as at
Oxford.
LETTER V.
Dear Brother
,
London.
In
my last, I believe I forgot to inform you of a curious
fact recorded, concerning Oxford, in the very tedious,
particular
,
and prosing accounts of those various Progresses
made by Queen Elizabeth, at various times, through different
parts of England, by which she reaped such harvests of
popularity
,
and, what pleased her quite as well, lived at free
quarters
.
There is certainly something servile in the nature of
civilized man. An Indian will turn his back on any thing
which might be supposed to challenge his admiration among
civilized people, because he considers it a sort of
acknowledgment
of his inferiority, to wonder. Only, however, let a great
personage come among a refined people, and they will follow,
and shout at his heels, and wonder, and be delighted beyond
measure, whenever he smiles, bows, or exhibits any of those
ordinary condescensions which gentlemen usually pay to their
inferiors. The good folks will pardon a hundred acts of
oppression
in consideration of a bow and a smile.
But to my story. It is recorded that Queen Elizabeth,
sometime
in 1556, visited Oxford, where she was royally feasted
for a whole week. The day after, says the writer of the
Progress, she took her leave, and was conducted by the
heads as far as Shotover Hill, when the Earl of Leicester gave
her notice, that they had accompanied her to the limits of their
jurisdiction. From hence, casting her eyes back upon Oxford
with all possible marks of tenderness and affection, she bade
them farewell. The
Queen's countenance
had such an effect
upon the diligence of this learned body, that within a few
years after, it produced more shining instances of real worth,
than had ever been sent abroad, at the same time, in any age
whatsoever. This is one of the most marvellous effects of
the Queen's countenance I remember; it shows how
complaisant
even genius and learning are, in countries where the
people are brought up with a proper notion of the divine
right of kings. A mere visit to Oxford awakened all the
Muses, and inspired not only learning, but worth, in this
ancient seminary of loyalty. Oxford, with all its beauties, is
one of the dullest places I ever visited; and had not the tailor
given it some additional interest, I should have been heartily
tired with the sameness of every thing I saw. In leaving it, I
had a view of the village of Cummor, which has lately become
noted as the scene of part of the romance of
Kenilworth
. I
did not visit it; the scenes described by the Great
Unknown
are not yet classical, and I do not think they ever
will be.
From hence to Worcester, nothing particular occurred, and
I shall reserve, till a future opportunity, my observations on
what I saw, at the different places where I stopped
occasionally
,
and spent from one to three days, in making inquiries on
particular subjects. There were as usual several fine seats,
and one in particular at Ditchley, where I was told were some
valuable pictures; but knowing the price one must pay in
money and patience for these treats, I avoided all such places.
In general I may observe, that the country was not so pretty
as in some other parts I have seen, and that occasionally it
presented scenes of barrenness. Two spots, however, seem
worthy of some little commemoration. One is the ancient
town of Evesham; the other, the famous Malvern Hill, where
every picturesque tourist makes a point of being enraptured.
I'll not be out of fashion.
Evesham is derived, by the monkish antiquaries, from one
Eaves, swineherd to the Bishop of Worcester. As bishops in
those days were nearly all of them saints, which I am sorry to
say is not the case at present, I presume their swineherds were
men of some consequence, by their giving names to towns.
This part of England, between Oxford and Worcester, seems
to have been the paradise of monks. At Abingdon they had a
rich and stately monastery, whose revenue, in an age when
money was probably twenty times more valuable than at
present
,
amounted to about two thousand sterling a year. At
Evesham they were lords of twenty-two towns and manors.
No wonder such a church abounded in saints! The principal
reason for detaining you a little at Evesham is connected,
however
,
with a different matter. It was here that the famous
Simon Mountford, Earl of Leicester, the champion of the
English Barons, and the great assertor of Magna Charta, after
having been virtually lord of England and its paltry king,
fought his last fight, was defeated and slain. Like many other
assertors of popular and aristocratic rights, in monarchies, his
character has come down to us covered with imputations of
ingratitude, perfidy, and ambition. But we should be cautious
how we receive the relations of characters and events from
the pens of historians, who wrote while the descendants of the
king, whom Mountford opposed, occupied the throne of
England
.
If historians can ever be said to be impartial, it is only
when the events they record, and the characters they discuss,
are so distant or obscure, that they are just as likely to err
through ignorance, as their predecessors were through
prejudice
.
There is something, at all events, about the renown of
this Simon Mountford, which made an impression on me early
in life; and as he took the popular side, at least the only
popular side there was at that time, I do not for my part,
exactly see, why he is not as good a martyr as Charles the
First.
Not far from hence, I passed the site of another fat rookery
of monks, who in ancient times revelled in the spoils of a score
of manors and towns. The name of this place is Pershore,
and from hence to Worcester is one of the pleasantest rides in
the whole country. This last is one of the most lively,
agreeable
,
not to say beautiful, cities I have ever seen out of our
own country. Though one of the most ancient in England, it
displays nothing, or almost nothing, of that gloomy aspect of
decay, which may be observed in every other old city I have
visited; where the houses look old, the people look old, and
the very air we breathe seems to come out of old cellars and
mildewed cloisters. I never get among these reliques of past
changes, without my imagination soon becoming tinged with
gloom and superstition; there is certainly something in the
very style of a Gothic building that is calculated to nourish
such impressions, and a ghost, a miracle, or a murder, is like
a fish out of water, unless connected with this species of
architecture
;
it was the cause, as well as the effect, of the
superstitious
character of those times in which it flourished.
But there is little of this about this charming city, where
the girls trip along as if they were going a maying, and the
men actually look as if they had something to do: it lies close
by the side of the Severn, which being the largest river in
England
,
is, of course, entitled to be described in the superlative.
Accordingly, the poets, call it the majestic, the
magnificent
,
the Father of Rivers, &c., while tourists never
mention
it without some epithet indicative of prodigious magnitude.
This prodigious river is crossed here by a bridge of five ar hes;
it rises in Plinlimmon, in Montgomeryshire, and falls into the
Bristol Channel, after an
endless course of one hundred and
thirty miles!
As I shall have occasion, in the course of my tours, to
remark
the frequent recurrence of this species of the bathos, in
describing scenes of nature, permit me to make a few
observations
once for all. Every man, in speaking of whatever is
great in his estimation, refers to some standard of comparison,
formed from the result of his own individual experience. The
greatest he has seen, is, to his imagination, the greatest in the
world. Hence, the English tourist calls his rivers, his
mountains
,
and his lakes, the greatest, the highest, and the most
beautiful, because he knows of no other. When one of the
picturesque tourists comes to the mighty Severn, he is in
raptures
;
when he beholds the lake of
Bala
, the largest in Wales,
he calls it this immense body of water, although, as I am
an authentic traveller, it is but four miles long and one broad!
But, body o'me, when he mounts to the summit of
Snowdoun
,
which is of the prodigious height of three thousand
six hundred feet, he is unalterably convinced that he can
overlook
the tops of the Andes, and that the whole world lies
directly
under his nose. The painters of the picturesque also
practise this species of imposition upon foreigners, especially
us Americans, by heightening, as it is called, the effect of their
pieces; that is to say, by making the waterfalls higher, the
rocks more rugged, and the hills more perpendicular. When I
came to view the originals of those coloured landscapes, which
abound to such a degree in our parlours and print-shops at
home, I did not know them. It is inconceivable, brother, how
they are exaggerated in every feature of beauty and sublimity.
Far be it from me to flout these people for not having larger
rivers, higher mountains, finer waterfalls, and broader lakes.
They cannot help it. All I wish is to put you on your guard
against the superlative style in which they speak of things, to
which, in our country, we should apply some diminutive
epithet
.
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. f
Our standard of greatness is different from theirs. Our
Mississippi and Missouri are alone called mighty streams,
because they course their thousands of miles, and roll a tribute
to the sea greater than that of all the rivers of Britain combined.
Our Lake Superior, with its hundred rivers, is alone named in
the language of the superlative degree, because you could empty
all the lakes of Britain into its bosom, as a drop in the bucket,
without raising its surface the breadth of a hair. Some of our
hills
too, as the
white hills
of New Hampshire, are twice as
high as the mighty Snowdoun, yet they are only called hills.
This habit of speaking in the superlative has also crept into
their modes of estimating their exploits, the beauties of their
landscapes, the excellence of their literature, and above all,
the talents of their great men. In just the same degree that they
exaggerate the dimensions of natural objects to the imagination,
by their inflated epithets, do they exaggerate the talents and
qualifications of their great men.
At present, I must not forget this boundless city of
Worcester
,
and its magnificent river. It is spread, as I before
stated, along the Severn, which is really a pretty little river,
or rather, as we should call it at home, a creek. They go so
far as to say, that Worcester owes its foundation to
Constantine
Chlorus
. It was burnt by Hardicanute the Dane; set fire to
by Roger de Montgomery; afterwards burnt by accident;
again burnt in the wars of king Stephen and Maud; in the
time of Henry the Second it again underwent the same fate.
From out of all these burnings Worcester rose a gay, a
beautiful
city; the seat of the graces in this part of England, and
the town residence in winter, of many of the country gentry
of these parts, who prefer it to the noise, smoke, and
corruption
of London. It is just large enough for all the real
purposes
of social enjoyment, containing, I should imagine,
between
fifteen and eighteen thousand persons. From these is
formed one of the most agreeable, polite, and intelligent circles
to be found any where; equal in polish, and superior in real
politeness to the London
Beau Monde
, which is, in fact, a
fantastic assemblage of coxcombs and coquettes, with now
and then a fashionable poet or chemist to give it a literary or
scientific air.
From Worcester I proceeded towards Hereford, it being my
intention to visit some of the picturesque scenery of the Wye,
and thence take the mighty Snowdoun by the hair of his head.
The road was one of the roughest I had yet travelled, but the
country on either side abounded in fruit trees and flowers.
The man who drove my vehicle assured me I might gather a
rose, without being transported to Botany Bay, that paradise
of English rogues. I ventured to pluck a beautiful one over
the fence, and would you believe it, brother, was neither shot
by a spring gun, caught in a man-trap, nor prosecuted
afterwards
for trespass! This I record as the first miracle which
has happened to me in this country. I confess, however, a
stout, square, roughfaced damsel did start out upon me, and
bawl out something, which luckily I could not understand;
for I do assure you, that notwithstanding the vulgar opinion
on our side of the water, the English is not the national tongue
of this country. In the various counties, particularly
Somerset
,
Yorkshire, Cumberland, and elsewhere, I give you my
honour, not one in a hundred can speak the English language.
Were not my servant a sort of booby, who speaks all the
languages
of this island, except the English, I should be quite at
a loss to understand or be understood. I am often reminded
by such little incidents as this of the rose, of the difference
between
this country and our liberal and plentiful land, in which
a country gentleman or common farmer would be disgraced
as a miser or a brute, who should refuse to a stranger or his
neighbours his flowers or his fruit. Of the latter, indeed, no
one scruples to pluck what he likes from the road side, without
ever asking. Soon I came to the foot of Malvern Hill, where
I halted at a neat inn at its foot, with the determined purpose
of going to the uttermost top, where, as I have read in all the
picturesque tours, was to be seen one of the finest prospects in
England.
In my opinion, brother, the very first excellence of this fine
view is, that the ascent to it is not fatiguing. Fatigue destroys
the very essence and being of delight. I have often, in my
own country, climbed a rugged precipice to see a fine prospect,
and when I got to the top, felt as if I could lie down and die,
I was so tired. But the ascent of Malvern Hill is all an easy
slope, covered with velvet grass. Were it more laborious,
however, it would pay well, for it is indeed a noble throne for
the very king of the picturesque. The evening was a little
hazy, and the atmosphere presented that soft sleepiness of hue,
on which the soul, at least mine, reposes with such measureless
luxury. The fields just beneath, were some of them in the sun,
some in the shade, and their different tints were like the first
and second of two well-tuned instruments, producing variety
and harmony. Farther off, landscape faded by imperceptible
gradations into less of the bright green, and more of the sky
blue. The white houses were sprinkled among villages and
lawns, and woody groves, whose foliage was all in soft fleeces.
Among these, through the vale of Evesham, I saw two little
rivers, like white ribands, waving and meandering along; and
in the distance the Welsh mountains, whose outlines could
hardly be distinguished from the blue sky. On inquiring the
names of these streams, I was made to comprehend by my
guide, that one of them, the smallest, was the Avon. The
very name of this river conjured up visions and recollections
of Shakspeare, to whom it is for ever consecrated, and mingled
what was alone wanting in my impressions, the charm of
moral
association, with all that is beautiful to the eye.
The next day I proceeded on towards Hereford, through an
exuberant hop country, rich also in every other production of
English husbandry, as well as in pastoral beauty and fine
houses, to a tolerably miserable town, the name of which I
think is Ledbury, for it is so equivocally written in my
memorandum
book, that I will not swear to it. The next day I
arrived
at a place noted in days of yore.
LETTER VI.
Dear Brother
,
London.
Hereford
looks dull and is dull. There is no deception in
the place; for, in approaching, it presents a heavy, flat
appearance
,
very different from Worcester. There is little to be
gleaned here, except old tales about Griffin the Welshman,
Algar the Englishman, Leofgar the Bishop, and William
Fitz-Osborne
,
with remains of English and Roman antiquities; all
which is to be found in every book of travels, and all which
you are as well acquainted with as myself.
The picturesque tourists come hither for the purpose of
viewing
the scenery and ancient remains of the river Wye, which
abounds in some of the finest landscapes to be seen in this
country
,
and they all make a point of repeating over the same
things. Among the public buildings here, the Cathedral is the
principal; and of all parts of a cathedral, the most interesting
to me are the old tombs to be found in most of them. Here is
to be seen a number of these, most of them erected in memory
of bishops and ecclesiastics. Among them, however, is one
representing a figure in close armour, with the hands raised in
prayer, the usual fashion of the more ancient tombs. The
figure had a wooden leg, whence I concluded he was some
great soldier, who had lost it in the wars; but it turned out
that the leg of the figure, and not that of the living knight, had
been accidentally broken off, and replaced by an artist of this
place. Observing a garter, the badge of the order of knights
of the garter, remaining upon the leg, the artist carved another
on the wooden one, exactly like it, so that this is, beyond
doubt, the best gartered knight in all England.
Hereford, although its name is quite familiar to our
American
ears, is but an insignificant place, containing not more
than seven thousand inhabitants. As an ancient frontier town
between England and Wales, it has, however, derived
historical
consequence, from having been overrun, plundered,
taken and retaken, by Welsh and English marauding princes
and border-barons. Its castle was once reputed of great
strength, but there is scarcely a vestige of it remaining, although
its adjacent walks along the river, being kept in good order,
form a most agreeable promenade. Hereford is one of the
most orthodox places in England; so much so, that when I
was there, the library association in that town actually talked
of making an
Auto de Fe
of Hume, Gibbon, and some other
writers, who have marvellously disturbed the fat dignitaries of
the church! I am not jesting, upon my word, and from this
and other indications, begin to have serious doubts, whether
the nineteenth century will not turn out in the end almost as
enlightened as the ninth.
The first objects which, in going out of town, attracted my
notice, were a dozen or two of beggars, who form a
considerable
feature of the picturesque in many of the English
landscapes
,
I assure you. Having distanced these, I proceeded
towards a noble old place, called
Holme Lacy
, belonging to
the Duke of Norfolk, for the purpose of reconnoitring a scene,
once a favourite resort of Pope. The situation is just fit for a
poet: quiet, soft, and secluded, in the midst of rural beauties.
It was once the property of the ancient family of Scudamore,
and the last viscount was an intimate friend of the poet, who
wrote a great deal in these shades. By the aid of that key
which unlocks the flinty hearts of every serving-man and
serving-maid in this kingdom, I was permitted to enter the
grounds, and ramble about almost at pleasure. I always feel
like a pilgrim visiting the shrine of a tutelary saint, in such
scenes, hallowed by such associationsthere is something so
blameless, so pure, so spiritual, in the fame of literary genius,
more especially poetical inspiration. The harp of the true
poet, when tuned to virtuous feeling, is like the harp of
the angels, accompanied by the song of the cherubim and
seraphim.
From hence, I pursued my devious course to Ross, and
crossed a steep hill, where the bold scenery of this region
began to make its appearance; some distance beyond, I passed
Harewood, an old seat. In the adjoining forest, is the scene
of the bloody tragedy of Elfrida, which I refrain from harping
upon, because we have been lately so stultified with history,
vamped up in romance and poetry, that no more is necessary
at present. I think, however, it would be no bad subject for the
Great Unknown. Next came we to the ruins of an old
castle, which I visited for no other reason, than because it was
once the property of Arthur Grey, renowned for his Irish wars,
but still more as the friend and benefactor of Spenser, who
accompanied
him to Ireland, as his secretary, and received from
him a grant of three thousand acres of land there. Spenser
has expressed his gratitude in a sonnet prefixed to the Fairy
Queen. Very little of this castle now remains. It has passed
from the Greys; but long after a stone or a vestige is to be
seen, the spot will be remembered and known, as connected
with the benefactor of this charming poet.
Leaving Wilton Castle on the right, I proceeded some
distance
,
three or four miles perhaps, without being particularly
struck with any features in the landscape. Some fishermen,
catching trout in little wicker-basket boats, attracted my notice,
however. When I came to Goodrich Castle, I was so struck
with its venerable aspect, covered half over with green moss,
that I determined once for all to invade this strong hold, and
give you one single description, which is to satisfy you for the
rest of your life. It is placed on a fine eminence, overlooking
the river, and is surrounded by a deep trench, some fifty feet
wide, as I should judge, cut out of the solid rock. The first
apartment, inside the gate, is a small room to the left, with an
ornamental window, and large stone chalice for holding the
holy water. From hence it has been sagely concluded, that
this was the chapel, of which I have not the least doubt. A
mass of ruins directly opposite, with an octageon column rising
out of them, indicates the ancient baronial hall, where they no
doubt held mortal carousals in the time of William Marshall,
Gilbert Talbot, and Harry Grey, successively possessors of
the castle. A large square tower remains, flaunting amidst
its decay, in moss and clambering vines, that almost make it
look gay. This is said to have been built by an Irish
Macbeth
,
a prisoner, who worked out his freedom, and that of his
son, by building this enormous keep. Inside of this are
mildewed
,
damp, and dreary walls, festooned with cobwebs, in
which I observed certain old spiders that came over with
William the Conqueror.
At the iron works, known by the name of Bishop's Wood,
the scenery waxed more and more beautiful. At Bicknor I
began to comprehend that there was some little reason for the
raptures of picturesque tourists, when speaking of the river
Wye. Rocks of the boldest magnitude, dressed out in
verdure
,
at every little projection or crevice, and hanging over
the water, give a character of grandeur to the scenery, while
the narrowness of the stream itself contributes to the sublime,
by giving a comparative altitude to the precipices. You tell
me you lately sailed up the Hudson River in the State of New
York, and observed, how the effect of one magnificent feature
of sublimity is diminished by the grandeur and immensity
of another. The Palisades, as they are called, are much
higher, and in every way more noble than the cliffs of the Wye;
but the wideness of the Hudson takes from them more than
half their effect, while the narrow channel of the Wye adds to
those I am speaking of in the same or a greater proportion.
This remark may be extended to almost all our scenery; the
very vastness of the constituents of our landscapes diminishes
the effect, not only of the different parts, but of the whole
combined
.
I was more particularly struck with the truth of this,
in viewing parts of Wales, where, owing to the proximity of
objects, the narrowness of glens, and the disposition of rocks,
the highest effect of sublimity was produced by objects
comparatively
diminutive.
Among the wonders of this region are Tintern Abbey,
Chepstowe
Castle, and Piercefield, the latter, one of the most
famous
show-places
in England. The abbey, to my mind,
is more remarkable for the exquisite beauty and finish of its
remaining parts, than for its situation, which is low, and does
not command a view of the river, except from above. It is
also surrounded by cottages, inhabited by workmen belonging
to neighbouring iron works, the din of whose hammers
disturbs
,
of an evening, the repose of the scene. But the inside
is indescribably fine, and cannot be done justice to by any
other medium than that of actual inspection. All I shall say
is, that as a mere ruin, it exceeds any thing I have seen since,
or ever saw before. Its history is not particularly interesting.
It was, according to the fashion of the age, endowed by
various benefactions in the elder times, from pious or
profligate
noblemen, who made their peace with heaven by
enriching
the church: and when the fashion changed, it was
suppressed
and deprived of its revenues, which were shared again
among the nobility, from whose munificence or fears they were
first obtained. It is now, if I recollect right, the property of
the Duke of Beaufort, who takes pains to prevent its further
decay.
The scenery in the neighbourhood of Chepstowe Castle is
equal to any on the Wye. A bridge, which, whether
handsome
or not, is always a good object in a landscape, crosses
near it, below which, on the opposite side, is a range of cliffs
rising directly out of the water, on whose sides the ivy and the
moss luxuriate, and over whose top the verdure nods. But I
must try and elevate myself to the proper degree of
picturesque
sublimity, and talk a little like a traveller on this
momentous
occasion. Advancing then towards the battlements
(I beg pardon, massive battlements), and sky-aspiring turrets
of this adamantine work of ages, I was struck dumb by the
view of a grand entrance, personifying the repulsive gloom,
feodal reserve, and frantic ferocity of the times, in which its
everlasting walls, which are now almost decayed, were reared.
The very knocker was warlike, being nothing more than a
cannon ball suspended by a vast chain, with which I ordered
my man to knock me here at the gate. He did so, and the
very walls, not only of the castle, but the river on which it
stands, trembled at the sound. The warder of the castle did
not make his appearance, nor did any whylome eftsoons peep
over the wall, with his cross-bow levelled, and demand our
business; but an exceedingly decrepid, wrinkled, and withal,
ugly old woman, did, after some unreasonable delay, open the
gate for our admittance, upon receiving a piece of that, which
melts stone walls and stony hearts in this country. The
professor
of English tongues looked rather shy; for he came from
a shire where the witches grew, and privately assured me, that
this old woman had all the marks about her.
Having already described one castle, I hold myself
exonerated
from describing any more; for, after all, no words
can give any idea, except a false one, of visible objects, for
which our senses have acquired no standard. I will only
mention, that here, in a large round tower of the ancient
citadel, Henry Martin, one of King Charles's judges, was
confined
thirty years, and here he died. There is probably no
set of men, whose memory has been treated with more
injustice
,
or who suffered more unrelenting persecution, than
these high-souled republicans. On the accession of Charles
the Second, they were hunted through England, Switzerland,
and all parts of Europenay, in our new world, where three
of them, Whalley, Dixwell, and Goffe, found a refuge, and
remained secreted for half the life of man. There is, perhaps,
no instance on record, of a secret intrusted to so many persons,
so dangerous to keep, and for the disclosure of which there
were so many temptations of danger and interest, being kept
so long and with such inflexible faith. Yet not one betrayed
them. They were in New Haven when the king's officers
were searching every house; nay, they were in the very house
they searched; yet such was the cool discretion and inflexible
faith of the people, that they escaped discovery. They lived
many years at Hadley, died there, and two of them were
buried in the Church-yard at New Haven, without its being
known to a single person who ever betrayed the secret, till it
was no longer of consequence to the safety of any human
being. The truth is, that the sentiment of the people of New
England sanctioned their condemnation of the king, and the
hearts of the colonists were with those bold, inflexible patriots,
who dared to punish a tyrant for making war against his
people
.
I have often, when at Yale, seen the graves of Dixwell
and Whalley, each designated by a stone, which humble as
it is, is calculated to retain their initials, and the time of their
decease, for ages. It is a hard, red, primitive stone, very thick,
and pointed at the top, in such a way as to form nearly the
two sides of a triangle. They lie close together, at the west
end of the old Presbyterian Church, where I hope they will
remain for ever undisturbed. They were the judges of kings;
and, although they escaped a violent death, their latter life
was one long series of exile, danger, seclusion, and oblivion.
Henry Martin was another of these, and was spared only for
perpetual imprisonment. Mr. Southey wrote some
exceedingly
blank verse on the occasion upon the walls of Chepstowe.
Piercefield owes its celebrated improvements to Valentine
Morris, of St. Vincents, in the West Indies, who wrecked
his fortune upon these rocks, and, as usual, was obliged to
sell what had cost him a vast sum, the fruits of which he never
enjoyed. A Mr. Smith purchased it, but got tired, as every
man does, of such expensive playthings, and sold it to
Colonel
Wood, who, covered with the spoils of India, also spent
vast sums upon these rocks for other people to enjoy, which
was very good of him. He got tired too, and sold it to a Mr.
Wells, who I believe still holds out, but will not probably do so
very long. There are, it seems, certain days in which only
the
show-place
is opened, and the day I applied for
admittance
happened not to be one of these.
My next excursion was to the city of Gloucester, situated
on the noble Severn, which, notwithstanding its dignity, is
here only navigable for smaller vessels. It is one of the
principal
cities of this part of England. I found an air of
business
here, very different from Hereford, and in fact it is a
place of considerable trade in pins, &c. by means of the river,
which is divided into two channels here. But the great
wonder
of the place, and that which most attracted my attention,
is the cathedral, which is one of the finest in this country.
Is lofty tower, and transparent pinnacles, ornamented with
beautiful fret-workthe majestic roof, and Gothic ornaments
of the choir, with the old Saxon pillars, and arches
supporting
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. g
the aislein short, the singular, yet not unharmonious
combination of different ages of architecture, all contributed
to engage my wonder. It was begun, as antiquaries have
decided
,
about the latter end of the tenth century, and not
completed
,
as it now stands, till more than four hundred years
afterwards. It therefore exhibits a curious, as well as
complete
exemplification of the variations and progress of
church-architecture
in England. It would fill a book to describe all
the various portions of this building, and even then, without
drawings, the impression would be altogether indistinct. There
are several very ancient tombs; among others, that of
Edward
the Second, which is very singular as well as striking.
His effigies exhibit him with cropped hair and beard, whence
we may conclude, this was the fashion of the time.
This, and many other vast edifices of a similar kind, form
one among the many boasts of the people of this country.
They certainly add both dignity and splendour to the cities
where they are situated; and the stranger, while
contemplating
them with awe and admiration, is apt to forget what an
expense of human labour was here applied to purposes of
church vanity; what vast sums of money were taken from
the poor people, to rear those ostentatious monuments of the
power and pride of churchmen. They were built in ages when
probably one-third of the wealth of the kingdom flowed into
the treasury of the church; when kings trembled at the frown
of a mitred minion of the pope; and the people were the
beasts of burden that laboured for them all. When we reflect
that the labours of millions, the wealth of kingdoms, were
thus invested in a dead capital, that yields nothing to the
state, and how many hundred thousand people are, at this
moment, suffering for the common necessaries of life, it is
difficult
to resist the impression, that it would add to the
happiness
of mankind, if the incalculable sums lavished on these
temples of human vanity, could be made to return to the
children
of those whose fathers paid the price. Nothing could
be lost on the score of religion, since these immense structures
are not in the least calculated for sermons, which cannot be
heard through their interminable aisles.
LETTER VII.
Dear Brother
,
London.
At
Gloucester I received some information which induced
me to alter my original design of penetrating into Wales from
that quarter, and determined me to proceed to Shrewsbury,
thence into North Wales. I was told I might in this way
have an opportunity of seeing one of the finest parts of the
country. As it was of little consequence to me which way I
entered into Wales, I accordingly proceeded towards
Shrewsbury
,
by the vale of Evesham, and another beautiful vale
extending to the foot of Coteswold Hills. Crossing another
hill, which separates the two valleys, I had a noble prospect
of the cities of Gloucester and Worcester, with almost
countless
villas and villages, in the midst of a rich assemblage of
natural beauty. At the foot of this hill is the ancient
Evesham
,
which lies on the river Avon, out of which I drank to
the memory of Shakespeare. But what was rather
extraordinary
,
I found very little inspiration therefrom.
Somewhere about two centuries ago, Coteswold Hill was
famed for certain annual sports, called Dover's Olympics, of
which Anthony Wood gives the following account:
These games were began and continued at a certain time
in the year, for forty years, by one Robert Dover, an
attorney
of Benton-on-the-Health, in Warwickshire, son of John
Dover of Norfolk; who being full of activity, and of a
generous
,
free, and public spirit, did, with leave of James the
First, select a place on Coteswold Hills, in Gloucestershire,
whereon these games should be acted. Endimion Porter, Esq.
a native of that county, and a servant of that King, a person
also of a most generous spirit, did, to encourage Dover, give
him some of the King's old clothes, with a hat, and feather,
and ruff, purposely to grace him, and consequently the
solemnity
.
Dover was constantly there in person, well mounted
and accoutred, and was the chief director and manager of
those games, frequented by the nobility and gentry, (some of
whom came sixty miles to see them)
even till the rascally
rebellion was begun by the Presbyterians; which gave a stop
to their proceedings, and spoiled all that was generous or
ingenious
elsewhere
. These games were celebrated in verses by
Ben Jonson, Drayton, Randolph, Marmyon, Heywood, and
many other wits of the day. Their poems, it is said, were
collected and published, with a picture of Dover on horseback,
superintending the games: the book, I believe, is not extant.
We now advanced into Warwickshire, famous for its
valiant
champion, Guy, and a thousand times more famous for
its Shakespeare, to whom the world is indebted for more
pleasant hours than all the bloody triumphs of a thousand
heroes
have ever bestowed upon mankind. What a charming
reflection it is, to think that genius has the power of giving
delight, when the organization of mind and matter which
produced
it is dissolved for ever! Soon we saw the spire of
Stratford church, and then the town itself, with its pretty little
river. Nobody would ever have heard either of the town or
the river, beyond their neighbourhood, were it not for the
name of Shakespeare, who has conferred a never-dying
fame upon both. Stratford is now a place of pilgrimage, like
the grave of Washington, at Mount Vernon. They are
worthy
to be mentioned together, for one is the birth-place of the
first of poets; the other, the tomb of the first of men. Our
countryman, Irving, has lately given so pleasing an account
of this place, and all the localities connected with the life of
the poet, that I will not attempt any thing of the kind, for it
would only be repeating what another has said much better.
From hence to Warwick, where every body knows there is
one of the finest castles, or
show-places
, in this country. It
is remarkable for some pretended reliques of the champion
Guy
, who, judging from his porridge pot, was a great hero,
at least in trencher feats. You have no doubt seen views of
this castle, as it is in all the picturesque works; and if you
have not, it is impossible to convey any likeness in words.
What amused me most was, the honest country people I
occasionally
conversed with, who repeated, with an air of most
credulous gravity, all the enormous tales recorded of this
renowned
trencher-man, Sir Guy, whose legendary feats in
valorous
fight, and valorous eating, are all authenticated by a
statue, at
Guy's Cliff
, in the neighbourhood, of most gigantic
proportions.
From Warwick I passed the castle of Kenilworth, which
has lately been dug out of its ruins by the indefatigable pen of
the Great Unknown. It is a fine ruin, overgrown with ivy:
the comparatively modern additions of the Earl of Leicester
are gone to decay, while the more ancient still subsist in
tolerable
preservation. Rout, and revel, and beer-drinking,
bearbaiting
,
and other royal sports, are here succeeded by silence,
decay, and desolation. These castles formed the links of that
vast feudal chain which bound the people of the middle ages.
They are fast disappearing from the land, and let them go:
they swallowed up the cottages, and held the cottagers in
bondage.
Passing some fine seats I now came in sight of Coventry,
famous for Peeping Tom and ribbon weaving. It is an old
city; and all the old cities I have ever seen, except Oxford,
that have not been burned down two or three times at
least, are, to my mind, very ugly. The streets of Coventry
are narrow, inconvenient, and dirty; the houses gloomy, and
the people bear the indelible marks of a manufacturing town.
Soon after leaving this place, which is regularly anathematized
by all picturesque tourists, the country became flat, and
apparently
volcanic; for all around I could see the columns of
black, malignant, manufacturing smoke, curling to the skies,
or flattening and spreading over the landscape.
Approaching Birmingham, I breathed the very essence of
coal-smoke, which lowered over the pretty, smart, new
country-boxes
of the manufacturers. I had passed through this
town before, on my way to London, but as I was in haste to
deliver my , made no stay here. On this occasion,
however, I spent several days in viewing the manufactories,
and making inquiries as to the effects of the system upon the
morals, manners, and health of the people engaged in them.
The general result of all my experience, observation, and
inquiry
I shall perhaps give you in a letter particularly devoted
to the subject, which is just now of peculiar interest in our
country. I found every thing at a stand here; the
manufacturers
dispirited; the workmen ragged, starving, and
disaffected
;
the whole town complaining. Nothing, in fact, can
present a more miserable spectacle, than a place arrested in a
course of almost unparalleled prosperity, by those
unaccountable
mutations which turn the tide of commerce into new
channels
,
and, while they throw thousands out of employment and
bread, produce premature decay, and modern ruins. The most
common appearance here, is that of beggary; the rarest, a
clean face and hands.
Skirting the borders of Worcestershire, Staffordshire, and
Shropshire, the country was beautiful, and some of the views
highly picturesque as well as extensive. In many parts of
Staffordshire especially, the appearance of innumerable
furnaces
gave the country at night a most singular aspect. It
seemed that Mr. Hutton's subterranean fire was bursting forth
in every direction, and that the whole interior of the earth was
teeming with combustible matter. I had a view of the
Leasowes
and Hagley, two beautiful spots; the one connected
with the genius, taste, and prodigality of Shenstone; the other,
with the name of Lyttelton. The latter place has been fruitful
in distinguished characters. Their beauties are familiar to the
imagination of most general readers in our country, and so I
pass them by. I visited Colebrooke Dale, which is in the way
to Shrewsbury, and where Vulcan and the Cyclops resort.
Every thing is iron here; there is an iron bridge; the seats are
iron; and the men who sit on them are either iron or steel, I
could not tell which. The eternal clink of hammers, the
roaring
of the forges, and the columns of thick black smoke,
render
this place particularly detestable to ears and eyes of
common
sensibility. If ever they catch me there again, I'll give
them full leave, as Shakspeare says, to hammer me into a
twigger bottle.
From Colebrooke Dale, winding along the Noble Severn,
which may be about as wide as our Thames at Norwich, in
Connecticut, I was highly pleased with the pretty scenery of
the little basin through which the river passes. In getting to
the city, however, it was necessary to mount an eminence, from
whence I had a clear view of the mountains of North Wales.
On the other hand, was a fine hill, called the Wrekin, rising
pretty abruptly out of a great plain and richly clothed with
verdure. I afterwards climbed to the top, in an excursion from
Shrewsbury, and was gratified with a view that paid me for
the labour, which is more than I can say of many others. I
arrived at that city about five in the afternoon, crossing a second
time by a grand bridge over the Severn, which almost flows
round the whole hill on which Shrewsbury is built.
I had two particular objects in view, which induced me to
spend three or four days at Shrewsbury: one was to see the
prison, which is conducted and governed according to the
system proposed by Mr. Howard, and combines with it a
house of correction; the other was, to inspect the House of
Industry, which is considered one of the most luxurious
receptacles
of idleness and beggary in this country. Having
made the necessary arrangements, I accordingly first visited
the prison. The area within the walls contains about two
acres of ground; you enter by the porter's lodge, over the
gate of which is a bust of Mr. Howard, that benevolent man
and inflexible father! The ground floor on the left is occupied
by the turnkey's rooms, above which are his bed-chambers;
that on the right is occupied by the lazaretto, where is a hot
and cold bath, an oven to fumigate clothes, which are taken
from the prisoners, and a prison uniform put on them. Other
rooms up stairs are appropriated to the performance of the last
offices for criminals by the clergy, previously to execution
on the flat roof above. The debtors, male and female,
female
felons, capital male felons, petty male felons, women of
ill fame, and vagrants, male and female disorderly servants,
and apprentices, male vagrants and deserters, are each
accommodated
with a spacious court, day rooms, and sleeping rooms,
so that it is quite a luxury to be here. In addition to these,
there are two courts for male and female refractory prisoners,
together with a detached infirmary, with separate courts,
day-rooms
,
and sleeping-rooms: in short, my dear brother, beyond
all doubt, a large proportion of the prisoners here are better
lodged, better fed, and better clothed, than they were at home.
In fact, nine out of ten, of the people of England, do not
spend as much as it costs to maintain a pauper here.
All this is pretty enough in theory, and looks very like
humanity
;
but I dare only shake my head at it, and say nothing.
If people will divert the laws from their original intention, and
make that, in effect, a reward, which was intended, and ought
to be, a punishment; if they will build palaces for felons and
paupers to revel in at the expense of honest industry, why
nothing is to be said against humanity, which, under pretence
of tenderness to the worthless and unprincipled, pardons the
wretch who is only liberated to commit new crimes, or feeds
and lodges him in infinite comfort at the expense of the society
he has offended. Experience, not argument, must cure these
indiscreet gambols of philanthropists. It will not be long
before they discover, that they are only heaping coals of fire
upon the heads of thousands, in the remote hope of reclaiming
one, and offering premiums to vice and immorality. If Mrs.
Fry will bribe women of ill fame to reformation, by
supporting
them comfortably, while thousands of wives and mothers,
who never wallowed in scenes of corruption, but have worked
their fingers to the bone, to keep themselves and their children
from want, are pining in hopeless and obscure wretchedness;
let her do it, I say again. Instead of offering premiums to
virtue, she is proposing temptations to vice, since it seems
women must first become infamous in society, in order to
entitle themselves to her notice and bounty. No wonder, my
dear brother, that vice should thrive, poverty multiply, and
prodigality and idleness increase here, under this new system
of patronage. But the voice of warning is the voice of one
crying in the wilderness; or, if it be heard, it is only heard for
the purpose of bringing the charge of inhumanity against him
who uttered the warning. It is not difficult to predict the
result of all these injudicious measures.
From the prison I was carried to what I supposed to be a
palace, beautifully situated on a lofty bank, and overlooking
one of the finest prospects imaginable. Concluding there was
some mistake, I begged to be conducted to the poor house.
My guide, with an air of great self-complacency, assured me
this was the poor house, and that it cost, first and last, above
twenty thousand pounds sterling. It is a superb building,
affording such luxurious lodgings and excellent
accommodations
,
that I was not surprised people preferred living there
in idleness and luxury, to working hard at home, and faring
indifferently. In looking over the books, and seeing the vast
quantities of provisions, the number of fat beeves slaughtered
for the entertainment of these sumptuous beggars, I no longer
wondered that beggary was grown so respectable a trade. It
is quite natural that the people of England should be degraded
into paupers, when they are thus actually seduced into idleness,
by the tempting prospect of good living and good lodging,
instead of being deterred by the certainty of want, and all its
train of ills. Is this humanity, is this charity? thought I. Is
it thus, that the happiness of human beings is brought about,
by tempting them from labour and economy by the prospect of
indulgence and plenty, at the expense of others? Is it thus
that children are prepared to encounter the labours to which
their birth renders them liable, by being pampered in this
splendid eating-house? I put some of these questions to those
about me, and never got a civil word afterwards. These people
share in the good things, and grow rich on charities. It is a fine
thing, brother, to manage the concerns of the poor in this
country
.
I wish some one would have the honest hardihood to
speak of these institutions as they deserve; risk the reputation
of a philanthropist in the attempt to restrain the progress of
idleness and beggary, and rid the industrious of the task, not
only of supplying their own wants, but of pampering those of
others. He might be a martyr to his honesty, but I am
mistaken
if posterity would not do him justice.
LETTER VIII.
Dear Brother
,
London.
By
the advice of mine host of the Talbot, who prided
himself
on serving the noble Earl of Shrewsbury, I left my
horses here, and hired a couple of Welsh ponies, which, he
assured me, would carry me much more safely over the
mountains
and through the defiles of Wales. He likewise hinted,
that a Welsh pony had a sort of instinctive feeling of the
picturesque
,
and never failed to stop where there was a fine view,
so that there would be no occasion to carry a guide-book with
me. I took his advice, and accordingly bestrided a pony that
turned out to be broken-winded. This, however, proved in the
end to be a great advantage, for whenever I dismounted to
scramble up a precipice, or view a cascade in some glen,
unapproachable
on horseback, I was always sure of finding him
exactly in the same place on my return, he being never guilty
of any voluntary locomotion whatever.
Some of the picturesque hunters make their tours on foot,
but I had two invincible objections to this mode. I hate
walking
,
and should have been as long getting through Wales, as a
Welsh pedigree. In the next place, I was aware, from
experience
,
that a man on foot never gets a civil answer or civil
treatment at a decent British inn. The first salute will be from
the chambermaid, who, on being questioned about a bed, will
go near to snap your head off. This is particularly the case
about Shrewsbury, where the women, having a little of the
hot Welsh blood in them, are apt to be somewhat
shrewish
,
whence, possibly, may be derived the name of this ancient
city. On one occasion, in Herefordshire, I was very much
amused with a respectable, though plain looking man, who
came up on foot to an inn, where I had stopt to dine, and
ordered dinner. Nobody invited him into the house, and he
was permitted to sit on the piazza, until I was wrought upon
to ask him into the room I occupied. Contrary to my
expectation
,
for I concluded this piece of civility would make him
suspect me of a design to pick his pocket, it is so uncommon
in this country, he accepted the invitation very frankly, and I
found him exceedingly intelligent and well-bred. To tell you
the truth, I began to suspect
him
, it being so unnatural for an
Englishman to be entertaining without the hope of advantage.
However, no dinner came, or was likely to come, when,
after
a delay of an hour or two, an elegant equipage drove up
to the door, preceded by an outrider, who enquired if a
gentleman
,
whom he described, had stopped there. An
explanation
ensued, and I found that the carriage having received
some little damage, the owner, the plain gentleman I spoke of,
had taken it into his head to walk on to this hospitable inn.
Never were there such civilities, such bows, such
congees
,
and such enquiries, about what the gentleman would choose
for dinner, and such apologies for the delay, which was all
put upon the cook. The gentleman, who seemed somewhat
of a sly humourist, upon this insisted upon the cook's head
being well singed, and made into a stew for his dinner. This
brought up the cook, who, in spite of the landlord's
menacing
looks, told, what was no doubt the truth, that no dinner
had been ordered. The incognito then, pulling out his watch,
observed that it was now too late to cook a dinner, and he
would go on to the next inn to sup and sleep. The landlord
was in despair, and the chambermaid almost bit off the end
of her thumb, on the occasion. Previously to his departure,
we exchanged addresses, and the stranger took my promise
to visit him, should I ever pass his mansion, which was in a
distant part of the country.
Having furnished myself with a map and portfolio, I set
forth from Shrewsbury one bright morning, for the land of
promise, which I had come so far to visit. Previously to this,
I had brightened up my rusty genealogy, and traced my
descent pretty clearly from Adam, which is considered a
tolerable pedigree in Wales, though nothing to make a boast
of. Blood, brother, blood is every thing here. In the words
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. h
of an old writer, which I quote because I am fairly tired of
every new one,You shall ever find amongst a hundred
Frenchmen forty hot shots; amongst a hundred Spaniards
threescore braggarts; amongst a hundred Dutchmen fourscore
drunkards:amongst a hundred Englishmen fourscore and
ten madmen; and amongst a hundred Welshmen fourscore and
nineteen gentlemen! Some of the family trees there took
root long before the flood. I must not omit to apprise you,
that I was still accompanied by the Professor of languages,
whose services as an interpreter I found necessary in crossing
through some of the shires, where they speak a tongue not to
be found in the German professor's book, that enumerates six
or seven thousand. To one, who in America has been
accustomed
to hear the commonest people speak with the fluency
and almost the correctness of a gentleman, it is intolerable to
listen to the
haw hawing
and
yaw yawing
of these terribly
thick-headed fellows, who, with all their really good qualities,
and these are many, are most stupidly deficient in ideas, and
possess no language to express the few they have. I long to
get among the sprightly, saucy Americans, whose tongues
run like mill-tails, and whose brains are the inexhaustible
reservoirs
that keep the mill-clappers going.
Passing Oswestry, a neat town, I came to a small brook,
called the
river
Carriac, rolling through a deep glen, and
there first entered Denbighshire, the frontier county in this part
of North Wales. The first object that attracted my attention,
was  castle, belonging to one of the ,
who here, as in our country, are people of figure. From the
ascent leading to this castle, there is one of the first fine views,
comprehending seventeen counties, and bounded by the Wrekin,
Clay Hills, and various other picturesque mountains. A
servant
came out to us in the park, but rather with a view to
watch our motions, I believe, than to show the grounds, for
he stuck right close to our heels, without pointing out any
thing to notice. Being thirsty, I asked for a drink of water,
but, according to the information of our spy, there was not a
drop in or about this grand place.
From the castle we gained the road, which divides towards
Chester on the one hand, and Llangollan on the other. The
name of the latter being familiar to me, as abounding in rural
beauties, I turned in that direction, and after riding about
seven miles, came to the village of Llangollan, which is worth
going seven miles to avoid. It is, however, useful to the lovers
of the picturesque, as forming a perfect contrast with the
scenery in the vicinity, which is embellished by the river Dee,
and various other beautiful objects. And here, my dear
brother
,
before I proceed another step, I must apprise you, that
you are not to expect me to mention the name of every place
I attempt to sketch for your amusement. The Welsh names,
when spoken, are musical enough; but woe to the man,
unless
he be a descendant of Caractacus, who attempts to
pronounce
them as they are written! The easiest of them are
such as Craig, Eglwyseg, Llechweddgarth, and St. Collen ap
Gwynnawg ap Clydawg ap Cowdra ap Caradoy Freichfas ap
Lleyr Merim ap Einion Yrth ap Cunedda Wledig! the name
of one single Welsh saint, the patron of a church in this
neighbourhood.
On arriving at Llangollan, I trusted to instinct for the
choice of an inn, and, as ill fate would have it, came to the
sign of the Open Hand, which looked like an indication of
liberality. My experience, however, demonstrated to me
afterwards
,
that this Hand was open to receive, not to bestow;
and that it was a very grasping hand. The first object that
attracts the eye of a stranger at Llangollan, is
Dinas Bran
,
consisting of a few remains of what appears once to have been
an extensive castle. Having rested myself a little, I sallied
forth, book in hand, to pay it a visit. Tradition records, that
as long ago as the middle of the thirteenth century, which,
however, is but as yesterday in Wales, this castle afforded a
refuge to Gryffdd ap Madoc, Mr. Southey's hero, who
discovered
America, and settled a Welsh colony somewhere.
Here, too, more than a century after, lived a beautiful maid
of the House of Tudor, who was beloved by an illustrious
bard, whose name occurs in Gray's fine ode, as High born
Hoel. Myfanway Vechan, for that was her name, it seems
was content to receive the homage of the bard, and often
listened to his harp and song, which was heard at all times of
the night in this charming valley. Sometimes he tuned his
harp to the warlike exploits of the Tudors and the Hoels, in
old times compeers in battle, and, in his prophetic inspiration,
predicted that the former would one day give kings to the isle.
At others he sung the joys and the pains of love: he painted
the hopes of the lover as he won the smile of his mistress, his
despair at her frown or indifference; the elysium of success,
and the agony of disappointment. The lady listened, but she
did not love; at least, she only loved his music and his
poetry
:
her hand was destined for princes. She married a Tudor,
and her descendants fulfilled the prophecy of the bard. Hoel
wandered away with his harp, through the wildest and most
unfrequented parts of the country, sometimes frenzied and
sometimes forlorn; in his lucid hours singing the falsehood of
his mistress, and his own unalterable love. One of these
songs is still extant, and, it is said, is exquisitely affecting. In
one of the paroxysms of his frenzy, he foretold the
subjugation
of his country; and having finished, he broke his harp in
the sight of some astonished peasants, and precipitated himself
from a high rock into a torrent that carried him no one knew
whither.
It is probable this story, which I heard, not at Llangollan,
but in one of the most sequestered parts of the country I
afterwards visited, suggested to Gray the fine picture of his
bard plunging into Conway's foaming flood. There are
plenty of these little historical romances connected with the
old ruins in different parts of Wales, and it is from such that
the latter derive a great portion of their interest. The hill, on
which these ruins lie, is estimated at 1800 feet high, and
commands
a prospect finer than that from the higher mountains,
though, of course, not so extensive. In fact, every one that
has had experience in these matters knows that views, bounded
only by the powers of human vision, are neither so beautiful
nor so gratifying as those which are circumscribed by
picturesque
outlines. I have often had finer views from the base of
a mountain than its extreme summit, where every thing was
confused and indistinct.
The whole of this vale and adjacent country is full of fine
rural beauties, and abounds with interesting local associations.
I wandered from the centre of the village, almost every day, for
four or five days, in different directions, and every where found
objects, and combinations of objects, that attracted my attention.
Among others, I one day stumbled by chance upon the site of
Owen Glendower's palace, which is marked by a clump of old
trees growing on an eminence Glendower, like almost every
man of great abilities in those days, at least among the Welsh,
was reputed by the English a magician: if Glendower escaped
their snares, or gave them a defeat, they saved their credit by
ascribing both one and the other to the aid of necromancy.
The ignorant, in an age of ignorance, are prone to believe
this, for they have in their own minds and resources nothing
that can enable them to comprehend the powers of a great
genius. Glendower, after baffling the arts of the English, and
fighting with his neighbour, Grey of Ruthyn, about
boundaries
and what not, for many years, finding himself
overmatched
,
retired into private life, and died quietly in his bed,
I believe. He left three daughters, one of whom married an
ancestor of that Scudamore, whose descendant I mentioned as
the friend of Pope. His posterity is numerous still, and
connected
,
in various ways, with many of the first families in
Great Britain. But he is best known, and will for ever
remain
best known, as associated with the Henry Percy and the
Douglas, in the imperishable works of Shakespeare. It is
from that circumstance alone, that I have been induced to
sketch this little biography. The name of Owen Glendower
would never have been familiar to every body in our country,
had it not been mentioned by the bard, who has given many
passports to immortality.
Having spent several days at Llangollan, roaming and
rambling about with infinite satisfaction, I returned by the
way of Chirck Castle, on the road to which, I should have
mentioned the famous Offa's Dyke, said to be the ancient
boundary between England and Wales. It might be the
boundary
between two wheat fields, or vineyards, for it is
sufficiently
insignificant. From hence I proceeded towards the
river Dee; crossed it by a bridge in a deep vale or ravine,
and reconnoitred Wynnestay, which is the noble seat of Sir
Watkyns Williams Wynn, and, as the talk goes, is soon to be
consecrated by the presence of no less a visitor than King
George. This will be matter for the Wynns to talk about as
long as there is half a one left. I then turned towards
Wrexham
,
which has nothing but a tower steeple to recommend it.
From thence to Gressford; and after stopping to view a fine
prospect, through Shropshire and Cheshire, crossed the Dee to
the ancient and certainly very curious city of Chester, which
I visited previously to continuing my picturesque tour, for the
purpose of .
Chester is one of the most respectable old cities I have ever
seen: there is an air of originality about it too, that makes it
quite an object of interest. It does not appear to have much
business; yet, from being the residence of many opulent
families
,
not only natives, but from Ireland and the neighbouring
Wales, it has not that intolerable air of decay and total
stagnation
,
which I have generally observed in those ancient dozing
places. The people seemed actually inclined to politeness,
which was quite new to me; and there were various genteel
amusements for evenings, that are always a great relief to a
stranger. Nobody ever carries an umbrella here, as the
covered
galleries that extend all along the streets on either side,
like piazzas, jutting out from the second story, afford a safe
walk for foot passengers. Nevertheless, I was assured that a
cunning fellow, a real John Bull, observing there was no
umbrella-maker
in all the city, thought to make a fortune by
commencing the business. He succeeded wonderfully; for,
though he failed in business, he became entitled to the
privileges
of pauperism, which are now beginning to be considered
by the common people equivalent to a freehold. The walk on
the rampart of Chester, is a most singular and delightful
promenade
.
In short, brother, there is more novelty in old
Chester
,
than in many of the new towns in England. There is a
cathedral, but old, and rather uninteresting. A castle too,
but it is gone to decay. Let it gothey are only memorials of
feudal wars and feudal slavery; and wherever they abound,
one may be sure there is oppression on the one hand, and
suffering
on the other. They were among the strongest links in
the chain of feudal slavery, and stood as monuments of the
abject situation of the people, whose labour was employed at
the will of the liege-lord, in erecting these strong holds, by the
possession of which, he was the better enabled to keep them
in subjection.
LETTER IX.
Dear Brother
,
London.
From
Chester I again penetrated into Wales, passing along
the borders of Flintshire, a small county, apparently pretty
much divided among marshes and mountains. The old capital
lies buried in a marsh along the river Dee, and Holywell is
now the principal mart of this part of the country. The
neighbourhood
contains a great many manufactories, and is, of
course, distressed and disaffected. Holywell, like all the
manufacturing
towns I have seen, is tinged with black smoke, and
presents a disagreeable aspect. Below the town is a glen,
where the manufactories are placed, on a fine stream flowing
from St. Winifred's well, which, I believe, has lost all its
medicinal
virtues, ever since the waters were prostituted to these
mechanical purposes. The mills and manufactories are
principally
for brass and copper; and it is hardly possible for me to
describe the wretched, cadaverous, and unwholesome looks
of the workmen in these metals. One might almost be tempted
to conclude that the conveniences of life were too dearly
purchased
at the expense of such unhealthy employments. I felt
grateful to Providence, that our countrymen were, as yet,
permitted
to exchange the fruits of labours that result in health,
manliness, and virtuous independence, for the products of
occupations so fatal to all these.
The famous well of St. Winifred, from whence is derived the
name of Holywell, is the finest gush of water from one single
source that I have ever seen. It springs at one bound from
the foot of a fine rock, and in a single volume, that, at a short
distance below, without any accession that I observed, turned
all the mills employed in the manufactories. The well is
covered
with a little venerable Gothic building, said to be an
offering
of gratitude from Margaret, mother of Henry the Seventh,
for her recovery through the virtues of this well. The inside
of the little canopy is exquisitely carved. Many votive
offerings
of crutches, &c. are left here by invalids of former times,
in memory of their recovery to the use of their limbs, some of
whose stories are perfectly miraculous. But the miracle of all
miracles is the history of the saint herself. Winifred was a
devout
and beautiful damsel, daughter of
one
Thearth, as we say
of obscure persons, and niece to St. Benno, another rather
obscure
person. Having obtained leave to found a church upon
the possessions of her father, the saint took her under his
tuition
,
and instructed her in religion. Crodorus, son to a very
obscure king, one also who reigned in this neighbourhood,
being smitten with her beauty, according to the customs of the
age, attempted to violate her person. She ran towards the
church for sanctuary, but was overtaken at the brow of the
hill by this gallant British prince, who, enraged at his
disappointment
,
cut off her head, which rolled down the hill to the
place where the congregation were kneeling at their devotions.
From the spot where it stopped, immediately gushed forth a
clear and beautiful fountain; and thereupon St. Benno, taking
up the head, and joining it to the body, to the surprise of all,
the virgin became re-animated, nothing remaining to mark the
separation but a white ring round the neck. Crodorus dropped
down upon the spot where he committed the outrage; but,
whether he was swallowed up by the earth, or carried away
by the devil, the legend rather doubts. It is affirmed that the
sides of the orifice, whence the waters issued, became all at
once fringed with a green and sweet-scented moss, and the
stones at the bottom tinctured with the blood of the virgin.
She outlived the cutting off her head about fifteen years, and,
having taken the veil, died abbess of Gwytherin, in this
county.
The well became famous for its sweet-scented moss, the
bloody tint of the rocks, and the miraculous virtues of its waters.
The sick and the pious resorted to it from all parts of the
neighbourhood; and the votive crutches and barrows announce
the recovery of some at least, whether by faith, or the
workings
of the waters, cannot be known. Of late years,
however
,
it has not been much frequented. Industry and
employment
,
most potent enemies to superstitious fancies, have called
the attention of the people from legends and saints, while the
clink of hammers, the turning of wheels, and the roaring of
bellows, have all combined to banish the silent musings of
wayward imagination. Either the water, the human mind,
or the human constitution, has altered, for no cures are now
worked by the miraculous well of St. Winifred. The moss
and the blood-tinged stones, it is true, remain, but they have
ceased to excite wonder, ever since the prying curiosity of
botanists
discovered that the former was nothing more than the
mere vulgar
jungermanius asplenoides
, and the latter the
byssus jolitferus
, a little red fibrous plant, which is common
at the bottom of our pure mountain brooks. Nevertheless, it
is a fine curiosity, inasmuch as it gushes forth upwards of
eighty hogsheads of water a minute, which never freezes, nor
ever varies in quantity, under any change of seasons. After
all, my dear brother, what business have we to laugh at the
credulity of our ancestors, or pride ourselves upon our
disenchantment
from the wonders of St. Winifred's well, while half
the world is buying quack medicines, and trusting to quack
doctors
?
I am somewhat apprehensive, that the boasted
improvement
,
in the present age, consists pretty much in
banishing
old to make way for new absurdities. While the good
folks of England continue their faith in the magical operation
of the sinking fund, the blessings of a national debt, or Mr.
Owen's plan of placing the people out at board at the expense
of the nation; and while our worthy countrymen follow in
the footsteps of this faith, what business, I say again, have we
to laugh at the magical wonders of St. Winifred's well? If
Dr. Solomon could build a palace upon the credulity of
mankind
,
in the nineteenth century, why should we laugh at the
credulity which built only a little dome to the virtues of St.
Winifred's well?
I shall say nothing about the ruins of Basingworth Abbey,
which I passed in my way to the famous vale of Clwydd,
which you may pronounce if you can. This vale extends
almost all the way to Llangollan, which, on the whole, I think
it excels in beauty. It is generally about three to four miles
wide, and nearly thirty in length. Throughout almost the
whole length of the vale, the two little rivers Clwydd and
Elwy meander in curving parallels, sometimes appearing as if
they would unite their waters, then capriciously separating
wide apart, as if they had brawled themselves into a quarrel.
Thus they coquette with each other through the vale,
exhibiting
a thousand little meandering curves, and adding every
beauty that can be added, to rich cultivated fields, pleasant
villages, beautiful country-seats, and ruins associated with
history, tradition, and fiction. The contrast of sterile hills
and bald mountains on either side, with this scene of rural
wealth, rural health, and rural innocence, is peculiarly striking.
On a distant eminence, as I passed along, I observed the town
of Ruthyn, once the seat of Grey of Ruthyn, the wily
neighbour
and antagonist of the dd magician Glendower, as
Shakspeare calls him. It yet gives the title of Lord Grey of
Ruthyn. The present representative, a lady, claims the right
of bearing the king's spurs at the coronation! On another
high mount I saw the castle, or rather the remains of the castle
of Denbigh, a most striking object, whose ruined gateway
seemed trembling on the verge of the steep. Shall I tell you,
my dear brother, that most of these old castles, which form
such prominent features in the picturesque tours, are, in reality,
most insignificant objects. Now and then indeed I met with
one, as Conway Castle, for instance, which was really a noble
ruin, but by far the greater portion of them are, in every
respect
,
insignificant.
Leaving the vale of Clwydd, of whose sweet rural beauties
I shall ever retain a pleasing recollection, I passed over a hilly
rough ridge around the base of Penmanmoss, in doing which,
I suddenly came upon a fine view of Conway Castle and
town, finely backed by a range of mountains in the distance.
The position of this castle, and what remains of it, is really
fine, and in some measure justifies the eulogies passed upon its
picturesque beauties: it is as old as the thirteenth century, and
was the work of Edward the First, who put rings in the
Welshmen's noses by building strong castles. One of the Earls
of Conway transported the timber, lead, and iron, to Ireland,
in the way of speculation, I believe; since then it has gone to
decay. It is usually rented at six shillings and eightpence paid
to the king, and a dish of fish to the Marquis of Hertford.
The town itself is a miserable place, abounding in beggars.
Indeed, all the pleasure to be derived from a tour in these fine
scenes, is in a great measure saddened by the wretched state of
the people, and the fast increasing habit of begging. The pride
of the Englishman, as well as of the Welshman, is gradually
stooping to this degradation; nor is it any longer a disgrace to
beg. In every direction I was repelled from these recesses,
which ought to be, and once were, the strong holds of virtuous
independence, by the sight of human beings, whose spirits
were bound down by poverty, and who, instead of hiding their
wants, made them a pretence for asking charity of a stranger.
At Conway is the worst ferry in the United Kingdom. I
waited for the ferryman till I was quite tired, and finally
altering
my original intention, instead of crossing the river,
continued
on the side where I was for several miles. It turned
out well, for I thus, by mere chance, fell into the track of some
of the finest views I had yet seen.
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. i
The road wound along the terrace on the bank of the river,
which gradually grew narrower, merely leaving room for strips
of verdant meadows between its banks and the hills, which
were fringed with wood at their base. On the other side
appeared
a ridge of high mountains, broken with masses of rocks,
and sometimes half hid by the clouds flitting along its sides;
here and there brooks, rushing down the sides, or precipitating
in fine little cascades, gave life and animation to this solitary
scene. At the extremity of this vale is the town of Llanrwst,
which must be pronounced with a twist of the mouth: here I
halted with a design of getting rest and refreshment. Llanrwst
is hardly worth mentioning as a town; but its situation is truly
delightful, although here also the curse of inequality has
showered its miseries. The principal proprietor of this part
of Wales is Lord Gwydir, who is to figure in the coronation
as chamberlain, in right of his wife, and will come in for a
few towels, if not a wash-hand basin. He has the character
of an easy landlord, and rolls in wealth, while his tenants are,
a great many of them, wallowing in poverty. You may think
how they live in these stagnant times, when some of them pay
as high as four guineas an acre, yearly rent, for meadow land.
No wonder that even in this sequestered nook they think and
talk of our New World, and like the Israelites in the desert,
look with longing eyes to the land of freedom, the land of
individual
independence, the land flowing with milk and honey.
I cannot express the proud and secret transports of my heart,
at hearing, as I have done in every part of England, in the
crowded city, the cultivated fields, and sequestered mountains,
poor people talking about our country, as a home to which
they looked with longing eyes; as a refuge, which if they
could only once gain, they would no longer fear the ills of
poverty, or the curse of dependance. In vain is it, that hired
or disappointed travellers have indulged in every species of
wanton and exaggerated misrepresentation; in vain have they
pictured our country, its character and its institutions, in the
most uninviting colours; in vain have our newspapers
conjured
up yellow fevers every summer; in vain has the
government
tried to allure them to Canada, to the Cape of Good
Hope, to Botany Bay. All that has been said of these;
all that has been said of the distresses under which our
country is labouring; all that truth, falsehood, and
declamation
have uttered, has not diminished the poor man's
confidence
in the advantages held out to the English emigrant.
They know, that for the price of one year's rent of an acre
of English land, they could purchase to themselves the right
and property for ever, in half-a-dozen acres, quite as good;
they know they will hold this land free from poor-rates, tithes,
and taxation, except a mere trifle of the last; and above all,
they know, that the very miseries of which our mean, unmanly,
and unprincipled speculators so loudly complain, would be
happiness to them; vast numbers would emigrate to America
had the lower and labouring classes only the means of getting
there: as it is, they talk of it as an event familiar to their wishes
and imaginations, and feel that sort of anxiety to get thither,
which those, who are born and brought up in a happy country,
feel to return to it, after a long absence, like mine.
I must not forget to mention, that mine host at Llanrwst was
one of the most pompously indifferent, inattentive fellows in
the world. He never knew any thing about his house, or what
was in it, not he; but he was somewhat excusable, being
descended
in a direct line from Llewellyn ap something, Prince
of Wales; in imitation of whom, he kept open house to all
comers, and made them pay double.
LETTER X.
Dear Brother
,
London.
From
Llanrwst I made an excursion up the vale of
Conway
,
to where the mountains approach so near each other,
that there is just room for the river to pass. All the rest of
the valley was completely shut in by the curving hills. This
is the neighbourhood of Snowdon, which is never spoken of
except in the extreme of high-wrought superlative. Its
astonishing
height, 3,600 feetits abrupt sides and fantastic
headsits horrible beauties,and the incredible velocity
of its torrents, which, like most other mountain streams, are
apt to run pretty fast down hill, and to tumble when they come
to a perpendicularall these, brother, are described by the
picturesque travellers in such terms, that you would suppose
every cascade a Niagara, and every hill a Mont Blanc or a
Peak of Teneriffe. The scenery, however, in spite of all their
exaggerations, which of course must necessarily diminish the
effect of the reality, is very striking. The misty mountain
tops, the rugged and confused masses of rocks, the occasional
torrents, and the rushing of the river through the pass, together
with those rugged and savage features, which almost every
where accompany the passage of rivers through mountains, all
unite to form a scene of glorious variety.
Following a wild track, I came to the ruins of an ancient
castle, called Dolwyddellan, which, mounted upon a high
steep rock, formed a striking feature of this wild region.
Below these ruins, and about a mile distant, is the little village
of Dolwyddellan, situated in one of the most sequestered spots
in the world. It consists of a few small cottages, inhabited
by the simplest race, who speak no other language but the
Welsh, and never, except when broken in upon by a
picturesque
tourist, see any new faces. They pride themselves,
however, (for no people, however insignificant, can live
without
something to be proud of)they pride themselves upon an
old tradition, that Llewellyn was a native of their town. This
I learned from my professor of languages, who, I beg you to
understand, though I do not mention it, is always at my heels.
I found him particularly useful here, as an interpreter, having
begun to understand his English lately. I spent the night here
among these rural innocents, in a thatched hut; and I do assure
you, that never since I left America have I passed one more
pleasantly. To the eye, the whole world was centred in this
little valley. The breezy stillness of twilight, disturbed only
by rural sounds, the most homely of which (such is the charm
of association), sounded musically sweet, lulled me into a train
of reflections, that centred at last in home. The calling of
the cows; the voices of the women and children talking or
singing; even the squeaking of the pigs, were all harmonious
to the scene and the hour. The moon by and by rose, and
hovering along the tops of the mountains, divided the little
valley into spots of light and shade, beautifully contrasted, yet
harmoniously blending with each other. All was peace,
serenity
,
and confidence. For the first time in England, among
strangers, I was received without inquiry or suspicion, and
nothing could exceed the simple reliance with which they
placed their house, and all it afforded, at my command. True,
they had nothing to lose worth taking; yet still it was a rare
and pleasing trait of character, and as such I have remembered
it, and shall do so as long as I live.
Their mode of living in this little village, and indeed
throughout all this sequestered region, is such, as our beef,
ham, and turkey-eating villains at home, would call starvation.
They would not even put up with it in the poor house or state
prison. The cow and the goat furnish them with most of
their food, and it is very seldom they get a meal of flesh among
them. Yet they are far happier than most of the lower English
peasantry, and a hundred times happier than a large portion
of the labouring manufacturers. Their wants are few, and
their habits are virtuous. Labour is there combined with
health, wholesome, though simple food, and pure elastic air.
In a word, they are apparently happy in their situation,
whatever
estimate others may form of it, and that is quite enough
for them. I met here but with one family, the one where I
slept, who talked of going to America when they could get
there. Through the medium of the professor, I told them of
the old Welsh woman and her husband, who kept your dairy
and garden; and when assured that these ate as much fresh
meat as they liked, morning, noon, and night, they cast up
their eyes, and clapped their hands in utter astonishment.
When I also made them comprehend, that this good couple
had saved money enough, in a few years, to buy a hundred
and fifty acres of land for themselves and their children, to
have and to hold for ever, without lords, rents, tithes, or
taxes, they almost shed tears, and for the first time seemed
sensible that something was wanting to their happiness. I
almost reproached myself for what I had done. On going
away I gave the father your address; and as God shall
prosper
you, my brother, should they ever find their way to your
door, I would have you recollect that they treated me kindly
in the mountains of Wales.
From Dolwyddellan, I went, through a succession of
interesting
scenery, to the little village of Aber, which is a good
place to halt at, for the purpose of ascending Penmanmuir.
From this village I explored a little glen, deep and romantic,
which leads to a famous fall, called
Maes-y-Gair
, or
Rhryadr
Mawr
, I cannot say which, as my note is rather obscure.
Here, to use the proper elevation of language, which all the
tourists indulge, whenever they want to make a mountain of
a molehillhere, the water, a small brook, rushing with
indescribable
velocity, foams and dashes over a tremendous slate
rock, fifty feet high! I made a drawing of this, and some other
great falls, with a scrupulous regard to the size and dimensions
of objects, which I send with this letter. From these, which
I assure you, are rather heightened than otherwise, you will
perceive, how we in America are misled by the high-sounding
superlative of tourists, and the unjustifiable hyperbole of
picturesque
pencils. The
Rhrydr Mawr
is what we call a pretty
little cascade at home. During a dry season, I am told, it is
apt to disappear entirely. The winter is the best time for
visiting them, only nobody can get there in that season.
Near the village of Aber once stood a castle or palace of
Llewellyn ap Gryffyd, Prince of Wales. Tradition has
preserved
the following tale connected with these ruins. At the
siege of some place, Llewellyn took prisoner an English baron,
of the name of
William de Breos
, or
de Bruce
, whom he
carried
home, and treated with great hospitality, insomuch, that a
strong friendship grew up between them. Llewellyn's wife,
Joan Plantagenet, daughter of King John, from pitying the
captive knight, who was said to be very accomplished and
beautiful, realized the affinity between compassion and love,
and finally carried on a clandestine intercourse with De Breos.
The English knight was afterwards set free, but before
Llewellyn
had discovered the wrong he had done him. When,
however, it came to his knowledge not long afterwards, he
invited De Breos to pay him a visit, threw him into a
dungeon
,
and afterwards hanged him at a short distance from the
castle upon a little knoll, full in sight. He then drew Joan to
the window, and in the words of the legend
Lovely Princess, said Llewellyn,
What will you give to see your William?
Wales and England and Llewellyn,
I'd freely give to see my William.
Llewellyn, as might be expected, irritated at this answer,
pointed out, with horrible satisfaction, the body of De Breos,
hanging full in view. The lady did not expire at the sight,
but lived several years afterwards with her husband, who, it
seems, was satisfied with his revenge upon the lover. You
must excuse me for troubling you with this stuff; but the fact
is, there is little else to be told about these old castles, but tales
of unprincipled love and outrageous revenge.
Nothing occurred worthy of record between Aber and
Caernarvon
,
whither I next bent my way. This last is one of the
finest towns in North Wales. It is surrounded by walls, which,
together with the castle, were more entire than any I had
observed
in this country. The castle was built by Edward the
First, and is admirably situated for curbing the Welsh, as
the phrase then was. In one of the small dark rooms was
born Edward the Second, in consequence of the Queen being
taken there to give the Welshmen a native Prince. He did
them very little honour by his birth, for he was, beyond doubt,
one of the most weak and worthless monarchs that ever
reigned in England. The views of, and from this castle, are
highly picturesque and beautiful; and its preservation, for more
than five hundred years, gives it a degree of sublimity
approaching
to the idea of perpetual duration.
Near to Caernarvon are the remains of the ancient
Segontium
,
a Roman station; and parts of a Roman road are still to
be traced in the vicinity. The road to Beddgelert passes
through it. There are also the vestiges of a Roman fort,
consisting
of walls of great thickness, and perhaps ten feet high.
Here I had the satisfaction of seeing, that the Romans built
stone walls in Wales exactly as we do in America, and as they
did in Italy, by laying one stone upon another. You see,
brother, one learns something by travelling. It is said,
however
,
that they used boiling water for cement, which is,
undoubtedly
,
one great reason of the durability of their works.
The mortar, being thus in a sort of liquid state, insinuated
itself into every vacancy between the stones, and formed a
solid wall. In the walls of this fort are a number of round
holes, about three inches in diameter, and passing quite through.
These holes have puzzled the antiquaries very much, and given
occasion to various conjectures. If it might be permitted me
to make a yankee
guess
, I would say, they were left there to
look through, as occasion required, at the enemy, or any thing
else. From the eminences in the neighbourhood of
Caernarvon
,
are seen the Isle of Anglesea, and a great variety of
mountain peaks ranged along for a considerable distance. The
view of Anglesea was quite inviting, and almost tempted me to
cross the ferry. Other considerations, however, prevented me,
and I passed into what is called, by the picturesque tourists,
the wonders of Snowdonia. The mention of this mountain
reminds
me of an omission, in not telling you, that from Conway
I ascended to the summit of
Penmanmuir
, which rises fourteen
hundred feet, almost perpendicular, from the sea. It was the
only place that at all realized the magnificent descriptions of
the tourists, that I had yet seen in Wales. A walled road
passes close around the edge of this tremendous ocean barrier;
and the boundless prospect, as well as the sublime precipice,
caused a glowing fluttering of the heart, partaking of elevation
and apprehension combined. This place is all simplicity and
sublimity, There are but three ingredients, all purely grand
the sky, the ocean, and the tremendous precipice. It is
beyond
doubt the noblest spot in all England, and makes an
impression
never to be forgotten.
I contented myself with viewing Snowdon from Beddgelert,
from whence it makes rather a striking appearance, presenting
a high peak, generally, however, encircled with vapours.
Indeed
,
this is the region of humidity; and nine times in ten a
traveller ascending the mountain gets wet in going up, and
when he gains the summit, can see nothing but a Welsh mist,
equal in obscurity to a genuine Welsh pedigree. I therefore
turned my back on Snowdon, who very modestly retired
behind
his veil of vapours, and did not appear again the whole
day. This region, which is called Snowdonia, is composed of
subsidiary hills, lying about the base of Snowdon, and
constituting
properly the different steps in the ascent to that
mountain
,
although there are valleys between. It is a wild and
dreary region, with scarcely a vestige of agriculture, and
presenting
nothing but the most harsh and savage features of
nature. But I must caution you once more against the
superlative
phraseology of the tourists, when speaking of these
places. They set out from London, where perhaps they have
lived all their lives, without seeing a hill higher than
Hampstead
or Highgate, or any object of nature more sublime than
the Thames and Rosamond's Pond, and coming into Wales,
are fully assured that every thing they behold is on a scale of
immensity, because it exceeds all they have ever seen before.
I assure you, brother, I have not half the opinion of Welsh
scenery that I had, when reading tours and looking at pictures
of Llangollan, &c. by your fire-side in America. The
mountains
of Switzerland present objects on a far greater scale;
and nothing I have yet seen, in England or Wales, can rival
the scenery of the Rhine and its neighbourhood for sublimity
and beauty combined. All England can produce nothing to
compare with the
Rhinegau
, any more than all England can
produce such wine.
Still you are not to understand me to mean, that the Welsh
scenery is not very pretty, very respectable indeed, in point of
variety at least. By one, who has never been out of England,
it will undoubtedly be considered wonderful and unequalled.
It is under this impression that the tourists have deceived
themselves
and their readers, by adopting the superlative, when they
should modestly have confined themselves to the positive, and
not even ventured upon the comparative. Excepting the pass
of
Penmanmuir
, the higher class of sublimity is no where to
be seen in Wales. For my part, it was neither the mountains,
the rivers, the cataracts, nor the magnitude, indeed, of any
particular feature of nature that struck me. It was the
beautiful
,
romantic, and solitary little vales, deeply embosomed in
the mountainsthe softer and more latent beauties, that caught
my heart, and awakened the rural feeling in its highest state.
Such scenery abounds in Wales, and to those who have a taste
for it, few countries present more frequent or more entire
gratification
.
The view of the vale of Festiniog, on emerging from the
defiles among the ruins and rugged tributaries of Snowdon,
was of this character, and carried with it also the charm of
novelty, as well as the sight of a comfortable looking little inn,
to a weary and hungry traveller. This last is a prospect in
which all true lovers of the picturesque delight.
LETTER XI.
Dear Brother
,
London.
The
vale of Festiniog or Maentwrog is well cultivated, and
abounds in rural beauties, the very seat of musing and
tranquillity
.
It is all wild mountains without, and all gentleness
within. The little village of Festiniog lies somewhat elevated
above the surrounding fields, and at the foot of the mountains.
Near it are the pretty falls of Cynfael, separated by a distance
of about half a quarter of a mile, and the principal pitch about
forty feet high. Below this, the water, being confined in a
narrow pass of rocks, rushes along with considerable velocity,
exhibiting altogether a picturesque and romantic spectacle.
There is a singular rock rising out of the bed of the river like
a column, and is called Hugh Lloyd's pulpit.
This little vale, which is only about three miles long, and a
mile wide, is intersected by a rivulet, called the river Dwyrid,
on either side skirted with meadows, succeeded by cultivated
fields along the sides of the hills, which, in many places, are
covered with wood. At either end are high mountains,
shutting
out this little sequestered spot from all but the skies. The
tide, at the bottom of the vale, flows in from the sea, which is
just distinguished through the opening, as you pass between the
mountains. It is indeed a beautiful scene; presenting, on
every side, a combination of objects, associated with all that
is gay, innocent, and happy, in the lot of man. I must not
omit to mention that there is an inn here, called
Tan-y-Bwlch
,
which is reprobated by all the picturesque travellers, and
particularly
those who journeyed on foot. Each of these has had
a fling at the poor host, who, like Fielding's landlady, is not
really an ill-natured person, but he loves money so well, that
he hates every thing like poverty. There are two ways of
quieting Englishmen, particularly English landlords. One by
the jingling of money, the other by the jingling of bells.
Either of these will calm the roarings of the stoutest John
Bull. But among all the triumphs of gold, that of winning
civility from an English innkeeper, is certainly the greatest.
It is conquering both nature and habit at a blow.
Passing the southern barrier of the valley, I took a farewell
look at its beauties. The road now carried me for miles over
mountains, which afforded views of great extent and variety,
and comprehended the summit of Snowdon, which seems to
have as many heads as Hydra; for one cannot look, it would
seem, in any direction, without seeing Snowdon, or at least the
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. k
clouds that hide his top. Passing a miserable village, inhabited
by a miserable people, I gradually descended again into a valley,
abounding in wood, the road through which leads to the famous
cascade of Dollymyllan, formed by a brook called the
Gamlan
,
which foams and dashes terribly in the accounts of the
tourists, but is really no more than the ordinary mountain
torrents that our country presents to every traveller, who has
leisure and taste to admire them.
After visiting two other little cascades, the Cayne and
Mothwaye
,
which are really worth going a couple of miles to see,
and passing through a track abounding in striking features, I
gradually descended, along the rocky and almost sublime
shelving bank of the Mawdoch, to Dolgelly, the poor capital
of Merionethshire. There was very little here to eat, but a
great deal to see; poverty, the bane of happiness, is hereI
mean beggarly povertywant. The town lies at the base of
Cader Idris
, which rises almost perpendicularly, presenting a
broken rocky face, of uncommon grimness and savage majesty.
It is only about twenty-eight hundred feet high; but its
abruptness
,
and, above all, its detached position, distinct from any
other range, gives it an air of great majesty. Indeed, it may
be remarked, that the Welsh scenery, particularly mountains,
derives most of its effect from its abrupt transitions, and the
frequent occurrence of hills and rocks that are nearly
perpendicular
.
A precipice, or very steep mountain, approaches
more near to the sublime, than a mass of rocks, or a
fullswelling
hill of thrice their altitude. Another feature, which
undoubtedly contributes to render the Welsh mountains more
striking, though far less beautiful, is their general barrenness.
Destitute almost entirely of trees, they present a grim and
terrible aspect; and I was perpetually struck with the contrast
between them and our native hills, the fine foliage of whose
trees, extending quite to the summit, gives them a fleecy
softness
,
a feathery outline, peculiar to themselves. Nothing
indeed can be more enchantingly beautiful, than a view of the
grey rocks, and variegated foliage of one of our mountains
through the pure transparent atmosphere of an early October
morning.
The fiend, who presides over the picturesque in these regions,
tempted me to the ascent of
Cader Idris
. Accordingly,
invited
by a fine morning of most promising aspect, I proceeded
to the house of an honest, but exceedingly poor publican,
situated just at the point for beginning this mighty task. I
chose a path gullied out by a little torrent, which, during rains,
leaps from rock to rock, through a deep winding way, from
the summit to the vale below, stopping, as it were, to rest after
each leap, in little transparent crystal basins, formed by its
perpetual action.
Hic labor, hoc opus est
, quoth I, as I
toiled and climbed upwards, the ascent growing more and
more difficult as I approached the summit. Nevertheless, the
anticipated prospect supported my strength, and renovated my
spirits. But the picturesque dl, or, more politely, fiend,
brownie, or goblin, played me a trick after all; for, just about
the time I was toiling in the ravine, the vapours were gathering
at the top, and a shower of rain hailed my emerging to the
light of day. I got a wet jacket, and missed a prospect of two
hundred miles in circuit. Cader Idris tempted me, however,
and I fell into a great shower, which not only spoiled my
picturesque
hunting coat, but hid all the prospect in dense mists.
When I came down I took out my book to see what I might
have seen, if it had pleased heaven, and was consoled to find
that several tourists, besides myself, had got a wet skin in
ascending the mountain, and had, like me, come down as wise
as they went up.
I shook the mud from my feet, as did the trees of Orpheus
from their roots, when that divine fiddler set them a dancing,
and turning my back to this uncourtly, inhospitable mountain,
proceeded to the junction of the Mawdoch with the Avon.
The ride from Dolgelly, along one of the most extraordinary
roads in Wales for art and labour, is singularly fine,
presenting
a bold and variegated scenery, particularly on the north.
After the junction of the two rivers, the expanse of water
becomes
very broad, at full tide especially, when it appears like
a broad lake encompassed with high and irregular mountains.
At low water it looks, if the truth must be told, very like a
great marsh, with a creek meandering through the mud
thereof. At the outlet of this lake is Barmouth, which is
frequented
by the Welsh gentry for the purpose of sea-bathing.
Barmouth is called the Gibraltar of Wales. It is placed on a
high rock, 'tis true, but it is not Gibraltar. The town is
mean, incommodious, and difficult of access, presenting, on
the whole, nearly all the inconveniences which form the
principal
attraction of watering places.
Returning to Dolgelly, I followed the course of the Avon
not Shakespeare's Avonthrough a well-cultivated region,
enclosed
by high hills, dividing the basins of those streams that
water the two divisions of Merionethshire. This brought me
at length to the great Bala, Lyn-Tegid, or Pimble-Mere, the
largest lake in North Wales. It has little remarkable about it,
and the greatest wonder is, that being so small, it should be
the greatest in all this country. It is estimated at from four
to six miles long, and one mile broad. I forgot, however
there is a wonder about this lake. The river Dee, which
rises near the head of the lake, is affirmed, by Giraldus
Cambrensis
,
to pass quite from one end to the other, through this
immense body of water, as it is called, without mingling
its waters with those of Bala. It is quite amusing to read the
accounts of terrible dangers, of inundations, and the like,
which have frequently befallen the unfortunate people there,
from the immense swells, occasioned by the storms, upon
this immense body of water of one mile wide! I had heard
of a puddle in a storm before I came to Wales. I made an
excursion round the lake, but saw nothing remarkable, except
the vestiges of an overflow of the river, of which my guide
gave me a terrible account, concluding with the catastrophe
of ten cows that were carried away.
Leaving the little town of Bala, I reached the river Dee,
and came to the little town of Corwen, remarkable for a most
ferocious and gigantic likeness of the great Owen Glendower,
who is the hero of every impossible feat, or miraculous
appearance
in this his chosen retreat. I hope, for the credit of
Owen, the likeness is not a good one. There is the
impression
of a dagger in a stone, which he made by throwing it
away in a passion. This forms part of a door-way, made on
purpose for him, when he one day took it into his head, it
seems, to go to church, a rare event commemorated by this
door. Nobody must doubt these stories, for all Wales would
rise to resent it, and the very echoes turn into growls of
disapprobation
.
From Corwen, I again passed along the banks of
the Dee, by a charming road to Llangollan, having thus
returned
to the spot, from whence I commenced my tour.
The peculiar characteristics, by which the Welsh were
formerly
distinguished, are fast wearing away. Subjugation to
English rulers, and submission to English taxes, have altered
their very nature, and little of the high-spirited independence
of the followers of Llewellyn now remains. Excessive poverty,
when it begets an abject dependence upon public or private
munificence, grinds away all prominent points of character,
and almost uniformly produces a sycophant. I do not say,
this is true of all the middle and lower orders in Wales; but
there is enough of this to give a different aspect to the national
character.
Yet there is plenty of every thing, and every thing is cheap
among them. How is it then that this paradox of human
misery
exists in the midst of plenty? The land they till is not
their own, my brother. They have the same rent to pay when
their produce is cheap, as when it is dear, and, consequently,
the plenty of a surplus produce, for which there is no demand
impoverishes them. Had they no rents nor taxes to pay, this
profusion would be a blessing; now it operates in the other
extreme
,
and is actually a misfortune. Lord Liverpool, the
premier, not long since acknowledged the truth of this strange
doctrine, when he ascribed a great portion of the miseries of
this country to the abundant harvests, bestowed by the bounty
of Providence. Thus it is, that this boasted system of British
wisdom has produced the paradox of want in the midst of
profusion
.
By its incessant cobbling and tinkering, and
undertaking
to divert the course of nature, as well as the eternal
economy
of Providence, this government has wrested the blessings
of heaven from their usual and ordinary effects, converting
benign
seasons and plenteous harvests, and all the bounties of an
indulgent Benefactor, into curses and maledictions. It cannot
be that this is wisdom, that so mars and murders the mercies
of God, and distorts the very redundancies of the harvest into
famine and misery.
Of the land-proprietors, and higher orders in Wales, and
their once renowned hospitality, I can say but little. You
can get a dinner and a night's lodging of them sometimes,
provided
you bring a letter from a great man they wish to oblige;
but it is not given to youit is given to the great man. But
that noble feeling of hospitality, which springs from a liberal
heart and open hand; which is bestowed, not from vanity,
ostentation
,
or interest, but from love to our fellow-creatures;
that hospitality, which you and I, and every other reputable
traveller, have shared liberally in our own country, is not to
be found among the gentry of Wales or England.
LETTER XII.
Dear Brother
,
London.
Bidding
adieu to North Wales, I again found myself at
Shrewsbury, where, resuming my horses, I returned by a
roundabout way through Staffordshire, Derbyshire,
Nottinghamshire
,
Leicester, Northampton, &c. to London.
Beyond all doubt, some of the farmers in the midland
counties
have brought agriculture to as high perfection as it was
ever before carried. The vast labour and expense, applied to
small farms and parcels of land, and that too with much
judgment
,
generally resulted in the production of the greatest crops.
While these crops met with a ready sale, and at a price
affording
a profit, this vast application of labour and expense brought
with it a return of profit, and enriched the farmer. But it is
quite natural, that when the produce no longer repays the
expenditure
of labour, food, tithes, and taxes, there should be
no longer any spur to enterprise or exertion. The
improvement
of the land, the labours of cultivation, and all the
refinements
of agriculture, which the common farmers practised
with profit, because every additional bushel of wheat brought
more or less of a clear gainall these will be abandoned by
degrees, when the fruits no longer repay the toil and expense.
My practice has been to make a short stay at the villages I
passed through; to wander about, and look at the people in
the fields, who, by dint of seeing me three or four times, would
get over their strangeness, and often converse with me freely
on their affairs. It is by frequently resorting to this practice,
that I gained a knowledge of the depression of agriculture and
its causes. No one knows where the shoe pinches, or the
cause of its pinching, so well as he that wears it; the sufferer
can best tell the sources of his grief. The noble trio that have
produced the ruin of the tenantry of England, are rents, tithes,
and taxes.
While a brisk market, a ready sale, prompt payment, and
high prices offered themselves, the tenant did not so much mind
the rent he paid, or the taxes levied upon him, both which,
have been gradually increasing with the creation and magnitude
of paper credit, paper currency, and national expenditures.
But suddenly his market is glutted, prices fall, and rents and
taxes continue the same, or become higher than they were.
His situation may easily be conceived without the magic
spectacles
of political economy; he is impoverished and ruined.
The very perfection to which he brought his system of farming
adds to his misfortunes, because it will not now repay him
the interest of the labour and expense laid out upon it.
Under all these circumstances, you cannot wonder if the
agricultural interest is in a state of great depression; that the
people have no heart to labour, since neither industry
nor economy can keep them from want. That must be a
wretched country, where the two great virtues of the labouring
class, industry and economy, cannot keep the wolf from the
door. Such is the case with England. The tenantry find the
produce of their fields decreasing in value, while their rents
remain the same, and the taxes and poor rates are increasing.
The consequence is, abject poverty among a large portion,
and approaching poverty among the remainder.
I have never been among a people I pitied so much as this
industrious, patriotic, abused, and deceived tenantry. No
body of people on the face of the earth, or that ever were upon
the face of the earth, have made such sacrifices for their
country
.
They have patiently endured for years a system of
taxation
without example, and have freely given to their country
all that they could spare, and more besides. They have
worked
,
and watched, and starved for their country, and
contributed
to what they believed to be her safety or her glory,
almost
as many millions as they have given to their own
comforts
.
They looked to the banishment of Napoleon and the
re-establishment of peace, as the end of their sacrifices, and
they found it but the beginning of their sufferings. They
discovered
,
too late, that they had sacrificed their substance for a
shadow, and riveted their own chains while they believed
themselves breaking those of Europe.
Could they by any possibility be relieved from their
burthens
,
and rise to a state of comparative competency, they
would be, what they once were, worthy of being the ancestors
of our countrymen. But such is not even to be hoped,
without
a revolution. The government cannot, if it would,
diminish
the taxes, and would not, if it could. The landlords
make subscriptions and form societies for giving them charity;
but they do not diminish their rents to any great extent, nor
do the clergy relinquish a tittle of their tithes, either for the
love of man or the love of heaven.
In comparing the situation of the manufacturing with that
of the agricultural labourers, I found the balance against the
former in every point of view. There is more misery, as well
as vice and ignorance, among them. Their wages are actually
and literally entirely insufficient to satisfy the wants of nature,
where a man has a family to support. In many of the
manufactories
of Birmingham and Manchester, they labour only
half the time, three days in the week, because there is not work
for them, and this at one-third, and sometimes one-half less
wages, than they received during the war. No one, that has
not seen can conceive the squalid and miserable looks of these
people, between the dirt and unwholesomeness of their
employment
,
the ignorant worthlessness of their characters, and the
shifts the poor creatures are obliged to resort to in order to
exist. It is not to be wondered at, if in the madness of misery,
and cast out as it were from a participation in the common
benefits of society, they become turbulent, seditious, and
dangerous
.
It is because they are hungry, and their children are
starving, and not because they have read Thomas Paine or
William Cobbett, that they are become radicals, as is the
phrase of the day. Give them plenty to eat, and they will
lie down as contendedly as a pig in the stye. Probably more
than two-thirds of them cannot read; what absurdity then to
suppose, or what hypocrisy rather to pretend to suppose, they
are excited to acts of violence by books!
That you may the better understand the actual and
fundamental
causes of this depression in the agricultural interest,
and be satisfied that poor-rates, tithes, taxes, and rents, and
not a superabundant harvest, are at the root of the evil, I
will state to you some facts, which I neglected in the proper
place. They will, however, come in well enough here,
especially
as they are entirely corroborated by testimony delivered
to this very committee by agriculturists from different parts of
the kingdom. In one of the counties, I was assured, that all
agricultural produce had, within a given period, suffered a
depression averaging thirty-five per cent. while the poor-rates
in the same period had advanced seventy-five, and the taxes
about seventy per cent. The poor-rates, in other counties, in
many cases, amount to an assessment of from twelve to fifteen
or sixteen shillings an acre per annum. In another place I was
told by farmers, hard at work even in the midst of this
hopeless
state of things, that their actual losses upon the last year's
crop amounted to as much as their whole rental. In other
places, such is the depression of the tenantry, that they have
not been able to pay a shilling of rent from one to two years
past, and the landlords have permitted them to remain,
because
no others would occupy them, even on condition of
paying tithes, taxes, and poor-rates, and living rent free. In
other places, warrants of distress for rent have been issued to
four times the number ever known before, in the same period
of time; and the shopkeepers have gone so far in some cases,
as to enter into combinations not to trust the farmers, from a
conviction of their total inability to pay. When I asked these
unfortunate people, what possible modification of things would
relieve them, the answer invariably was,
relief from tithes
and taxes
. All agreed, that it would be impossible to go on
much longer, unless these were reduced at least one-third. This
is impracticable without a reduction of the expenditures of
the government, and the interest of the national debt. As to
tithes, the clergy might be brought to relinquish these, under a
discipline similar to that King John exercised upon the rich
Jew. Every way, therefore, it seems to me, that any salutary,
permanent change in the situation of the English tenantry is
hopeless, from any voluntary reduction of their burthens either
by the government or the church. They must either be
content
to accept from the rich that charity which is exercised at
the expence of their own labours; or emigrate; or boldly
demand
,
that they be permitted to share in the blessings of that
government, for the support of which they pay so dearly.
Such is the wretched state to which Mr. Pitt's policy; his
system of funding, borrowing, and wasting, has brought Old
England, the favourite of philosophy and song. All the
mystery
consists in relieving one class at the expence of another;
bleeding until the patient is near fainting, and then filching a
smelling bottle from his neighbour's pocket, to afford him a
temporary resuscitation. It is thus that the present ministry
supports itself, by playing off alternately the wants of the
poor against the fears of the rich; arraying them from time to
time in opposition to each other, and holding the balance of
victory in its own hands. Should this income tax be laid, the
consequences are pretty obvious. The landlords, who have
been duped into the support of every arbitrary measure of
late, and thus entirely lost the affections of the poor, will be
unable to make head against ministers; while the tenantry
will very probably laugh in their sleeves, and support the very
ministry they have been accustomed to denounce and revile.
Had the landlords made common cause with the tenants, they
could have done what they pleased; but they were frightened
at the Spencerean system, and will ere long feel the
consequences
.
They will have the privilege of being next
devoured
.
LETTER XIII.
Dear Brother
,
London.
That
the present age is in rapid progress to something nearly
allied to fanaticism on one hand, and infidelity on the other, is,
I think, pretty evident from various indications; and it is
equally clear, that the origin of this may be traced to political
causes, which have in truth exercised in all ages a vast influence
over religion. The kingdoms of Europe were all pretty much
in the same situation. The church and state were every where
combined, and mutually supported each other's prerogatives.
The French Revolution, which shook these thrones, shook
with them the pillars of the established churches, I mean those
churches which shared with the kings and their nobility a great
portion of the wealth of nations. Connected thus by the
strong tie of mutual interest, it is therefore obvious, that the
ancient political and the ancient ecclesiastical establishments
would make common cause against the claims and rights of
the people. Their mutual fears would also operate still more
to cement this bond of union, and the alliance for mutual
defence. The example of this alliance in France was followed
by the different states of Europe, whose similarity of situation
dictated the same measures, and thus happened the wonderful
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. l
coincidence of all the monarchs of that quarter, together with
the princes and nobles becoming all at once extremely pious;
that is to say, so far as the support of a hierarchy was
essential
to their interests, and so far as the possession of piety did
not carry with it the necessity of practising what they
professed
.
In fact, there seems to have been a compromise, by
which the faith of the monarch was to be accepted in lieu of all
good works, except the good work of repressing those throes
of misery among the nations, which sometimes came near to
shake the throne and the hierarchy.
Two effects resulted from this cunning conspiracy. All those,
who supported the throne and the
established church
, which
last at length became synonymous with religion itself, were
friends of order and religion as a matter of course. On the
contrary, those who thought that causes, which have been
gaining strength for centuries past, had accumulated to such a
degree as to render some alterations in the old systems of
governments necessary to the welfare of mankind, were
stigmatized
as enemies to the true faith, as hostile to religion itself.
In short, despotism became order, and an established church,
with exclusive privileges, religion. To question the claims of
the one was treason; of the other, infidelity.
In the natural course of things, these excellent synonymes
found their way into our country. The two great parties, for
and against the Revolution of France, in the United States,
adopted, in a great measure, the cant which prevailed abroad,
and opposed each other on the same grounds, though we had
happily no privileged church nor privileged orders. Still, one
party did not hesitate to stigmatize the other with being
deficient
in an orthodoxy, of which there was no standard among
them; while the other maintained, with a greater appearance
of reason, that there was no connexion between religion itself
and a church with exclusive privileges, but what was arbitrary
and injurious to the best interests of piety and morality. Thus
the connexion between democracy and heterodoxy became
naturalized among the opposers of the French Revolution in
the United States. In horrible imitation of their prototypes
abroad, a vast many people became advocates and converts of
that legitimate party, which disdains an alliance with moral
principles, and can reconcile a breach of the moral duties with
the sincerest devotion and the truest faith. Hypocrisy,
however
,
has generally a number of sincere followers; and a
simulated
piety adopted, merely from political and interested
motives, by the great, has produced, among a large portion
of the lower orders, a species of fanaticism, which seems to
be spreading over the face of the earth. The advocates of
political freedom, in their solicitude to avoid the imputation
of being without religion, because they do not adhere to an
established church, seem determined to go even beyond
legitimacy
in the race of fiery zeal; so that it is probable, before
long, we shall have nothing but fanatics and infidels, and that
rational religion will no longer be found among the nations of
Europe, or the people of the United States.
You have no doubt heard of the million of pounds sterling,
appropriated some two or three years since, at the
recommendation
of his present majesty, who is a great example of morals
and religion, for the building of one hundred new churches in
and about London. This was advertised and puffed to the
uttermost corners of the earth, as if the Regent had himself
bestowed this million from his own privy purse. No such
thing, I assure you. It was a million extra, not drawn from
his own pocket, but from the pockets of the people. What
rendered this appropriation still less praiseworthy, was the
fact to which every man in this city can bear witness, that the
episcopal churches already built are amply sufficient for all
the purposes of public worship. The dissenting chapels and
methodist tabernacles are indeed generally crowded; but the
places of worship belonging to the established church are, I
repeat again, never filled, except on some extraordinary
occasion
.
It is true, that the present churches in this city are not
sufficient to hold the whole population of London, should they
all attend public worship at one and the same time, a thing that
never did nor ever can happen.
If a stranger wishes to see how the people of fashion spend
their Sunday mornings, that is to say, from two till five in the
afternoon, he should go to Hyde Park. Here he will see
Corinthians, fine ladies, and sons of aspiring cits, galloping,
galloping
,
galloping; and trotting, trotting, trotting, in one eternal
never-ending and still beginning circle, admiring themselves
and envying each other. The great pleasure arising from this
pretty variety of round and round, seems to be the stupid
admiration of the commonalty, who stare at these great ones,
and decide upon the claims of each rider, horse, and equipage.
It is impossible to describe the vast variety of extravagance
exhibited on these occasions, or the whimsical diversity of
riders and equipages. This exhibition of vanity continues,
till it is time to go home and dress for dinner, to a good
appetite for which, half the lives of the young Corinthians
are devoted.
To conclude: most of the superiority of this country in
religion
will be found to orginate in newspaper advertisements
and missionary magazines, speeches in parliament, and
declarations
.
If we try it by any other standard, it will be found
entirely unsupported. If we look to morals as a criterion of
religion, and to crimes as a test of morals, there is no
foundation
for this claim. If we look to other outward indications,
such as a respect for public decorum; an observance of the
Sabbath; a friendly regard to other nations; or a general
benevolence, indicated by a habit of speaking of them with
temper and decorum; a desire of preserving peace and good
will with their neighbours on the continent, or the distant
people of the other quarters of the globethere is still less
foundation for this boast. Her practice has never been to speak
well of other nations. Her wars, for the last hundred years,
have been more frequent than those of any other country. In
every quarter of the globe she has warred against the human
race, through the impulses of ambition and avarice. Asia,
Africa, and America, can tell of her oppressions; and if she
thinks she can make amends to them, or deceive the world, by
sending missionaries and Bibles to pave the way for a still
greater extension of trade and empire, I think she is mistaken.
The veil is dropping lower and lower every day, and the
physiognomy
of the hypocrite becoming more visible to the eyes
of the world.
LETTER XIV.
Dear Brother
,
London.
Thomas Paine
, although his Age of Reason was
answered
and refuted so completely in this country, is still,
though dead, an object against which the fears of this
government
are strongly directed. To buy and read his book is
considered
an overt act of disaffection, if not treason; and to sell
it, subjects a bookseller to a prosecution, although he may vend
the works of Tindal, Bolingbroke, Hume, Gibbon, Swift,
Rabelais
,
and Voltaire, in perfect security. This the most
orthodox
booksellers do without scruple; and what is more, the
most orthodox of the clergy and nobility buy them with as
little. It is true, that Paine has treated the religion of our
fathers with indecent scurrility; whereas most of those who
previously attacked it, preserved an air of respect, which only
made their efforts the more dangerous. This is not, however,
the case with Tindal, Woolston, Swift, Rabelais, and Voltaire,
whose works, as I observed before, are still vended by the
trade, who, as there is no law to the contrary, settle the point
of conscience quietly among themselves.
Not long ago, I alarmed the shopman of a worthy bookseller,
by inquiring for a copy of Paine's works. This honest fellow
has lived so much among books, that he resembles an
exceedingly
old edition of a man by Caxton or Wynkyn de Worde.
In reply to my question, he pursed up his mouth into an
excruciating
vinegar expression, and assured me they never kept any
such vile trash in the store. I believe I have almost lost his
good opinion, for he eyes me ever since with a look of
suspicion
,
and I begin to believe takes me for a confirmed radical.
This worthy and well-meaning man, however, on my
inquiring
for Voltaire and the rest, very courteously handed me
a quarto of Tindal, from which he brushed the dust with an
air of great devotion, being one of those excellent scholars
who actually worship a great book. What I mean to infer
from this toleration of other deistical works, and this inveterate
persecution of Paine, is simply, that a regard to the interests of
religion has nothing to do with the matter. I am no advocate
or defender of Paine's theological opinions. Though I look
upon him as one of the most clear and able advocates of human
rights, I certainly have no respect whatever for his religion or
morality. By his attacks on the Bible, he has not only
meditated
a great injury to the welfare and happiness of mankind
here and hereafter, but he has likewise vitally injured the
interests of human freedom, by affording its enemies a
pretext
to couple it with infidelity. Because the same writer
happened to advocate the rights of man, and question the
authority of the Scriptures, occasion has been taken to
establish
a sort of affinity between the unbeliever and the
republican
,
which would probably never have been though of,
had it not been that the example of Paine afforded a pretext
for this preposterous association. For this reason, I am apt to
think him one of the worst enemies to liberty; and that, so far
as his influence extends, he has actually retarded the progress
of freedom more than all the efforts of the Holy Alliance.
But though the pretence set up by the ministry, the beneficed
clergy, and indeed all those orthodox people here, who enjoy
more than their share of the good things of this life, for
persecuting
Paine and his opinions, is that of religion; yet nothing
is clearer to my mind, than that his political opinions are almost
exclusively the objects of their apprehension and hostility. If
he had only maintained the divine right of kings, I believe he
might have questioned any other divine right with impunity.
As it was, he afforded, by his religious, a pretext for prohibiting
the circulation of his political opinions; and although his
morals were quite equal, I am inclined to think, to most of the
kings and princes of this age, he left behind him a reputation
which has deprived his opinions of a great portion of their
weight and authority. His Age of Reason has been
triumphantly
refuted by men who were made bishops for their
good service: yet such are the apprehensions still entertained
by the good ministry and Church of England, that though his
book has been thus entirely subdued, they have actually
outlawed
its disarmed heresies, and made it penal to print or to
read this flippant, nonsensical, and dangerous blasphemy.
Nothing, my dear brother, so strongly indicates the weakness
of a government as the fear of a book. It is a sign of a
consumptive
habit in any system, religious or political, when it
shrinks from the battery of truth, much more when it is afraid
even of the sapping of falsehood. When a single volume, a single
newspaper, or a single individual becomes an object of royal,
ministerial, noble, or clerical apprehension, it would seem to
indicate, that the edifice which thus trembles at every blast, is
destitute of a proper basis of truth or utility, to sustain it
against reason, ridicule, or declamation.
In witnessing thus the whole force of the government applied
to the suppression of a single book, one might be tempted to
suppose, that Thomas Paine was the first English writer who
ventured to question the authority of the Bible, and the truth
of revealed religion; or, at all events, that the present king
was the only pious monarch, and the present ministers the only
pious ministers, this country has been blessed with since the
days of lord Herbert of Cherbury. He was one of the
bravest, most gallant, and accomplished persons of the
seventeenth
century, a courtier and scholar combined. He has
written
his own life with a degree of candour and openness, which
seems to prove him incapable of deceit or falsehood, and from
which it appears that he was somewhat spoiled by the
admiration
of the ladies, with whom he was a great favourite, on
account of his wit, gallantry, and great personal beauty. Lord
Herbert was every where celebrated for his generosity and
magnanimity
;
nor can it be denied that he carried the point of
honour to a pitch that might almost be called fantastical. He
filled several offices about the court of England, and was
ambassador
at the court of France for some time. Here he first
printed his work,
De Veritate prout distinguitur a
Revelatione
.
This tract is a vindication of natural religion, which
he maintains to be in itself perfect without the aid of revelation.
That he might clearly understand whether his work was
agreeable
to Heaven, he adopted the following method of consulting
its will previous to the publication. I took, he says, my
book `De Veritate' in my hand, and kneeling on my knees,
devoutly said these words, `O thou eternal God, author of the
light that now shines on me, and giver of all inward
illumination
!
I do beseech thee, of thy infinite goodness, to pardon
a greater request than I, a sinner, ought to make. I am not
satisfied enough whether I shall publish this book
De Veritate;
if it be for thy glory, I beseech thee give me some sign from
Heaven; if not, I will suppress it.' I had no sooner spoke
these words, than a loud, though gentle noise came from
Heaven, (for it was like nothing on earth,) which did so
comfort
and cheer me, that I took my petition as granted, and that
I had the sign demanded.
Thomas Hobbes was one of the most learned and scientific
men of his age, and among the most acute reasoners, although
entirely worsted in a mathematical controversy with the
famous
Dr. Wallis. He was a person of great purity and
simplicity
of character, and held with Socrates, that a man was
bound to conform to the religion established by government.
Hobbes traces religion to a fear of invisible powers, and an
ignorance of second causes, which ascribes natural or
accidental
appearances to supernatural power. Inspiration, he
affirms, is a sign of madness; the immortality of the soul, and
a belief in a future state, as hearsay; and the distinction
between
soul and body, as a modern branch from the old root of
Grecian demonology; that the truth of the scriptures rests
altogether
upon the decisions of councils and the will of
magistrates
,
who are the interpreters in authority, whose dicta must
be obeyed. He also maintained, that a subject might
conscientiously
comply with the will of his sovereign, acting as
God's vicegerent, even to the denying of Christ in words,
while he cherished him in his heart. It was this courtly
doctrine
of the king's supremacy, that probably procured him the
patronage of King Charles, who settled a pension upon him.
He also was all his lifetime patronised by the Earl of
Devonshire
,
at whose house he died in the year 1679. Unluckily,
however, he was not a democrat, and therefore affords no
support
to the prevailing theory of the inflexible affinity between
freedom in politics and free opinions in religion.
Lord Shaftesbury was a cotemporary of Hobbes, but not,
like him, an advocate for the divine right of kings, being a
steady opposer of arbitrary power, although by no means a
republican
.
He wrote the famous Characteristics, and was
justly esteemed one of the most elegant scholars and well read
persons of the age. His style of writing, though condemned
by Blair, has been much admired by fine judges. Though
Lord Shaftesbury, in his dialogue of the Moralists, most
eloquently supports the doctrines of a Deity and superintending
Providence, yet he is never solicitous to hide his doubts
respecting
the divinity of Christ. Hence he must be classed
with those, who, like Paine, have been the opponents of
religion
,
according to the opinions of orthodox writers, although
in other respects an advocate of virtue, and an enemy to
arbitrary
power. For this last reason, while Hobbes was pensioned,
Shaftesbury lost his place of vice-admiral of Dorsetshire, and
continued out of favour with queen Anne.
Bolingbroke, the cotemporary of Pope and Swift, and one
of the finest English writers, imitated by Burke, and praised
by all the wits of his time, also wrote against revealed religion.
After the publication of his tracts, the grand jury of
Westminster
presented them as calculated to subvert religion,
morality
,
and government. They have, however, continued to
be publicly vended in this country ever since; and have met
their antidote, as all such writings should do, not in the
persecution
of their author, or the proscription of his book, but in
able and satisfactory refutations. Bolingbroke's opinions on
religious subjects were undoubtedly known during his life, for
he was not a man to keep them secret; yet he was secretary
of state to queen Anne, and owed his subsequent disgrace and
attainder, not to his religious, but his political opinions. His
favourite doctrine was, that atheists were much less dangerous
than divines. How came he to escape being burnt?
Matthew Tindal was another bold and bitter enemy to
christianity
,
cotemporary with Bolingbroke. He was the son of a
clergyman, and a doctor of laws at Oxford. He turned
catholic
at the instance of some Roman missionaries, but
afterwards
returned to the Church of England. He wrote a book
called The rights of the Christian Church vindicated, &c.
which waked up the high church clergy, who would go to
sleep at their fat stalls, if it were not for a blast of heterodoxy
to awaken them now and then. Tindal was furiously assailed
as a deist, and his publishers indicted. He afterwards
published
a defence of this work, which was ordered by the house
of commons to be burnt by the common hangman, in the same
fire with Sacheverell's sermons. Like many other men,
Tindal
,
finding himself persecuted on suspicion of heterodoxy, was
spurred on by a sense of injury, and injustice perhaps, to direct
opposition. He accordingly wrote a book, called Christianity
as old as the Creation; in which he boldly and directly
maintained
the broadest principles of natural religion, and denied
all external revelation. But his politics, as usual, atoned for
his heterodoxy; being a staunch advocate of the Hanoverian
succession, he enjoyed a persion of two hundred sterling a
year from George the First.
Toland, author of Christianity not mysterious, the
Pantheisticon
,
and other works, was a haughty, bold spirit,
exasperated
by opposition into open and violent assaults on
christianity
.
Being prosecuted in Ireland for his first work, he
threw aside disguise, and afterwards came to England, where
he published the others, which contain the most undisguised
attacks. But though prosecuted in Ireland for the most
moderate
of his productions, he remained unmolested in England
for the most violent of them all, and neither suffered in person
nor property, although heterodox in the extreme. He was
accused of dying with a blasphemous prayer in his mouth,
beginning
with Omnipotens et sempiterne Bacche, &c. But
this is probably a calumny, as the prayer, according to
Voltaire
,
was composed two centuries before, for a society of
tipplers. He died with perfect composure, saying, I am
going to sleep.
Anthony Collins, author of A Discourse on Free-thinking,
A Discourse of the grounds and reasons of the Christian
Religion
,
and various other controversial works, was a man of
extraordinary ability, as well as great private and public
virtues
;
but he was one of the most dangerous enemies to
orthodoxy
that ever lived, not excepting David Hume, whom he
resembled in many respects. Instead of being persecuted for
his opinions, he successively enjoyed the most honourable
public
offices, such as deputy lord-lieutenant of Essex, and
treasurer
of that county. On his death-bed he appealed to his
Maker for the purity of his intentions in all his writings. He
was a friend and correspondent of Mr. Locke, who had a great
regard for him, and his most bitter adversaries always treated
him with respect. They thought it better, perhaps, to take
the trouble of refuting him by their learning, than to resort to
the more easy and expeditious method of the modern Church
of England, clamour and persecution.
Thomas Woolston was a contemporary with Collins, and
mingled in the controversy with him and Dr. Clarke, who,
perhaps, of all the champions of orthodoxy, was the most able,
learned, and tolerant. He refuted Woolston, and interfered
for his release when imprisoned for a fine which he could not
pay, condemning every species of religious persecution.
Woolston
was, in the latter part of his life, reputed mad by his
opponents
,
and yet, at the same time was prosecuted by the
attorney-general for his heresies; for it happened, unluckily
for him, that his opinions coincided with neither party, being
far more extravagant than those of lord Herbert, or any of
his successors. He belonged to no faction, and was persecuted
by one, without being protected by the other. His moral
character
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. m
was, however, without reproach; and his last words
were, This is a struggle which all men must go through,
and which I bear not only patiently but willingly; certainly
neither the words of a madman nor unbeliever. Woolston was
offered his freedom from prison, if he would promise to refrain
from the further publication of his opinions. This he refused,
and it is said that he died in jail, although from the best
authorities
,
and the testimony of eye-witnesses, it appears that he
obtained his liberty, and died peaceably at his own house. He
maintained that the miracles of our Saviour were all allegorical,
and attempted to explain their mystical sense. Such was the
demand for his discourses against the miracles, that three
editions
,
of ten thousand copies each, were sold by himself at his
own house in a very short time.
Thomas Chubb was a person of extraordinary natural
abilities
,
which he managed greatly to improve by study, although
successively engaged as apprentice to a glover, and assistant
to a tallow-chandler. His first work was published in
conjunction
with the celebrated Whiston, who, together with Pope
and many other persons, admired his talents greatly. He was
in truth, a philosopher of nature's forming. In his book,
entitled
The Supremacy of the Father asserted, &c. his object
was to prove the Son a being of inferior order to the Father. It
engaged him, eventually, in a whole life of controversy,
though he escaped legal prosecution and clerical persecution.
Being charged with hostility to revealed religion, he proceeded
to justify himself; and, as often happens, in the zeal to defend
himself, advanced into the very errors with which he was
charged; he at length came to the point, and placed the
Saviour
in the highest rank of teachers and moralists, such as
Socrates
and Confucius. He was a man of great purity and
simplicity
of character, and so disinterested, that he refused to
accept any addition to his income, which was already equal to
his wants. The famous Dr. Clarke, the two Hoadleys, the
bishop and Dr. Joh, although they rejected and opposed his
theory, bore testimony to his ability and virtues: but it must
be remembered, this was before it became orthodox to take
away a man's character for disagreeing in opinion. Chubb,
however, like many others of his class, is now known
principally
through the writings of his adversaries, and has more
reputation
than readers.
But of all those writers who attacked religion under many
masks, and in various ways, there is none who took such
liberties
,
and broke so many severe jests as Swift, a beneficed
clergyman
of the Church of England. His Tale of a Tub is one of the
bitterest satires ever written; nor do I believe any works now
extant, not even excepting those of Rabelais and Paine, so well
calculated to weaken our respect and reverence for the
scriptures
.
He possessed an admirable vein of humour, with an
invention that supplied him with all sorts of incidents in which
to display it; and having chosen the vehicle of a romance,
has had more readers than all the preceding catalogue of
writers put together. By placing the pulpit side by side with
the gallows and mountebank's stage, as theatres for the display
of eloquence, he did what would in preceding ages have cost
him his life. Yet he escaped persecution, and was rewarded
with a rich benefice. His only punishment was not obtaining
an English bishopric. The matter is easily explained; he was
the partisan of ministers, and the advocate of tory principles.
This merit atoned for his having soused the christian religion
all over with ridicule. But I forgethe had another merit;
he made the catholic more ridiculous than any other, which
procured him toleration from the protestant divines.
It is not generally known, nor is it mentioned, that I
recollect
,
by any of his biographers, that Swift borrowed the
idea of his Tale of a Tub from an eastern story of
considerable
antiquity, called The Three Rings. An old man,
having three sons, leaves each one at his death a ring: they fall
together by the ears about which is entitled to the handsomest.
After long debates and furious contentions, they make the
discovery
that the three rings are all perfectly alike. The father
signifies Theism, and the three sons typify Judaism,
Christianity
,
and Mahommedanism. The three coats of Peter,
Martin, and Jack, and the three rings, suggest nearly the
same ideas, and the resemblance in the plans is certainly not
accidental.
During the eighteenth century, England appears to have
produced no other writers against orthodoxy of particular note,
except Hume, Gibbon, and Thomas Paine. The preceding
century had exhausted the subject in a great degree, or
perhaps
few persons had the hardihood to resume a controversy,
which not only ensured a life of contention, but a bad name
after death. David Hume, however, the most cool and
philosophical
of Scotsmen, published, during the last century, his
Dialogues concerning Natural Religion, and Essays on
Suicide, which last contains those principles that have called
forth the abuse and reproaches of thousands who have never
read them, and know not what they contain. He was
certainly
a most sturdy heterodoxian; and though more
temperate
as well as decorous in his style and manner, aimed greater
blows at religion and the immortality of the soul than Paine
himself. But his History of England made amends for his
scepticism, by its orthodox precepts inculcating the divine
right of kings. Hume became secretary to embassies and
charge des affaires; received a pension from the king; was
admired and respected by the first men of the age; and finally
died like Socrates, leaving behind him one of the best
characters
on record.
Not long after the Essays on Suicide, appeared the
celebrated
History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman
Empire
,
by Edward Gibbon. Gibbon had turned catholic when
young, and was sent to a calvinist minister at Lausanne by
his father, with a view of having him brought back to his
mother church. The experiment was successful, and Gibbon
abjured his errors. Two chapters of his great work gave
offence
to the ruling church here. In relating the progress of the
christian religion, he ascribes much of its success to temporal
influence; in short, he maintains that secondary causes had
highly favoured the first establishment of the church. These
chapters of Gibbon were made the pretext perhaps, for
avenging
the tales he has told of the profligacy of some of the
early patrons of the churchthe ridicule he has cast upon
some of the most frivolous grounds of church divisions and
ecclesiastical persecutionsand above all, the light he has
thrown upon the creed of St. Athanasius. To these offences
may be added the terrible liberties he has taken with the
Reverend George of Cappadocia, tutelary saint of England.
This worthy he proves to have been one of the most corrupt,
unprincipled rogues of his time, by testimonials which are of
unquestionable authority. St. George is, however, the patron
of more orders of knighthood than any saint in the calendar,
and figures as the tutelary of the most noble order of the
garter
,
of which his excellent copyist, his present majesty, is
grand master. He was assailed by many writers of the
established
church, and will descend to posterity as the enemy of
true religion. But his politics were right orthodox; as a
member of parliament, he voted with the ministry; as a
political
writer, he supported the principles of Mr. Burke in his
Reflections, and professed himself an enemy to every
species
of reform. Instead, therefore, of being fined, imprisoned,
or outlawed, he was made a lord of trade, a profitable
sinecure
,
and was a favourite of kings and their ministers all his
life.
But it was otherwise with Thomas Paine, who was neither
so profane as Tindal and Swift, nor so much of a sceptic as
Hume and Collins. His Rights of Man rendered his Age of
Reason unpardonable. Although the examples I have quoted,
and the fact that all the other heterodox books continue to be
publicly sold, sufficiently justify the belief, that if he had
abjured
his politics, and supported the divine right of kings,
with the same clearness and ability he did those of the people,
he might have enjoyed his unbelief unmolested either by church
or state. As I observed before, I have no great regard to the
memory of this person, although his early writings were
serviceable
to our cause in the time of the revolutionary war.
All that he ever wrote in favour of freedom, is insufficient to
atone for the indecent and arrogant manner in which he
questions
the authority of Holy Writ; nor can all the clearness of
his reasonings in support of human liberty, counterbalance the
injury he has inflicted upon it, by giving its enemies a
plausible
pretext for connecting the progress of political freedom
with the spreading of religious indifference, if not absolute
unbelief.
In the present state of human intellect, the middling orders
of people here, who see the works of those writers I have just
enumerated publicly sold by the most orthodox booksellers,
and publicly bought by the most orthodox people (bishops and
all), naturally think they have a right to read these matters
in books adapted to their taste and capacity. Like the
gravedigger
in Hamlet, they exclaim, It is a shame, that great
folks shall have countenance to drown or hang themselves,
more than common christians. Accordingly, they claim the
privilege of incurring the same risk as to the future, that their
superiors so beedlessly encounter. The higher orders, on the
contrary, seem to think that these books come under the class
of luxuries, to which the other classes have no right to aspire.
They are delicacies only calculated for the most refined palates,
and must not be prostituted to the uses of the vulgar. While they
do not hesitate to purchase and read the ribaldry of Rabelais
and Swift, as well as the dangerous heresies of Collins and
Hume, they prosecute the printers and purchasers of Paine,
and sentence Mr. and Mrs. Carlile, Miss Mary Ann Carlile,
and half-a-dozen more, to what, in fact, amounts to perpetual
imprisonment, for selling a twopenny pamphlet. Of those
guilty of these inconsistencies, what can we say, except that
they must be either the greatest hypocrites on earth, or the
most disinterested of human beings, since they heedlessly
subject
themselves to a danger which they punish others for daring
to encounter? They had better be consistent, however, like
the great Mecnas of Germany, who honestly confesses his
motives, and has made abundance of regulations to prohibit
the introduction of Voltaire, Hume, Gibbon, and various others
whose works have ever since been not only more plenty, but
also more read, in the empire, than they were before. This
was just what might have been foreseen by all persons gifted
with the faculty of growing wise by experience.
As an abstract proposition, nobody ever denied that
prosecution
had any other effect, than to render opinion more
obstinate
in matters of religion.
For conscience is a thing you know,
Like to a mastiff dog;
Which, if tied up, so fierce he'll grow,
He'll bite his very clog.
And yet, no government of modern days but our own, ever
acted upon this universal experience. On the contrary, they
have ever proceeded upon the supposition, that they could do
what no other had ever done before, and cemented by
oppression
,
what, if let alone, would very probably have, in a few
years, crumbled to pieces.
LETTER XV.
Dear Brother
,
London.
Mr.
, who, in consequence of his extensive
dealings
with the United States, is sometimes partly civil to us
Americans, amused me lately with an account of the
anniversary
dinner of the  Society, to which he is
one of the subscribers, and which is honoured by having his
Grace of  for its patron. The dinner was given at the
Old London Tavern, where there is a capital cook, and the
fare equal to any in the city. Indeed, Mr.  seemed,
as I thought, rather to countenance a suspicion, that if it were
not for the bond of good fellowship and good eating at these
places, most of these societies would soon fall to the ground.
The anniversary dinners are, he says, however, aided by the
honour of an association with their Royal Highnesses, who
patronize these societies by always coming to the dinners, and
by the particular care always taken to record their
proceedings
,
as well as the presence of their Royal Highnesses in the
public papers. This dinner cost some three or four hundred
guineas; and was so excellent, that, I am assured by Mr.
that the venison and iced Champagne so wrought
upon several present, that they actually subscribed nearly the
amount of the price of a ticket to the charitable fund. He
likewise hinted, that there are not a few of these
subscriptionpeople
,
who thus unite charity and economy with the
gratification
of their appetites, and under cover of the first, escape
the imputation of gluttony and hard drinking. By this you
are not to understand any imputation on the  of
, Lord , or either of the R D,
who are extremely liberal in their attendance on the
anniversary
dinners. Not one of these, Mr.  assured me,
indulged in any indecorum of speech, or extravagance in
drinking, on this occasion; but whether this proceeded from
a habit of temperance, or an untoward accident, which took
place shortly after the cloth was removed, must be left in
doubt.
You will understand, my dear brother, that no mission can
be sent to India, no poor people relieved, nor any poor children
put to a charity school, unless there be a good dinner, and
plenty of wine consumed, as a sort of modern christian libation
to the goddess of charity. So universal is this practice of
eating and drinking for the benefit of the souls of the Brahmins,
and the bodies of the English, that it is computed the
consumption
at these feasts would go a considerable way in
relieving
the poor of the nation. In no two places, I am told,
do they keep up this classical mode of making libations more
piously and charitably, than at the meetings of the
and the Society for the Suppression of Vice and Immorality,
at which last they generally drink eighteen bumper toasts, to
set a good example to tavern tipplers and the rising generation.
In brief, nothing of this kind can be done without a good
dinner, which is a
sine qua non
with the R D and
my Lord , for which the latter is rather more
tenacious
than he was for the
sine qua non
at the treaty of Ghent.
Not one of the R D will patronise a society that does
not give a famous anniversary dinner, with plenty of iced
Champagne.
You are to understand, that these dinners are not given to
the poor people belonging to those institutions, but to the
directors
,
and not unfrequently out of the charitable fund. But
the grand object is gained. His , who is himself
a pauper, supported by public bounty, gets an excellent dinner,
and is complimented for eating it; the stewards and directors
get their names in the newspapers, and the whole affair
redounds
wonderfully to the credit of their charity! Oh, but
say they, our example at least is beneficial. The example of
the hypocrite can never inspire others with a sincere love of
virtue. On the contrary, as hypocrisy is never consistent
throughout, it is much more likely to injure the cause of virtue
by the frequent display of vices irreconcileable with its own
pretensions. Those, who give charity with one hand, and
gripe the hard earnings of the poor with the other, will more
probably do harm rather than good by their example.
In conformity with this truly charitable custom, after the
business had been gone through, that is to say, after nothing
had been done and a vast deal said, we (I use the language of
Mr. ) sat down to one of the most enormous dinners
I ever saw; the Lord Mayor's feast was nothing to it. Every
body was delighted with the condescension of the duke, and
the bishops sustained their ancient reputation for abstinence at
dinner. His grace of  undertook to prove, that
ignorance was the source of all crimes, but was interrupted
by a candidate for one of the livings in his grace's gift with,
your grace must except the crime of forgery. The joke
occasioned a smile even from Sir  , who is
a very serious man, owing to the vast many murders he hath
committed secundum artembut the luckless wit, in the
opinion
of the company, had lost all chance for the living.
Matters went on swimmingly, and all the children,
including
those of the   , `bastards and all,' were in
a fair way of being well educated, when the drinking of toasts
began. The first was `the king,' which was pronounced by
the waiter, who acted as toast-master, with infinite devotion,
and drank with still greater, especially by his grace of
and the bishops. This was of course a bumper toast. A
little
after the toast-master bawled out `the queen and the rest
of the royal family,' at which the whole company was struck
dumb, and they all stared as if the hand-writing had been seen
on the wall. `Treason'
looked
his , `radicalism'
looked his grace of , while poor Sir  ,
I think it was, jumped up and snatched the list of toasts out
of the waiter's hands, who was now suspected of being at
least one of the Cato-street conspirators. The toast was there
at full length, but the author and the hand-writing remain
unknown
even unto this day, although the Constitutional
Society
,
aided by the Bridge-street Association, were busily
employed
in ferretting out the traitor, who will certainly be
hanged if caught. The poor waiter has been discharged, I
understand, and two government spies sent to watch his
motions
,
so that if there be any virtue in perjury, I think he is in
a fair way to the gallows.
This unlucky incident of the toast spoiled one of the finest
commencements to a pleasant drinking bout I ever saw; it
destroyed
all harmony and confidence; each man now looked
on his next neighbour as a radical, and , who
drank the toast most loyally, were eyed with marks of jealousy
and suspicion. The drinking now flagged, the company began
to deal in forced laughs, and several excellent jokes had
already fallen dead under the table, when his Royal Highness
thought proper to retire, and was shortly followed by the rest
of the company. Owing to this untoward accident, the guests
all went home sober, a thing, I am told, that has not occurred
at an anniversary dinner of a charitable society here, within
the memory of man. What rendered this toast so much more
awkward and ill-timed, was, that it came in the very nick
when the name of   was to have been given, and
had already cleared his throat, and adjusted
himself for a speech, in reply to the compliment, as is
customary
on such occasions. He was actually on his legs, when
the name of the queen knocked him fairly down on his chair,
from whence he rose no more until his final departure.
I should certainly not have mentioned this ludicrous
incident
,
or given this ludicrous turn to the whole business, had I
not ample reason for doubting the sincerity of the great leaders
in these institutions for curing all the wants, healing all the
sores, and reforming all the vices of mankind in England, by
eating anniversary dinners. But I have seen and see enough
every day to convince me, that these innumerable societies for
bettering the condition of the poor, are, nine out of ten, the
offspring of a great and general plan of the present
monopolists
of all the property and patronage of this kingdom, for
bringing the common people into a state of abject dependence,
and thus depriving them, not only of the power, but the will,
to assert their constitutional rights. In the ages of
ecclesiastical
tyranny, the people were reconciled to the monopoly of
the church by distributions of alms from the monasteries, which
converted them into idle and dissolute beggars; and now, in
the age of expiring antiquated abuses in government, the same
means are resorted to. The property of the country, if even
tolerably distributed, would be amply sufficient to make the
tenantry farmers instead of beggars; but as this is at present
quite out of the question, it is thought a good stroke of policy
to reconcile them to their fate, by inviting them to poor-houses,
or soup-houses, to eat the miserable pittance of charity. Thus
these new and increasing charities are nothing more than links
in the chain, by which the people are kept in a state of
degrading
dependence on the rich, and taught to be grateful to the
benefactor, who takes pounds from the produce of the
labouring peasant in tithes and rents, and gives them pennies
in charity.
Charity, however, as it would seem, is no longer the modest,
unobtrusive, blessed minister, who walked forth in secret and
in silence, alone and in darkness, to solace the wants of
deserving
sufferers. She must be treated with anniversary
dinners
,
complimentary toasts, and puffs innumerable in the
newspapers
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. n
and magazinesin short, she is become a mere political
engine to enslave a whole people, by inuring them to habits of
abject dependence, and making them fit only for what they
will soon become.
I grant you, brother, that when I see the rich, the clergy,
and the nobility liberally contributing to these societies, it
seems little less than wicked to doubt their motives. Yet let
me not be deterred from questioning motives and actions,
directly tending to corrupt and debase mankind. Half the
evils of this world are produced by the abuse or
misapplication
of a good thing to a bad purpose. The delicacy which
shrinks from detecting hypocrisy in whatever garb, whether of
charity or religion, is treason to mankind.
It is a fact which nobody, except Mr. Vansittart, can or will
deny, that a great portion of the present distress, in this
country
,
arises from taxation, rents, and tithes, combined. What
then should be the great object of those who are really
animated
with a pure and disinterested passion for the good of
their fellow-countrymen? Certainly to diminish as far as
possible
these burthensto adapt the amount of rents and tithes
to the present depressed state of agriculture and manufactures.
They would, at least such is my humble opinion of
philanthropy
,
large, comprehensive, practical and efficientthey
would, in their capacity of legislators, resist, on all occasions,
every attempt to lay any additional burthens on the peoplethey
would use every effort within the limits of rational economy,
to diminish the expenditures of government; and, if clergy
or landholders, gradually relinquish a portion of tithes, and
lower the rents of their poor tenants, already bowed to the
earth by taxes, that eat the coats from their backs and the food
from their tables.
With respect to those numerous charitable schools established
of late years, they are, for the most part, intended for little
else than mere means of strengthening particular sects, by
bringing up the children educated by them, in the tenets of
the church, under whose patronage the school happens to be
placed. Thus the church of England has its schools supported
by what by courtesy is called charity, but at which no child is
admitted, whose parents will not consent to its being educated
in the tenets and forms of this particular church. This is also
the case with the dissenters, the methodists, and every other
denomination, whose different charity schools are exclusively
devoted to the education of religious proselytes, and, for the
most part, beyond doubt, originated in the spirit of jealousy,
rivalship, and esprit du corps. Within a few years past more
than one plan of national education has been defeated by the
jealousy of the established church, which saw, or fancied it
saw, in them, the seeds of danger to its predominating
influence
;
and it is now well understood, that Mr. Brougham
has abandoned his great scheme for rendering education general
in this country by national patronage, through the opposition
of the dissenters, who, it seems, with all their horrors of
ignorance
,
had rather the people should remain ignorant, than give
to the established church, and the government which is
incorporated
with it, the means of making proselytes through the
medium of national schools. Thus you see, brother, what is
really the honest truth, that charity here, as elsewhere, often
covers a multitude of sins, and takes care to look sharp
through religious spectacles, before she will contribute a
penny.
How different is this from OUR DEAR LITTLE NEW ENGLAND;
of which every man who drew his first breath there, feels the
prouder, the more he sees of the rest of the world. There
education is the general property of the whole people; and
the poorest child of the poorest man that breathes
our
air,
receives
his education without feeling it as a degradation,
because
he has paid his little portion for this purpose to the state,
and is as much entitled to the benefits of the establishment as
the richest person in the country. Neither parent nor child is
obliged to profess or abjure any particular creed, or to belie
their consciences under the penalty of living in utter ignorance;
nor does the meanest urchin ever feel the degrading
consciousness
,
that he is beholden to the charity of strangers for the
nurture of his mind. Well may our New England people
boast of this distinction, which is peculiar to themselves, and
long may they resist any and every attempt to prop up a
particular
church, or strengthen a particular sect or party by the
establishment of charity schools, where the test of admission
is a religious creed, and its consequences but too often a
confirmed
and base-born habit of perpetual dependence on charity,
for what every one ought to rest upon his own exertions to
supply.
This country plumes itself upon its superiority over all
others in charities, and urges its pretensions with an arrogance
that cannot fail of provoking a scrutiny into the motives for
these boasted establishments. Those who make the greatest
claims upon our admiration, must expect to be tried by motives
as well as actions; and the people, who are ever boasting of
their virtues, will certainly, sooner or later, be convicted of
hypocrisy. I cannot easily bring my mind to comprehend the
purity of that charity, which racks the industrious out of
pounds, and gives away pennies to the idle and thriftless. I
cannot believe in that benevolence or generosity, which gives
a trifle in alms, for the purpose of reconciling the people to its
insatiable monopoly of all the rest. In short, when I see
hardened profligates, who live in the daily violation of social
and moral duties; inexorable landlords, who are every day
distressing their tenants for rent; and inflexible parsons, who
will not forego a little of their tithes, contributing at public
meetings to societies for propagating morality and religion,
and relieving distress, it is impossible to help taking it for
granted, that the first seek to cover their debaucheries, the
latter their extortions, under the sacred mantles of piety and
benevolence.
LETTER XVI.
Dear Brother
,
London.
I used
to go often to the theatres here, until I grew tired of
their abominations. The dramatic art is certainly at the lowest
ebb in this country, owing to a variety of causes. The first is
the indifference of the fashionable world, who, one and all,
prefer to go to sleep at the Italian opera, to sitting out one of
Shakspeare's best plays: the second cause, I apprehend to be
the bigotry of a considerable portion of that class, which
furnished
a vast many spectators to the theatres. I mean the
respectable middling class, many of whom will not go to the
play because they are told it is immoral; and many for no
other reason, than because it is no longer fashionable. It
actually smacks of radicalism to go often to the theatre.
For these, and other reasons of less extensive operation, it
happens, that except when a new well be-puffed actor; a well
be-puffed play, by some well be-puffed author; or some monster
attracts them, the theatres are but little visited by fashionable
people. The drama is no longer a fashionable topic of
conversation
;
and the man who ventured to introduce the name
of Shakspeare into the best society, would, beyond doubt, be
voted a great bore by the Corinthians and the young ladies of
ton. The theatres are consequently in possession of the vulgar,
who can relish nothing but spectacles or broad caricatures;
country gentry that come to town, and are taken thither by
their fashionable friends, because it is a sort of out of the way
place, where their awkwardness and old-fashioned dresses
cannot
disgrace them; and strangers, driven thither by that
desperate
fiend, Ennui, a native of London, though baptized
in French, who hovers night and day over this cave of
spleen. These last, whatever they may think or say on the
subject, can have little or no influence in correcting the taste of
the town.
The result is as might be expected. The taste of the mob
must be consulted, as by the mob the theatres are principally
supported. Every species of monster, moral and intellectual,
two-legged and four-legged, riots on the stage. Horses, dogs,
cossacks, elephants, camels, and dromedaries, are the heroes of
the drama, so that I have often been tempted to cry out with
the excellent mayor of Quinborough,
Give me a play without a beast, I charge you.
These exhibitions of quadrupeds take precedence over all
others, and command the most outrageous plaudits of the
discriminating
audience. The next in public attention is the
melo-drame, where the passions are expressed by the fiddlers,
and the author is saved the trouble of attending to such low
matters. All he has to do is to produce striking situations, at
all hazards, at every risk of probability, and in defiance of
common sense. After these comes the legitimate comedy, as
the excellent critics call it, which owes all its effect to a
drunken Irishman or sailor, two or three non-descript and
original monsters not to be found on the earth, nor in the waters
under the earth; a smart hero, compounded of the opposite
extremes
of harem-scarem imprudence and profound sentiment,
together with a sentimental young lady, always ready to make
a fool of her parents. The dialogue must consist in cant
phrases, gross slang, offensive double-entendre, and inflated
sentiment on the part of the young ladyas also her lover,
whenever he has time to be in love. A fourth class of plays,
very much approved of by John Bull at present, are those
not absolutely written by any body. They consist of the
united labours of the scene-painters, the machinists, the
scene-shifters
,
and the Great Unknown, whose works are
regularly
dramatised by an industrious journeyman playwright,
called Nathaniel T. They are made up of all the most
striking incidents of the novel or poem, crowded as thick as
hops, and jumbled together pretty much at random. The
whole machinery of these farragoes is held together by the
fiddlers
,
who, whenever the playwright is at his wit's ends, or
on the verge of absurdity or impossibility, flourish their bows,
and thunder away in the very nick of time, while the lucky
wight escapes under their cover to the next incongruity. The
audience, which in London always goes to sleep while the
music is playing, forgets what came last, and the next scene
commences with all the advantages of an utter oblivion of the
past. The nice taste of the mob is thus perfectly satisfied, in
witnessing a quick succession of striking incidents, without the
necessity of those fatiguing efforts to make them appear
probable
,
that have thrown such obstacles in the way of many
dramatic authors. The most illustrious of these domestic
manufacturers of second-hand trumpery is Mr. Nathaniel
T aforesaid, whom the Great Unknown calls my
friend, Mr. T; a proof, in my opinion, that the aforesaid
Unknown is a very good-natured knight, or he would not call
a man his friend who had committed so many assassinations
upon his Muse. Saving this gentleman, I know of no other
distinguished comic writers here at present. There are several
that write excellent farces in five acts, however, which please
the public taste just as well, and better, than a Sheridan or a
Moliere.
Tragedy, who has certainly more lives than a cat, and has
been daggered and ratsbaned at least a dozen times within the
last twenty years, has lately, it is said, revived here with great
splendour. Mr. Walker has written the tragedy of Wallace;
Mr. Sheil, that of Damon and Pythias; Mr. Haynes, that of
the Bridal Night; and Lord Byron, as distant rumour states
rather obscurely,
four
new ones, only one of which is yet before
the public. That I presume you have read, as I perceive it has
been republished in the United States. Of the other three I
know nothing, except what has leaked out from persons lately
arrived from Italy. One, it is hinted, is antediluvian, another
Asiatic, and the third Italian. His lordship, in addition to
these, has, it is said, written his own life, besides a poem,
called, I know not what, for it is only rumour as yet. He has,
I should think, rather too many irons in the fire to do any one
of these jobs as it ought to be done; and I fear is frittering
away his genius, by lending it alternately, or, as it would seem,
at one and the same time, to the most lofty and the most
frivolous
objects. It is stated that he intends to give his biography
to the first lyric poet of the age, who has already sold it to
Mr. John Murray for two thousand guineas. Whether this
first lyric poet of the age be Mr. Southey, Mr.
Wordsworth
,
or Mr. Thomas Moore, I cannot determine; for each
of these has his respective admirers, aye, and critics too, who
will not give up a hair's breadth of their opinions. With
respect
to the two thousand guineas, I do not believe in one
quarter of it; for it is one of the secrets of the excellent art of
puffing here, to circulate accounts of the enormous sums paid
by booksellers for their copyrights. The enlightened public,
which always applies the Hudibrastic criterion, and estimates
the value of a thing at what it will bring, will run after a two
thousand guinea book, when they would run away from one of
ten pounds. The admirers of genius here have never purchased
a copy of Milton's Paradise Lost, since they found out he
was a republican, and sold his poem for twelve or twenty
pounds.
Another of the accoucheurs, who assisted at the late new
birth of a tragedy, is known to the Muses by the name of
Barry Cornwall. For some unknown cause he is a great
favourite of the Edinburgh Review, which has for some time
past been preparing the way for giving him a
run
upon the
town. He first published some smaller pieces of poetry, which
were praised by the reviewer. He then felt the public pulse
with some fragments of a tragedy, which were also praised by
the reviewer. Then, after a vast deal of preliminary puffing,
and appeals to public curiosity, the new tragedy of Mr. Barry
Cornwall, which was to establish a new era of the drama, was
acted before the discriminating mob, which constitutes a
London
audience. The Literary Gazette, and a few other
half-crown
critics, attempted to maintain its reputation; but it did
not obtain a run, as was expected. It is by no means equal to
our countryman Payne's tragedy of Brutus, which is quite as
original as Mirandola, and, in the opinion of the best judges
here, much superior to any tragedy brought out within several
years past.
But the most popular of all those inspired writers, who have
lately assisted at the resurrection of tragedy, is Mr. Maturin,
an Irish clergyman, who is, in the region of fiction, what
Counsellor Phillips is in that of law. There is certainly some
of the smoke of genius in this writer, and where there is smoke,
they say, there must be fire: but it seems to be a sort of clumsy,
unpurposed, and indiscriminate faculty, engendered in horrors,
and nestled in the same cradle with the great raw head and
bloody bones of the nursery. It seems always labouring with
some mighty godhead, and yet produces nothing but shapeless
monsters. Devoted to a mere accumulation of horror upon
horror, extravagance upon extravagance, his efforts seem those
of the cyclop, Polyphemus, the result of energy and blindness
combined. His genius appears, in fact, entirely devoted to the
salutary purpose of exciting a people, like the citizens of
London
,
the genteeler portion of whom are so used to
boxing-matches
,
and the lower classes to executions, that their blunted
sympathies can only be awakened on the stage by the most
disgusting
exhibitions of extravagant horrors.
Mr. Maturin always has his pockets full of daggers and
ratsbane
;
and not content, like
Bob Acres
, with killing a man a
week, murders away in every page, like a perfect Jack Ketch
in tragedy. Then his characters are always insuperably
melancholy
or ineffably mad, without ever, on any occasion, either
thinking, feeling, or expressing themselves like the people who
inhabit this humble earth. I should take it that he had made
an excursion to the planet Mercury, or some other in the near
neighbourhood of the sun, and there studied nature sublimated
to hissing hot, at the same time that his brain became heated
to the salamander temperament, We have convulsions;
murders
by dagger and poison; ravings, writhings, gnashings of
teeth, and extremes of all kinds, which are the mere ordinary,
every-day amusements of his characters; and from beginning
to end, not one of them is sufficiently cool to act like a person
in his sober senses for half a minute together.
But it would appear, my dear brother, that these blustering,
poisoning, daggering, and ratsbaning tragedies are not only
eminently fitted for the audience, but actually seem
manufactured
on purpose for the actors who are to perform them.
These last are eternally in a fever or a fidget, just like the
author. Their muscles are always in a busy convulsive motion,
and their eyes, as it were, starting out of their heads, like the
honest captain in Italy, who got what he called a dd
painted snowball in his mouth. They rage, roar, grin, and
skip about like so many mad harlequins; and it is worth a great
deal to see one of them fight a battle and die on the stage.
The English, with all their humanity, you know are fond of
boxing-matches, cock-fighting, and bull-baiting, except when
they see these things abroad, when their tourists always write
down their people brutes, or something equally complimentary.
Nothing, therefore, except the wild beasts, delights them half
so much at the play, as seeing Richard and Richmond,
Macbeth
and Macduff, Hotspur and Harry, fight like bull-dogs or
bruisers. They appear to enjoy every imaginary thrust, pretty
much in the spirit of an Indian banqueting upon the tortures of
a prisoner at the stake; and they would never forgive an actor
if he suffered himself to be killed like a Christian man, by the
first thrust through the body. But the dying is the triumph of
the art, and occasions equal satisfaction with an execution at
Tyburn, The hero must not be less than a quarter of an hour
about it. He must roll and tumble about the stage, like one in
a fit of the cholic, and at the last pang give himself a flip-flap
like a flounder, and fall flat on his back, as stiff as buckram. If
he do not lie in this way, John Bull will set about demolishing
the playhouse directly.
I have seen the critics convulsed with ecstacy, and the
whole house in a roar of delight, at a death-scene of Roscius
Kean. On receiving his first wound, he doubled himself up
like a tobacco worm, and announced the accident with a
broad grin. But he fell to again with most resolute courage.
Anon he received another poke, which caused him to stagger
and fall upon one knee, where he delighted the audience with
various displays of determined valour, grinning terribly all
the while. On receiving the third push, he wheeled round,
staggered, stamped, and fenced with the air like a blind game
cock, until finally he received a
coup de grace
, which caused
him to jump up two yards, and fall down in the most affecting
manner. Now, heaven be praised! thought I, the man is
dead at last. But I was out in my reckoning, for then began
the cream of the affair: the rollings, the contortions, the
gnashings
of teeth, the bitings of the dust, the gropings about for the
sword, and, finally, the great flip-flap which crowns all. I
swear to you, brother, one of these first-rate actors is as hard
to kill as our Missouri bears, which, it is said, are so tenacious
of life, that a bullet or two through the vitals is a mere
fleabite
.
Now, if the result of this terrible battle were not
perfectly
well known to every one of the audience beforehand, at
least, to a great majority of them, one might suppose, that
the intense interest it excited was simply the effect of a high
state of suspense and anxiety to see which of the combatants
would be victorious. But they all know perfectly well, that
Macduff will kill Macbeth; and Richmond, Richard; so that
it can only originate in that innate love of bloodshed, which is
gratified even with a mere sham battle and fictitious death.
Comic acting, like Comedy herself, is on a scale still inferior
to that of tragic acting. The real fine gentleman is no more,
either in real life here, or in the comedies or comedians of the
present time, unless Mr. Elliston may be called an exception.
In the room of those sprightly wits and courageous coxcombs,
who give such charms to the elder plays, we now see a
miserable
specimen of a modern Corinthian, stupid as the author
himself, and depending entirely for endurance on the size of
his neckcloth, the enormity of his costume, and a few cant
phrases, equally destitute of meaning and wit. The rest
depends
upon the actor, who is obliged to animate the skeleton,
by every exertion of the powers of grimace and buffoonery.
The broad vulgarity, mixed up with incongruous and
exaggerated
feeling, as its contrast, by which the comedy of the
present day is characterised, is equally at war with genteel
humour
and sprightliness, as well as natural, unaffected
sentiment
.
It is the exertion of an exhausted genius, fostered
by a worn-out taste. The actors must, of course,
accommodate
themselves to the poverty of the age, and bring their
powers
down to the dead level of dramatic degradation. Besides,
they have no heart to exert themselves, after seeing a
Newfoundland
dog, or an elephant, greeted with applauses on the
stage, that in a better age would have only fallen to the lot of
a Garrick, a Betterton, a Cibber, or an Abingdon.
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. o
It is impossible to compare the French stage with the English
at this period, without being forcibly struck with the entire
superiority
of the
Theatre Franais
, which is devoted to the
preservation of the national taste, over either of the London
theatres. At the former, I always found an audience, refined,
decorous, quiet, and attentive. Every noise was promptly
repressed by the sentiment of the house, and every indecorum
immediately arrested by a burst of indignant feeling, which
the most hardy insolence or determined profligacy cannot
withstand
.
The costume of the actors, while accommodated, in
the most scrupulous manner, to the age and people to which
the characters appertained, was totally divested of all tinsel
and glitter: the scenery and decorations were always in the
most chaste and appropriate style; nor did I ever see an instance
of the Birmingham brilliancy, with which Mr. Kean sometimes
dazzles a London audience. The taste of the vulgar is never
appealed to at the
Theatre Franais
, by exhibitions of wild
beasts; nor are the menageries emptied of their four-footed
tenants, for the purpose of giving a zest to an intellectual
banquet
.
There is no puffing in newspapers and play-bills, nor is
the public ever assured by an anonymous friend that the
spectacle
will be entirely superb. The audience judges for itself,
and the decision is seldom, if ever, reversed; because it consists
of the most enlightened people of the capital. In short, there
is a total absence, a studied rejection, of all those impudent
quackeries, and unblushing impostures, to which the theatres
here, continually resort to inveigle the mob into their toils.
Nothing but the legitimate drama is admitted on the stage of
the
Theatre Franais;
nor would it be possible for the taste
of the polite audience to be brought to endure the profanations
nightly exhibited on the London boards.
LETTER XVII.
Dear Brother
,
London.
When
I have nothing else to attract my attention, which is
pretty often the case in this very dull city, I amuse myself
with attending the debates in parliament, that are sometimes
interesting from the subjects under discussion. In this way,
I have had an opportunity of hearing the ablest speakers, on
topics that afforded the best opportunities for the display of
their talents. On a late occasion, in a question connected with
African slavery, (a fruitful subject for declamation) Mr.
Wilberforce
,
Mr. Brougham, Sir James Mackintosh, Lord
Londonderry
,
and several others, made their best figure. Each
in turn complained of the encouragement given to the slave
trade by many of the European powers, in possession of
colonies
in the West Indies, and at the same time reluctantly
acknowledged
,
that our abandoned Republic was the only
government that heartily and in good earnest co-operated with
them in their efforts to prevent it.
Humanity, when in its pure state, and uncontaminated by
any mixture of interest or passion, is a widely extended and
comprehensive feeling. It comprehends not merely one
colour
,
one nation, and one quarter of the globe, but the whole
human race in a greater or less degree. To oppress one
people
,
and at the same time affect great commiseration for
another, is not humanity, but hypocrisy. It is assuming a
cloak for some interested purpose; either to impose upon
the credulity of the world for objects of gain or ambition, or
to prop up a falling reputation. If this government were
really and sincerely actuated by a principle of humanity, not
altogether confined to the colour of the epidermis, why
has it lately permitted the Mussulmen to exercise the most
cruel outrages on the Greeks; to carry on a war of
extermination
against Christians, who believe in the same Saviour as
the people of England? Why did not Lord Strangford, the
English ambassador at the Porte, while dining with the Grand
Seignior, an honour never before conferred on a christian dog,
and basking in the sunshine of Ottoman favourwhy did he
not take the opportunity to interfere to prevent the
indiscriminate
massacre of christians, men, women, and children?
Why?because he enjoyed this very favour at the price
of giving them up to the butcher  at the price of
refusing
admission on board the English vessels in the
Archipelago
,
to those christian Greeks that fled from the
Mussulman
tyrant, who had issued a declaration that their
existence
could no longer be tolerated  and from the very
first, siding with Mussulman executioners against christian
victims; and the issuing of a declaration, prohibiting the
Ionians, who are under English protection, from assisting their
countrymen upon pain of deathat the price of giving an
English escort to Turkish ships, loaded with men and
stores, for the purpose of bringing a christian people to the
sabre and the bowstring of an infidel oppressorin short, at
the price of abandoning all the obligations of justice,
humanity
,
and religion.
Why did not Lord Strangford, at this auspicious moment,
when the existence of the Ottoman power depended on the
diversion
made by England and Austria, stipulate with the
Turk for the abolition of the trade in human flesh, which is
carried on in all parts of his empire, and under which
thousands
of WHITE CHRISTIAN SLAVES are every day sold in the
markets of every Turkish city? A glorious opportunity
offered
itself to establish the reputation of British humanity
beyond all question, by a stipulation in favour of white
christian
slaves, similar to that in behalf of black pagan ones.
The interests of humanity would be better served by the former
than by the latter. I have no particular disposition to
question
the motives of Mr. Wilberforce, in his long and
persevering
efforts to procure the abolition of the African slave trade;
but whatever were his motives, I cannot but be of opinion,
that by making slaves more valuable in the colonies than they
were before, he has offered temptations of profit, more than
equivalent to the difficulties thrown in the way of the trade.
But the best men are apt to overlook obvious consequences in
their headlong zeal to benefit mankind. Good intentions are
common enough; but the wisdom to direct them to practical
good is seldom their companion.
The better sort of members, such as Mr. Brougham,
Mr. Wilberforce, Sir James Mackintosh, and others, are
exceedingly worthy, useful, and able men. They discuss
some questions with a sagacity and extent of research, highly
honourable to themselves and to the country, reminding me
not unfrequently of Mr. , Mr. ,
Mr. , and others of the late members of our congress.
But shall I venture upon the heresy? Shall I dare, in the face
of old habits, prejudices, and opinions fostered by education,
strengthened by books, and the example of all around you, to
assert, that these men are not equal to the orators just named?
And yet this is as true as that you are alive. With the
exception
of Mr. Canning, there is scarcely the shadow of an orator
in the house of commons; and the house of lords is, beyond
all doubt, the most sleepy place in England, except the Italian
opera and Mr. Campbell's lectures.
Mr. Brougham is a laborious speaker. To me there appears
something somewhat grotesque in his attempts at impassioned
oratory, wherein he occasionally displays his zeal and warmth
in contortions of face and figure nearly approaching to the
ludicrous
.
He has an iron face and an iron figure, both equally
divested of grace or majesty, nor does his action or expression
make amends for these deficiencies of face and person. Yet
his habits of laborious investigation and research, his extensive
range of memory, and his capacity for intellectual
arrangement
,
make him, on the whole, a useful man of business, and
a powerful pleader; for his eloquence is little more than
special
pleading. As the leader of a party in the house of
commons
,
he is at most, however, but second rate. He is much
better in subjects where mere labour and investigation are
required
,
and is pre-eminent on school committees and
parliamentary
inquiries, where he listens with the patience of a judge,
and sifts the evidence with the indefatigable sagacity of a
thorough-bred lawyer. But I have heard him occasionally on
subjects of foreign policy, wherein the talents of a statesman
are put to the test, and was surprised at his crudeness, as well
as want of extent of idea and accuracy of information. I
certainly
have heard a member from our woods talk more
sensibly
,
and display more statesman-like views of the relation of
European nations with each other, and with the United States.
This lameness, however, in the discussion of great political
questions, seems common to almost all the great men here,
either because those of the opposition do not know the state of
their relations with foreign powers, and those of the cabinet do
not choose to tell; or from a want of that enlargement of
intellect
which is the peculiar characteristic of a great statesman.
I will do the opposition the justice to say, that they cannot, as
they do in our congress, get whatever information they ask
from the executive, and are therefore often obliged to grope in
the dark. But Lord Londonderry certainly is in all the secrets,
as foreign secretary, and he talks like a rebus, seemingly
employing
the whole force of his understanding in withholding,
rather than communicating information. It is quite laughable
to hear the Corinthian members cry, hear, hear! when he
says any thing beyond the comprehension of mortal man. I
certainly never saw a more laborious speaker; but his labour
seems most preposterously employed, not in enlightening his
hearers, but in perplexing their understandings in an equal
degree
with his own, by which means alone he seems to expect
to carry his point. His logic is the logic of a perplexed,
rather
than a profound understanding, and his rhetoric is highly
worthy of his logic. There is a story told here of a
gentleman
,
who, after listening to his lordship for a long time, started
up at length in great haste, and on being questioned where he
was going, replied to the house of peers, to know from
Lord Liverpool what Lord Castlereagh means. His action
is that of a pump-handle when in brisk motion, as you may
have learned from Moore's epigram.
Sir James Mackintosh is, I think, a much better writer than
speaker, although a very powerful orator on the whole. He is
fluent and animated, but too florid and studied to appear
natutural
.
I can hardly tell what he wants to make him a fine
speaker, except it be nature, or that art which supplies its
place in some degree. To read the papers and daily
productions
which record passing events, and confer a nine days
immortality
,
one would suppose Sir James and his compeers
were giants of the race of those who warred against the gods,
with mountains and torrents of intellectual force and eloquence.
But I must again caution you to beware of the deceptions
practised upon us at home, by the monstrous and inflated style,
which it is now fashionable to use in speaking of every thing
rising above mediocrity. The system of puffing is at its most
alarming height in this country, and it is quite impossible for
the mere reader to judge of the merits of any public man.
They must be every thing, or nothingsuperlatively great or
superlatively meanthe perfection of nature and intellect, or
the extreme of littleness and folly.
It is thus that such writers, as the author of Peter's Letters
to his Kinsfolk, and hundreds of similar delineators of
character
,
will speak of Edinburgh reviewers, and Ettrick
shepherds, as if the former were of that order of men, of whom
it is interesting to know, whether they wear short jackets or
long coats in the country, and the latter were a Burns, the
high priest of nature and simplicity, instead of the coarse and
vulgar humourist of Blackwood's Magazine. It is thus, too,
that every person and every thing, which fashion or
party-spirit
idolizes for the moment, is wrought into the lineaments
of sublimity and greatness, while the real and genuine
candidates
for immortality, like Sir James Mackintosh, are
caricatured
by the coarse eulogists, who affect to know what is really
intellectual greatness, and have the consummate audacity to
pronounce sentence of immortality with a degree of
indiscriminate
profligacy, that is quite sufficient to ruin a tolerable
reputation
.
Mr. Canning, for wit, grace, fluency, and satire, is
excellent
;
but he only skirmishes, for the most part, with an
argument
,
and is satisfied to raise a laugh rather than produce
conviction. He is, however, the only man in the house who
can keep the rotten borough-dandies awake during a speech,
with the exception of Lord Londonderry, to whom they are
bound in gratitude, or in hope, to listen, under the penalty of
not getting a good place or pension.
If Mr. Wilberforce was not a pious and good man, I should
say that he cants a little too much, and votes a little too often
with ministers. There is, however, a reason for all things.
Mr. Wilberforce is the political head and oracle of the
methodists
,
who are now a body of very considerable weight and
influence in parliament. I am of opinion there is a deal of
underhand courtship going on between the ministry and
methodist
leaders, the effects of which are seen in leaving out
the queen's name from their liturgy, and the particular
attention paid by Lord Londonderry to Mr. Wilberforce's
opinions on all occasions. The established church begins to
be not a little jealous of this pious intrigue; and it is a fact
well known here, that Mr. Brougham's great national
education
bill was smothered in these mutual fears and antipathies.
The dissenters and methodists, on one side, were afraid that it
would throw into the hands of the established church too great
opportunities of instilling their doctrines into the minds of the
young people; and the established church was dissatisfied, that
the act did not give it a more complete control over the
religious
opinions of those who were to be educated under the
bill. All felt and acknowledged the want of education among
the poorer class; all professed a sincere desire that this want
should be supplied; but religious bigotry, or religious zeal, as
it is politely called, stepped in, and thus condemned the
children
of the poor to ignorance, until they can reconcile these
conflicting interests.
In the mean time the methodists are gathering strength every
day. Their admirable system of worldly wisdom; their
apparent
zeal and sanctity; their watchful industry, not only in
propagating their doctrines, but in stigmatizing those of other
sects, together with the aid which a spirit of fanaticism always
administers in the progress of a new religion, all combined,
have contributed vastly to the increase of their numbers and
influence. If I am not mistaken, the time is not far distant,
when they will either force an union with the established
church, or leave it in a minority. The methodists, and the
methodistical church of England people, are now strong in
parliament, and their force is daily increasing; for you will
recollect, that they have ever refused to be considered as
dissenters
from the church of England, and that there is nothing
in the tests, to which an orthodox methodist may not
conscientiously
accommodate himself.
I feel perfectly satisfied, that the weak, unsteady, and
apparently
unpurposed opposition, is rather detrimental than
otherwise to the progress of reform in this country. The
people
rely upon men who have neither the power, nor, I firmly
believe, the will, to breast the exigencies of the time, but who
are a knot of peddling, tinkering politicians, that talk big,
bluster finely, but are much more afraid of the Tower and the
attorney-general, than of arbitrary power and parliamentary
corruption. They are like your big fish, which are ever the
greatest cowards. Estimating their own importance most
highly, they are the first to run away; while the lesser fry,
confiding in their insignificance, remain behind, are caught,
and cooked for want of higher fare. These men will never
bring about a reform, such as is wanting to the prosperity of
the people of this country. Those who undertake this glorious
object, must not mind fine, pillory, or loss of ears. Nay, they
must, like the noble patriots of our revolution, take the step
that devotes them to death if they fail, to immortality if they
succeed. Even if they fail, from the blood and the ashes of
these unsuccessful victims, arises a host to consummate what
they but began.
Nothing can equal the pretty exchange of complimentary
eulogy, which occurs between the ministers and the opposition,
whenever the question of enlightening foreign nations, teaching
poor children to read, instead of giving their parents a chance
of paying by their labours for their education, and such like
excellent plans, come up. The noble Lord Londonderry
cordially
co-operates with the honourable member; while the
honourable
member seems infinitely delighted at the opportunity
of voting for once on the side of ministers, and extols their
humanity to negroes, instead of boldly and promptly exposing
their hypocrisy, by placing their conduct to the people of
England, Europe, Asia, and America, in contrast with this
simulated humanity, assumed only for the purpose of deceiving
mankind, and cheating the public opinion. Indeed, the
opposition
snatches with such avidity at every opportunity to be
on good terms, and exchange civil speeches, that one cannot
help suspecting they would be happy to consummate a
permanent
union, by surrendering the virgin purity of their patriotism
into the arms of ministerial piety and benevolence. I may
mistake, but in my poor opinion, the good people here stand
but a bad chance for a reform in parliament, or any other
branch of the government, if they depend upon the present
opposition.
Since the time that Mr. Fox led the opposition, there has
been no efficient one in the house of commons, any more than
there have been any true patriots since the days of Russell,
Hampden, and Sidney, who were willing to sacrifice life,
liberty, and a good name, in behalf of the principles of
freedom
.
It would seem, that almost all the stern, inflexible
supporters
of human rights came over to our country, and there
planted the tree of liberty, which would not take root in
England
.
You may form some idea of Sir James Mackintosh's
notions of liberty, when I tell you that in this very debate, to
which I referred in the early part of this letter, he took an
opportunity
to class the United States and Great Britain together,
as two nations mutually sharing the same freedom.
The art of raising the greatest possible quantity of money out
of the people, comprehends the whole mystery of the English
government. As I observed before, they are all very
indifferent
speakers, with the exception of Mr. Canning, and with the
same exception, among the dullest persons in a society over
which the genius of dulness presides. I am aware that there
are two sorts of great menthose who talk wisely, and those
who act wisely. The former are only theoretically or
abstractedly
wise; the latter practically so. It is difficult, indeed, to
tell a man by his talk. I have frequently met with men who
reversed Rochester's epitaph, and who never said a good thing
in their whole lives, yet always acted with the most provoking
wisdom, and always got the better of the great talkers. Still,
it is pretty certain, that no one who talks well can be a great
blockhead; and it is equally clear, I think, that many a great
blockhead has chanced to stumble, or be driven into a system
of policy, the accidental success of which has caused him to
pass for a sage. The present ministers have kept their places,
and lived to see the downfall of Napoleon: but they certainly
were particularly indebted to an early Russian frost, and a
weak opposition in parliament, for their triumphs.
Men of great and splendid talents are quite unnecessary in
the ministry, except when any invasion of the ancient
privileges
of the people is meditated. Then Mr. Canning is put in
requisition, to ridicule his opponents and gloss over the
measure
.
At other times, Mr. Vansittart, or Lord Londonderry,
is just as good as a Madison, or a Hamilton. On occasions of
emergency, they send to France for Mr. Canning, to get Lord
Liverpool, or Lord Londonderry out of a scrape. Feeling, as
it would appear, his own consequence among these dull lords,
Mr. Canning sometimes takes the liberty, as in the case of the
Queen, to retire from the support of a ministerial measure. He
also keeps up a familiar intercourse in France with Anacreon
Moore, the writer of Lascivious Lyrics, as Mr. Adams
aptly calls him; though Moore is not only a public defaulter,
but has likewise made his present majesty quite as ridiculous,
as Peter Pindar did his revered father, George the Third
for whose memory I have a great respect, ever since his
acquittal
,
as set forth in the laureat's immortal poem of
Judgment
.
The taking all these freedoms, shows, that both Mr.
Canning and the ministers feel that they cannot do without him
at a pinch. He is, indeed, now that poor Sheridan is gone, a
first-rate wit, a star in Botia; excellent at a jest, delightful
at a dinner table, but not very happy at alliteration, witness
the unlucky one of the revered and ruptured Ogden.
The ministerial wise-acres begin to suspect, that in putting
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. p
down Napoleon Bonaparte, that mighty schoolmaster of an old
worn out world, they have fallen out of the frying-pan into
the fire. The best politicians of the last hundred years, have
always pointed the jealousies of Europe towards the Russian
empire. But present fears and pressing interests caused the
cabinets of Europe and England to lose sight of future dangers;
and there is not one of these powers, that does not look with
trembling solicitude towards every movement of the emperor
Alexander. The poor pageant, who occupies the throne of
France, has been, for some time, vacillating between a desire
to dissent from the policy of the Holy Alliance, and a fear of
the consequences. I have reason to be persuaded, that the
omission of King George to pay a visit to Paris originated in a
demur on the part of Louis, to a proposition of the British
cabinet in relation to the affairs of Greece and Turkey. Much
difficulty exists in the French cabinet on this head; and I have
but little doubt, that it will lead to a change of ministers, if
not of measures, in France.
The emperor of Austria, what between his fears of Russia,
and of books bound in Russian leather, has no heart, just now,
to attend to his favourite amusement of making sealing-wax.
It is rumoured in the  circle, that he fainted not long
ago at the smell of a book in Russian binding. The king of
Prussia is so busy in warring against the four-and-twenty letters,
and prosecuting authors for telling him the truth, that he has
no time to attend to any thing else. But he is said to have
very uneasy dreams. In fact, I assure you, there never was a
set of poor people in such desperate perplexity, between a
desire
to restrain the projects of Russia, and a fear of the almost
inevitable consequences of a warbankruptcy and revolution.
In the mean time, the Russian government has been at the
same moment negotiating a peace, and making preparations
for war. The Russian armies are at present more numerous
and efficient than those of all Europe besides, and are stationed
on the frontiers of Turkey in such a way, as that
Constantinople
might be taken before the news of hostilities could reach
London. Well may the British ministry tremble if a war take
place. They have nothing left for it, but to swear there is no
danger until the danger arrives, and then set the
Courier
and
Quarterly Review
abusing Alexander like a pickpocket. So
soon as I see this, I shall be sure there is difficulty with Russia;
for it is always the signal for some refractory movements on
the part of a foreign power. The first indication I had of the
probable assertion of its independence by the French
government
,
was from the abusive article in the
Quarterly
, which I
mentioned in a former letter. It is a bull-dog, which is
always set at obnoxious people, before the masters come to
blows.
LETTER XVIII.
Dear Brother
,
London.
This
country has, beyond doubt, a greater proportion of
people without the necessaries of life, or the means of honestly
acquiring them, than any other I have ever visited. I do not
know that they are more positively poor, but they certainly
are so comparatively. A large portion of the labouring class
here possess more actual property, than the same class of
people
in Italy, Spain, and Portugal; but they require more,
because
their taxes are far greater and their habits are different.
In the south of Europe, the people live on grapes, chestnuts,
olives, and other fruits that are plenty and cheap; at night they
can sleep under a tree, or under the canopy of heaven; they
neither want thick clothing nor constant fires in winter; nor is
it necessary they should have a warm and weather-tight house
over their heads. But the labouring Englishman, until of late
years, was accustomed to meat sometimes, and always to bread,
cheese, and beer, in a reasonable quantity. Now, it is
otherwise
with him. He inhabits too a climate humid at all times,
and cold in winter, and cannot sleep in the air, or in an open
hovel, without the risk, if not the certainty, of ruining his
health. It is these and other considerations, that make his
actual situation far worse than the peasant or the labourer in
the south of Europe, although his actual comforts may appear
superior to theirs. Indeed, it cannot be denied, and it is
certainly
not in triumph, but sorrow, that I am compelled to
state, that the poor of this country are now, at this moment,
more wretched, and more numerous, than any where on the
continent of EuropeI believe I may say in the whole world.
It is not uncommon to see in the country towns, thirty, forty,
and fifty people, consisting of stout, hearty labourers, their
wives and children, applying at one time for admission into
the parish poor-houses. It is neither laziness nor improvidence,
that has brought them to this; but the want of employment,
and the exactions of the government and the clergy, which
actually drive them into the poor-house for a refuge. If there
ever were a noble nation sacrificed to the abuses of power; the
extravagance of its rulers; and the patchwork system of
expedients
,
invented by prodigality in the last stage of fatuity
and desperation, it is this nation of Englishmen, who, in the
course of their history, have equalled the Romans in patriotism,
the Greeks in literature, and the Americans in defending their
rights against the encroachments of power. But poverty and
dependence, the offspring of financial swindling and misapplied
resources, have undermined the noble foundation of the national
character, and the superstructure seems crumbling and
corroding
fast away.
This abject poverty is the secret of almost all their mobs,
crimes, and apparently ridiculous inconsistencies, that go near
to deprive them of our sympathy. That they murmur at the
government is because they want bread; that they rise in
mobs, is not that the spirit of Radicalism, but the spirit of
suffering, impels them to violence. That their crimes every
day multiply, and the restraints of a severe penal code become
more and more insufficient to prevent their transgressions, is,
in a great measure, owing to their miserable situation, which
makes a prison no longer terrible; transportation an object of
hope rather than fear; and death itself an alternative hardly
to be dreaded. The other day, a fellow, being sentenced to
fourteen years' transportation, cried out, God bless your
honour, it's just what I wanted.
It is indeed impossible to conceive the capricious unheard of
extravagance of the rich, which actually seems to keep pace
with the increasing miseries of the poor. Every where, except
among a very few of the old-fashioned nobility and gentry, I
see the most wasteful follies, the most unbounded love, nay,
passion, for expensive pageantry and vulgar ostentation. If a
lady of fashion give a party, nothing will satisfy her, unless
fruits equally tasteless and expensive are served up with a
profusion
equally senseless and absurd; and she would be
miserable
for life, if the number and the cost of each were not
advertised in all the fashionable newspapers. The particulars
of her dress, the quantity of diamonds, and the net value of
the lady as she stood in her shoes, must also be published, in
the style of a vender of quack-medicines, while every thing,
which real good breeding and well constituted gentility would
avoid and despise, is said and done, to make her equals envy,
her inferiors despair, and the hungry multitude become more
fully aware of their misery by comparison. It often makes
me smile even in the bitterness of my feelings, to hear the lady
of the gala simpering out, Two guineas a-piece, when asked
the price of such peaches as the pigs run away from in New
England.
This extravagance is held by the adepts in political economy
to be a great national blessing. If, for instance, Madame
Catalani receive a few thousand guineas for singing God
shave
the king, as she always pronounces it, at galas and
concerts, it is all for the good of the people of England,
because
she goes and spends the money in France or Italy, or
invests it in the English funds, where the people have the
pleasure of paying the interest. The great sums in fact, thus
squandered away by the extravagance of the court and
nobility
,
never return to the tenantry, from whom they are
originally
derived. That portion which does return is so long in
coming, that poverty too often gets the start of it. But the
greatest part goes to foreigners, without circulating at all
among the community. Flatterers, dancers, singers, pimps
and a thousand useless, or worse than useless, people,
share the spoil of prodigality, and carry the greatest part out
of the country. It is only those immediately about the court,
or who can gain the patronage of some court sycophant, that
partake of this expenditure, or receive any benefit from it,
either directly or indirectly. England at this moment, and
most especially London, exhibits a striking proof, how little
the boundless prodigality of a court and nobility can
contribute
to the real comfort of the community at large. There is
more extravagance and more misery in London, than in any
other city of the world.
In every country, which has been settled long enough to
exhibit the invariable course of all earthly communities from
rudeness to order, from order to refinement, from refinement to
luxury, and from luxury to ruin, it has always happened, that
the example has been first set among the higher orders. To
them we may trace elegance and refinement, and from them is
derived that example of profligate, luxurious sensuality, which
corrupts the lower orders, and at length ends in the downfall
of states and empires. When therefore the
Quarterly Review
,
and the other stern advocates of despotism, talk of the
ignorance
,
corruption, and wickedness of the lower orders, instead
of deriving all this from Paine's works, Cobbett's tracts, and
Carlile's and Hone's pamphlets, they should tell the honest
truth, that it is the example of the higher orders, that has
descended
to a people, already fitted by their poverty to adopt
the worst models. To a people prepared by education and
example, precept and habit, to look up to princes and nobles;
the fashion which is set them by these is more powerful and
efficacious, than the best moral codes, and the most orthodox
exhortations, enforced by abundance of societies for the
bettering
of mankind.
I do not think it is refining too much, to state, as one of the
causes of petty crime in this country, the mode in which so many
of these cases are presented to the public in the newspapers.
Almost every one of these has a column, and sometimes two,
of reports of cases at the police-offices, for the gratification
of their readers. If, as is very frequently the case, there be
any thing odd or ridiculous in the culprit, or the offence, or the
mode of examination, it never fails to be made still more so by
the witty reporter, who involves the whole affair, magistrate
and all, in fun and frolic. A crime is thus presented to the
reader as a mere joke, an excellent subject for the wit of the
justice, and the amusement of the public. It is divested of
all its turpitude and atrocity, and instead of a serious offence
to society, appears as a subject for jest and laughter. It is to
be remembered, that the principal reading of the lower orders
is confined to newspapers, and that the most interesting
subjects
of vulgar curiosity are the records of crimes and
punishments
.
Now, if courts of justice and culprits are thus made
to furnish subjects of merriment, and crimes become the objects
of joke and ribaldry, it is very easy to be conceived, that those
whose morality is not well fortified, will very likely yield to
the seduction of such pleasant recreation.
If my preceding observations be correct, you will perceive, that
it is scarcely possible there should not be a more than ordinary
degree of turpitude, a greater portion of crime here, than is to
be found among contemporary nations. In France, where the
people are comparatively comfortable, and where the king and
nobility have before them an awful example of the
consequences
of despising the just resentment of millions of human
beings, crimes are diminishing every day. In this country, on
the contrary, where the king and nobility seem to have
forgotten
that they only escaped a similar lesson by the breadth of
a hair, crimes are every day increasing. They are gradually
ascending into the more respectable classes, and descending to
the meridian of childhood. In my occasional attendance at
the Old Bailey, Hatton Garden, Bow Street, Guildhall, and
other places where the police officers hold their state, I have
frequently been shocked to see men and women, evidently well
educated, and whose manners bore testimony to their former
respectability, arraigned for crimes, not the effect of sudden
passion or instantaneous impulse, but of reflection and plan;
during the organization of which the crime and its probable
consequences must have been looked steadily in the face.
Such instances are not, however, frequent; but occurring even
rarely, they point to a state of morals verging towards the last
stage of corruption, or to a state of society, in which the
temptations of poverty are ascending to a higher class than
usual.
My principal object in writing this long letter was to point
out to you the inevitable consequences of a vast disproportion
of wealth, and enormous public burthens, that press the people
down to the dust; of those artificial distinctions of rank, which,
being hereditary, require neither moral nor intellectual
superiority
to preserve them, and become in the end a warrant for
the indulgence of every wanton and capricious impulse of folly
or vice. This inequality of wealth, and these hereditary
distinctions
of rank, enable the possessors to despise the suffrages
of mankind; to insult their poverty with a display of wasteful
extravagance; and to corrupt their morals by examples of
vicious indulgence. These enormous public burthens, the
inattention
of the well-beneficed clergy to almost every thing
but the collection of tithes, together with the profligate
extravagance
of the rich and nobility, have, all combined, gone near
to ruin one of the finest and noblest nations under the sun.
That they are not thoroughly corrupted and debased is a proof
of the excellent materials of which the national character was
composed, At the time, or perhaps just before, our ancestors
came to Plymouth, England might have challenged the world
for inflexible integrity, diffused intelligence, and noble
patriotism
;
nor was there a country in existence where the principles
of civil liberty were more cherished or better understood.
Every day, and every country I visit, add to my affection
for my home, and my attachment to a republican form of
government
.
I am more and more convinced of its intrinsic
superiority over all others, in diffusing a general and equal
happiness
over all; in preventing the permanent and lasting
accumulation
of wealth, which enables one class of men to tread
on the necks of another from generation to generation; and in
destroying that hereditary and low-lived feeling of inferiority,
which debases the mass of the people, and cows the master
spirit of manhood. It is not those who are best paid, or who
wear the most diamonds, that are the greatest men. My Lord
Londonderry, with his thousands and tens of thousands a year,
will never be put on a level with Franklin, in his plain
snuffcoloured
coat; nor will Prince Esterhazy, whose diamonds
made Sir Walter Scott's mouth water, ever reach the level of
the simple majesty of Washington, in his black velvet suit.
The very admiration which is bestowed upon such idle
pageantry
,
not only by the people, but by the most exalted
statesmen
,
and warriors, and divines; the manner in which it is
puffed, not only in newspapers, but in productions that affect
to be literary, all together furnish the most unequivocal proof
of the superior manliness and dignity of the simple
republican
character. So far, therefore, from being ashamed that our
government and its officers cannot afford this effeminate
trumpery
,
we should be proud of it, as a proof that the people are
well governed, since their earnings are not wasted in
boundless
extravagance and childish parade.
LETTER XIX.
Dear Brother
,
London.
In
running the parallel between our government and that of
England, the House of Lords having been, most unaptly as I
think, compared to the Senate of the United States, it may be
neither uninstructive, nor without amusement, to inquire into
the respective points of their resemblance.
To begin with the first that naturally presents itself. The
Senate of the United States is an elective body, the members of
which are chosen for six years. The House of Lords is
composed
of members who sit there for life, and their eldest sons
after them, by the right of hereditary succession. The
members
of our Senate are all equal; there is neither distinction of
rank nor precedence, nor seniority, but what is freely awarded
to merit or talents. In the House of Lords there is, on the
contrary
,
an endless diversity of rank and pretension, which must
obviously tend to destroy, or at least diminish, the feeling of
equality, even where a man is said to be among his peers. In
fact, it is this nice and almost imperceptible gradation of ranks,
the strictness with which it is every where enforced, and the
submission every where paid to it, that constitutes, in my
opinion, the
cement
of every monarchical government.
This system of gradation in the ladder of life is here brought
to great perfection, and its parts adjusted with the nicest
exactness
.
Thus a duke precedes a marquis, in entering a room,
going to dinner, or marching in procession. Besides this, his
mantle has
four guards
, and his coronet has only leaves
without pearls! But even dukes have their degrees; and a
duke of yesterday is entitled to turn his back upon one of
today
,
on all occasions of etiquette.
A marquis, although most noble, carries the badge of
inferiority
in his mantle of only three doublings and a half,
and his coronet of pearls and strawberry leaves, all of a height.
An earl is only right honourable; his mantle has only three
doublings, and his coronet has the pearls raised upon points,
with the leaves low between. A viscount, although right
honourable
too, has only two doublings and a half to his mantle,
and his coronet is only pearled with a row of pearls close to
the chaplet. A baron is right honourable as well as the
viscount; but his inferiority is demonstrated by a mantle with
only two doublings, and a coronet with only six pearls.
You will perceive, by this detail, how the spirit of personal
independence and the noble self-consciousness, which alone
give dignity to man, must be repressed by these outward and
palpable insignia of inferiority, which derive an importance
from habit and custom. Servility to superiors, and supercilious
airs of superiority towards inferiors, together with a miserable
subserviency to those who can bestow on them the privilege of
a cloth of state, or of turning their backs upon those who
before
turned their backs upon them, must naturally result from
such a system of nicely graduated importance. No one, that
ever mixes in titled society, can fail to perceive the relative
importance
accorded to these different ranks, and, more especially,
the airs of superiority assumed by a lady of the old nobility
over an upstart titled dame of yesterday. In fact, the lord or
the lady who marches first of their grade at a coronation, has
all the superiority over those that march at the other end, that
the leader of a herd of buffaloes has over the rest of the rabble
in the rear.
But the privileges of carrying a cloth of state, marching first
in a procession, and having their trains borne by barons',
knights', or esquires' ladies, are not the only ones enjoyed by
the nobility. They possess certain rights and exemptions,
which, it will be perceived, give them a decided advantage
over other subjects of this realm. Their persons are at all
times privileged from arrests, except for contempt of the king,
felony, breach of the peace, or treason. No
capias
can be
sued out against them for trespass or debt; nor can
essoign
lie
against a peer of the realm. In civil causes they are not to be
impanneled upon juries; and in case a peer be returned upon a
jury, there is a special writ for his discharge. They cannot be
bound over to keep the peace, any further than pledging their
honour for that purpose. Contrary to the custom of the lower
house of parliament, they can constitute a proxy to vote for
them during their absence. A peer is not subject to outlawry
in any civil action, nor can any attachment lie against him. In
calling out the
posse comitatus
for the suppression of riots,
peers are exempted from obeying the commands of the sheriff.
The statute of
Scandalum Magnatum
makes it a crime to
raise injurious reports against them, such as in the case of a
commoner could not be punished by law. In many cases the
houses of peers cannot be entered by the officers of justice,
except
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. q
on the authority of a warrant under the king's own hand,
and countersigned by six privy councillors, four of whom must
be peers of the realm. Every peer has what is called the
privilege
of
qualifying
a certain number of chaplains, who, on
receiving a dispensation from their metropolitan, ratified under
the great seal, may hold a
plurality
of benefices. A duke
may qualify six chaplains; a marquis and earl five each; a
viscount four; and a baron three. It is by the exercise of this
privilege of qualifying, that the law with respect to a
plurality
of benefices may be evaded by every priest who can
secure the patronage of a peer.
You will readily perceive by the foregoing, which is a mere
sketch of the privileges and exemptions of the members of the
House of Peers, that it is constituted upon principles essentially
different from our Senate, the members of which are appointed
for only six years, by the representatives of the several states,
and enjoy no other privilege but that which is held in common
with every other representative of the people, and is essential
to the discharge of their public duties, the privilege of
exemption
from arrest during the session of congress, and in going
and returning therefrom. A peer being, it is true, an hereditary
legislator, the general freedom he enjoys from arrest naturally
arises from his being always held to be employed in that
capacity
.
But this, among other features, exhibits more
distinctly
the wide dissimilarity of the two bodies.
That the Senate of the United States stands in a situation,
with regard to the executive and House of Representatives,
analogous to that of the House of Peers in relation to the
king and the House of Commons, is most undoubtedly true.
Its legislative powers, as well as its judicial functions, are, in
many important cases the same. But so long as they are
constituted
upon principles so totally distinct and irreconcileable
so long as the one is hereditary, the other electiveso long as
one is the creation of the king, the other the creature of the
people, it seems undeniable, that nothing but error and
mischief
can result from drawing precedents, in matters of
principle
or politics, from a British House of Peers, for the
imitation
of the Senate of the United States.
There are a few other points which occur to me, as
rendering
this separation of the two bodies still wider. When a
senator
of the United States accepts an office from the executive,
he forfeits his seat, and remains ineligible so long as he
retains
the office. Hence, although the patronage of the
executive
may tempt him to a desertion of his principles
before
he
receives his reward, he remains ever afterwards incapable of
betraying the people in the capacity of their representative.
But it is otherwise in the British House of Peers, where a man
may hold a dozen places at the pleasure of the king, without
forfeiting his seat. In the present House of Peers, there are
somewhere (for I took the trouble to count them) about one
hundred and eighty placemen, who enjoy offices either of
profit
,
or honour, or both. In the United States, a senator, when
he receives the price of his sacrifice of principle, becomes of
no value to the purchaser.
LETTER XX.
Dear Brother
,
London.
You
may form some notion of the resemblance, in point
of substantial reality, between the House of Commons here,
and our House of Representatives, which, in running the
parallel
between the two systems of government, have been
compared
to each other, by the fact, that fifteen thousand voters
return a majority in the former body. There is one nobleman
who sends twelve members, and there are at Birmingham and
Manchester, containing between them upwards of two hundred
thousand inhabitants, that send none. Counties, containing
from one to three or four hundred thousand inhabitants, have
no more weight in the House of Commons, than a borough in
which there are some half-a-dozen voters, who return two
members. Nay, the members from the rotten boroughs are
actually of more consequence in the house, from being
notoriously
articles of sale, and at the command of the highest
bidder; whereas, those from the counties, being sometimes
men of independence and principle, are listened to quietly and
indifferently, and suffered to take their own way, from a
conviction
that there is no use in tampering with them.
The representatives of the boroughs, on the contrary, are
either, for the most part, the proprietors of the boroughs
themselves, their sons, brothers, &c. or they are mere
creatures
of the proprietor; or they are persons who can afford to
bribe high, because they mean to be bribed high in turn; or
lastly, they are persons of political talents, who can get into
parliament only through the patronage of some borough-holder,
who is either a partisan of the minister, and wishes to furnish
him an able supporter, or who expects to make himself of
consequence by setting his great mastiff to bark at him. The
opportunity thus afforded, of getting men of talents into the
House, who would otherwise perhaps not attain a seat, has
been made one great ground of defence to the
boroughsystem
.
There is nothing approaching to, or resembling an equality
in the exercise of the right of suffrage; there is nothing which
approaches to an apportionment of the number of
representatives
to the number of freeholders; there is nothing, in short,
in the system, adapted to those changes which time and
circumstances
produce in every nation, and according to which
its government ought to be modified. Boroughs without trade
or importance, and almost without inhabitants, return
members
to parliament, because they possessed all these some
centuries
ago; while vast cities, which have grown up into
wealth, importance, and numbers, are denied the privilege of
representation, because some centuries ago they were not in
existence. No government, and, least of all, any system of
representation can be applicable to the situation of a people,
where changes of this kind are totally disregarded.
There have been vast and learned dissertations, of late, as
to the question of who voted, and who did not vote, for
members
of parliament in the reign of Henry the Third. The
advocates
of a general distribution of the right of suffrage lay
great stress upon certain equivocal authorities, on which they
found the doctrine of universal suffrage, as respected the
freeman
of England. But then, who were the freemen of England
at that time? As nothing is settled here according to the
enlarged
principles of human rights, or in accordance with those
changes which time inevitably produces in men and things,
resort is always had to ancient precedents, many of them
entirely inapplicable to the present state of England, and to
laws and customs questionable in their existence, or, if not
questionable, no longer founded in reason or expediency. A
jury of antiquaries now decide on the rights of Englishmen.
Hence, it is considered of infinite importance to ascertain the
fact, whether the first parliament of England was originally
the delegated representative of all the freeholders of England.
That this was actually the case appears, both from the very
origin of that assembly, as well as from various other
authorities
.
The peers represent themselves; but as it would be
manifestly
impossible for the people to sit collectively and
legislate
for themselves, they delegated their powers to their
representatives
.
Hence, the common language of the early writers
on the constitution is the unqualified assertion, that every
Englishman is present, either by himself or his representative,
in the English parliament. If this does not mean, that every
English freeholder has a voice in the election of his
representative
,
it means nothing but mockery and nonsense.
The Wittenagemot, the Saxon parliament, and the original
of the English one, was unquestionably an assembly modelled
on those free principles common at that time, and from the
earliest ages, to the northern nations, who, according to
Tacitus
,
were all governed by their own consent alone
De
minoribus
rebus principes consultant, de majoribus omnes
.
Xephiline
also, speaking of the Britons, tells us,
apud hos, populus
magno exparte principatum tenet
. It is true, the feudal
system
,
which succeeded, subverted the ancient freedom of
British and Saxon institutions, yet this does not impeach the
validity of the people's claim to a fair representation in
parlialiament
,
especially in a country where antiquity supersedes
every thing; since the freedom, spoken of by Tacitus and
Xephiline, was far more ancient than the feudal system, which
was established by force and fraud upon its ruins.
What is called
radicalism
here, consists principally in
advocating
,
not exactly universal suffrage, but in giving the right
of voting for members of parliament to all resident
householders
,
paying taxes, as they generally do, to an amount which
one would think fairly entitles them to a vote for those who
enact them. This, you will perceive, is little more than putting
the right of voting for members of parliament on the same
footing
with the right of voting for a member of congress, in most
of the states, at least in very many of them. The great
objection
to this, even with those who think parliamentary reform
indispensably necessary to the security of the government, is,
that it will make the House of Commons a democratic body.
It appears to me, that if that house is not the representative of
the commons, or the people, or the democracy of England, it
is worse than nothing; for it was originally, beyond doubt,
essentially the democratic branch of the government. Be this
as it may, the cry of radical, or democrat, will set even the
most liberal of these patriots legislating against the people with
all his might.
I happened to be present, not long since, when Lord John
Russell made his motion for extending the right of
representation
in parliament, to certain of the great towns, and taking it
away, or buying it, of some of the most contemptible of the
boroughs. He stated various instances of corruption in the
elections for boroughs, alluding to them by name, and
explicitly
maintained, that, in the present state of things, where,
in a vast many cases, some twenty, ten, or perhaps fewer
electors, little better than paupers, were to return one or
two members, it was next to impossible to prevent these
beggarly
voters from selling, and some rich purchaser from
buying
,
a seat. All the acts of parliament, he said, for preventing
this system of corruption, were evaded by dexterous dealers in
boroughs; and the practice of selling votes was now as
comnon
as that of selling wool, or cheese, or any marketable
commodity
.
It was in this manner, or by the influence of borough
proprietors, who either represented them in person, or
bargained
for them with the minister, that about three hundred
members were returned to the house.
Lord John called upon the Marquis of Londonderry to deny
these facts, and challenged denial from any member. His
lordship did not deny them, for it is not many years since a
case of this kind was brought home to himself. Nobody
denied them; and, in fact, it seemed as if it were a matter of
too little consequenee to call for denial. He might just as well
have complained of a notorious strumpet for selling her
favours
,
to the young members who were lounging about,
yawning
most piteously at such
stuff
, or nodding in their seats, half
asleep, till roused by the noble marquis, whose profound, or
rather perplexed, eloquence, every now and then waked them
up, and caused them to cry hear! hear! with vast
vociferation
.
You will perceive, from the foregoing details, that there is
nothing more than a mere outside resemblance, between the
House of Commons here, and the House of Representatives at
home. The latter really represents the people of the United
States; the former represents the mere paper money and
patronage
of the government. A large proportion of the
members
of parliament only represent a few paupers, whose votes
they have purchased, and the numbers of these representatives
actually counterbalance, and outvote, the representatives of
the merchants, manufacturers, and agriculturists combined.
The price of a borough, which returns two members, is
enhanced
sometimes four, six, ten, twenty fold, by that privilege
can we wonder, then, if the purchaser is anxious to make
the most of such an expensive bauble? So, when a man buys
the votes of a borough at a high price, is it not to be expected
he will sell his own to the highest bidder? The whole system
is fraught with corruption. It leads men into temptation
precisely
where there is the greatest danger of falling, and where
a fall is accompanied with the most extensive evils.
LETTER XXI.
Dear Brother
,
London.
In
my last two or three letters, I attempted to give you some
idea of the real nature and spirit of this government, not by
vague declamations, borrowed from their own writers, or the
partial ignorance of foreigners, but by sketching some of those
features, which, although they do not strike at first sight,
finally, on a closer examination, are found to give a character
to the whole composition. Much has been said and written
of this government which it never deserved; and much which,
if it ever merited, it merits no longer. But it is difficult to
shake a long established belief, or to weaken our confidence
in a good character, sustained for a considerable length of
time. It is right it should be so, or else the fruits of a whole
age of virtuous actions might be blasted in a moment by a
breath of calumny.
As all things are however good by comparison, and as it is
the custom of most Englishmen to insist upon some mysterious,
occult, invisible, and indefinable superiority of their
government
over all others, and most especially over our republic,
it may be worth while to institute a short comparison between
the two. Declamation is a good prop to error; but facts are
the best support of truth.
The independence of an English jury, of the present day,
has been greatly overrated, because, in a few instances, state
prosecutions have failed in the City of London. This fact
only proves what I have just urged, that an independence of
the king, or at least, a partial dependence on the people, is
essential to the security of the subject. The sheriff of London
is chosen by the livery of London, which is essentially a
democratic
body. It is therefore highly probable, that in a cause
where the rights of the people are opposed to the pretensions
of the king, he will not summon a jury biassed in favour of the
latter.
In all the counties of Great Britain, with perhaps one or
two exceptions, where the right is vested in some nobleman,
the sheriffs are appointed by the king. That his majesty and
his council will select the most loyal supporters of the
prerogative
,
is at least naturally to be expected, and most especially
at the present crisis, when the people and the king are
perpetually
in conflict. In the large cities, the appointment of the
sheriff is sometimes in the corporation or in the guilds; and in
proportion as these are popular, or the creatures of some
courtier, which last is generally the case, the independence of
juries may be inferred. Out of London, we hear of no
acquittals
of radicals, nor any condemnation of soldiers for
riding over and shooting unarmed citizens, men, women, and
children.
But even admitting the trial by jury, and habeas corpus, to
subsist in this country in all their purity, still they are
partially
suspended, of late almost every year, under some
pretence
of public danger; that is, whenever the public sentiment,
the servility of sheriffs, and the subserviency of juries, cannot
be sufficiently calculated upon for the purposes of oppression.
Again: the security of a person is at the mercy of a
press-gang
,
from whose lawless fangs no man with a ragged coat is
exempt. Instances are continually occurring, where the sons
of the country people, in roaming about London, and
elsewhere
,
at the naval stations, are kidnapped by the press-gangs,
and carried on board of ships, where it rests with the caprice,
or the necessities of the officers, either to let him go or to take
him to sea, where he is not heard of by his friends for years.
On the other hand, the security of property, at least of the
produce of landed property, is, I may say, destroyed, by being
subjected to taxation by a parliament, in which the far greater
proportion of those who pay them have no representatives.
But admitting, for the sake of argument, that the two
countries
are on a par, with respect to the two great ends of
government
,
security of person and property; I would then put their
excellence to the test, by inquiring, which attains these great
objects at the least sacrifice of property and independence?
The comparison is perfectly simple, as respects the first. There
are twenty millions of people in Great Britain, and ten in the
United States. Of the former, one-seventh are paupers, not
taxable; of the latter, about the same proportion are negroes,
also not taxable; at least their owners pay their taxes. We
will put the negroes against the paupers, and the proportion
will still remain the same; that is, about double the number
of taxable persons in this country, that there is in the United
States. We will put the whole of the expenditures of the
latter at twenty millions of dollars per annum, which is a very
large allowance for the present year, I am sure, and contrast it
with the 53,289,754
l
. sterling yearly expenditure of this
government
,
including interest on the public debt. The mere annual
expence of the British government, exclusive of the interest of
the public debt, amounts to upwards of twenty-two millions
of pounds sterling; that is to say, at the rate of about twenty-two
shillings sterling a head for every man, woman, and child in
Great Britain. Add to this the interest on the public debt, the
tithes, poor-rates, &c. and it will amount to between two or three
times as much more, making an average of about fourteen
dollars a head for every soul in Great Britain. In the United
States the average is less than two dollars, or about one-seventh.
It will appear, therefore, that the people of the United States
pay only one-seventh of the sum per annum for the security
of person and property, that the people of this country do for
the attainment of similar blessings.
Of the state of religion, morals, and manners, I have given
you some sketches in my former letters. Where crimes are
most frequent, and violations of decency most public and most
common, it is but empty boasting to make pretensions to
superior
piety, morality, or refinement. There may be pious,
virtuous
,
and refined individuals, but the nation can possess no
extraordinary share of either. If we take this criterion, I
apprehend it will be found, that England has little to boast of
in these particulars. Certain it is, however, that in no city
have I heard of so many crimes, and so many violations of
public decency, as occur in London. If there be, in reality,
any extraordinary degree of evangelical piety, or orthodox
religion here, it does not appear to be of that species which
hold the reins of human passions, and places the curb in the
hard mouth of wilful wickedness. It seems to vent itself in
strange and abstract doctrines of mysterious subtletyin Bible
and Missionary Societies, whose remote objects appear to
attract almost exclusive attention, while the corruptions, that
walk at noonday, and stink in our very nostrils, are either
neglected, or become indifferent, by being so common. It
would seem to consist in the doctrine of old fanaticism, or still
older hypocrisy, of making the conversion of one Pagan an
equivalent for the loss of a hundred Christian souls; of
purchasing
pardon for the habitual breach of moral laws and
social duties, by an infuriated zeal in converting people who
inhabit the uttermost parts of the earth. That such a
perversion
of the true ends of religion, and such principles of action,
should lead to an era of multiplied crimes, and endless offences
against human laws, is not any subject of surprise, since all
human experience goes to prove, that the separation of
morality
and religion is in the end fatal to both.
LETTER XXII.
Dear Brother
,
London.
Kings
would, at all times, I believe, if left to their choice,
rather govern by opinion than by force, by love than by fear.
An army of pensioned writers, when it will suffice to support
the king's popularity, will, in most cases, be preferred to an
army of soldiers to maintain his authority, for at least two
special reasons. The former method is by far the cheaper;
since a few pensions, a paltry title, a ring, a picture, or a letter
written by his majesty's own hand, will very generally
neutralize
,
if not correct, the most stubborn literary patriot, and so
completely alter his perception of things, that a country, which
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. r
only yesterday was the most oppressed and miserable, becomes
to-morrow the happiest in the world. For instance, Thomas
Campbell, whose noble and affecting strains on the subject of
Polish freedom and Irish oppression are remembered by every
American reader, has dwindled into the nominal editor of a
tory magazine, and gone over from the oppressed to the
oppressor. I do not say this change was wrought by a
pension
,
of two or three hundred pounds a year; but when a man
changes his sentiments very suddenly, and receives a pension
immediately afterwards, it is difficult to resist the conviction
that there is some connexion between the two.
The laureat, Southey, was seduced from the arms of Wat
Tyler, by the irresistible attractions of sack and sugar. A
hundred a year, and a butt of sack, did his business. They
so wrought upon his conscience, that from a downright patriot,
he became first a flatterer of kings, and next a fanatical
advocate
of every species of pious fraud and kingly pretension.
I verily believe the poor man is sincere now; for hypocrisy is
too wary and worldly-minded to give in to such fantastic
fooleries as the laureat has lately committed. It is often the
case, that men are inducted into a great devotion for principles,
to which they were at first but little attached, by the aid of a
sound drubbing or two, which operates like persecution upon
new modes of faith, making what was before perhaps little
better than hypocrisy, a confirmed and obstinate conviction.
Few persons have been more persecuted in this way than the
unfortunate laureat. When he was a patriot, he was terribly
persecuted by the Anti-jacobin, which parodied his Sapphics,
and, what every body thought impossible, made them even
more ridiculous than they were originally. After he was
converted
to loyalty by sack and sugar, and a hundred a year,
his old friends, whom he had abandoned, attacked him with
every weapon of ridicule and severity; while his new allies,
feeling rather ashamed of their new convert, left him to the
poor consolation of praising himself, which he does now at
every convenient opportunity. As he was drubbed into a
perfect conviction of the truth of his newly adopted principles,
so in like manner has he been convinced of his own great merit
and talents by the ridicule and incredulity of the world. In
attempting to make head against these, he was so often obliged
to bear testimony in favour of himself, that he at length
became
a sincere convert to his own absurdities, and grew to
believe in himself, as a man comes to believe in a story of his
own invention, by dint of eternal repetition. What the laureat
does with his butt of sack is a profound secret in the republic
of letters. He cannot drink it, certainly, or else Jack Falstaff
was even a greater liar than he has credit for being. If, as he
affirms, a good sherris sack hath a two-fold operationif
it ascends me to the brain, and there dries the vapours, the
laureat had better set about drinking it, for by'r Lady,
brother, another birth-day poem will finish honest Bob Southey,
unless he disperse the aforesaid vapours. He begins to reverse
all the rules of composition of late; for it may lawfully be
said of him, that he writes prose like a madman, and poetry
like a fool. I am sorry for him; for, notwithstanding his
overbearing self-sufficiency; his desertion of the cause of
freedom
;
his virulent invectives against his opponents; his
rampant
conceit, and his utter want of all literary courtesy; I
am assured that his character in private life is amiable and
exemplary.
An army of authors is a much cheaper support of royalty
than an army of soldiers, and has this special recommendation
besides, that it not only can uphold the king's authority while
living, but give him a good name after death.
But the trade of a king is not near so good as it used to be.
At this time, when there seems to be a general rebellion of the
human understanding against the abuses and exactions of
antiquated
tyranny, it has become indispensable for royalty to turn
its attentions more particularly to the people. For this purpose,
it is considered equally essential to laud the characters and
manners
of kings; to maintain the superiority of that system of
government of which they are the heads; and to denounce, on
all occasions, those principles of freedom, which are as much,
and as surely, the product of intellectual advancement, as the
blossom is of the sun.
The whole tide of corruption has consequently turned into
these channels; and in order to render the means of depressing
mankind more effectual, it has become more than ever
necessary
,
that the press should be either corrupted or enslaved.
You perhaps have not remarked it, but it is becoming every
day more and more evident, that republicanism and
republicans
must be either rendered odious and detestable in the
eyes of nations, by reiterated falsehoods and misrepresentations,
or there will be shortly little security for many thrones of
Europe. One or other, the old or the new world, must change
its governments. A plan has therefore been devised, and is
now in most promising progress, in Europe, for controuling the
freedom of the press, on the one hand by fines, prosecutions, and
censorships; and on the other to render it subservient to the
purposes of antiquated oppressions, ignorance, and superstition,
by means of pensions, patronage, sinecures, and paltry titles,
that sink the man of genius into a mere courtier.
In the progress of this deep laid plot against the human
understanding
,
we have seen, that only those republican writers
whose efforts were not the most dangerous, either from want of
talents or of a popular mode of addressing the multitude, are
tolerated. The moment a popular writer becomes dangerous
by his power of addressing the public feelings, himself and his
writings are singled out for the lash of the law or the church.
Under some pretence of blasphemy, if they can find no other,
the author is prosecuted, fined, and ruined; and his book, if not
entirely suppressed, becomes an object for all the hirelings to
bark at, from the Quarterly Review to Blackwood's Magazine.
But in a government in which the whole wealth of the state
can be employed almost at will in the wages of corruption, the
means of influencing and controuling the press are not confined
to mere oppression and punishment. If, for instance, a writer
possess too much courage to be frightened, or too much honesty
to be bribed into a sacrifice of his principles, they set the
Quarterly Review upon him. That excellent, conscientious,
and disinterested publication, begins by charging him with
radicalism and infidelity. The Literary Gazette repeats the
tale to the
New
Monthly and the John Bull; the
New
Monthly
to the Beacon and Blackwood's Magazine; and thus the cry is
sounded from the London Monument to Edinburgh Cross.
This never fails to alarm the rich and privileged orders; in
fact, all those whose opinions have great influence in society,
and to whom an author looks up, not only for reputation, but
patronage, at least so far as to the purchase of his book. Few
men, however great may be their civil courage, can resist a
combined and successful attack upon their purse and character
at the same time. It therefore happens, in a vast many
instances
,
that, unless the Edinburgh Review and its followers
take up cudgels, on the other side, the poor man recants in
his next publication, accommodates himself to the views of our
ministerial critic, and sacrifices his principles to save the
remnant
of his good name, and find purchasers for his book.
Others, however, who, like Mr. Southey and Mr. Gifford,
are naturally inclined to become pensioners and parasites, have
their virgin purity assailed and speedily overcome by the
seductive
applications of certain agreeable sinecures, that are
generally found to be quite irresistible. One of these, it is well
known, caused Mr. Southey to abjure his Joan of Arc and
Wat Tyler, and fairly converted him from Dom Daniels,
jacobin
epics, and republican sapphics, into a loving coadjutor of
Messrs. Gifford and Canning, who, erewhile, had set the whole
universe laughing at him and his sapphics in the Anti-jacobin.
That arch enemy of our country, Mr. William Gifford, is clerk
to the honourable band of pensioners; an excellent place, with
a good salary, nothing to do, and twelve hundred buttons to
his coronation coat. This is as it should be. There is a fitness
of things in a pensioned writer being clerk to a band of
pensioners
.
Thomas Campbell, alack for genius! is also a pensioner of
the king, and has been placed at the head of the
New
Monthly
Magazine, with the well known object of putting down, or
superseding the Monthly; for you must know it is common
here, not only with tavern-keepers, who let out their houses to
the public, but also with authors, who let out their consciences
to the best paymaster, to juggle each other out of his custom,
by putting up a similar sign; that is to say, christening their
new bantling by the name of some well known and popular
establishment. There is something exceedingly contemptible
in this; but really, the arts of literature, as practised here now,
graze very closely upon the skirts of the noble art of swindling.
This setting up a spurious magazine, with the same title which
is borne by one already popular and well known, to my mind,
is very little better than getting into society, and borrowing
money, under the name and on the credit of some respectable
person. The mere tagging of the epithet
New
to it, is
nothing
,
since the generality of people will suppose it nothing
more than a new series of the same work.
The
New
Monthly is, in every respect, a complete contrast
to the Monthly Magazineevery way inferior in talent, in
principle, instruction, and amusement. The Monthly
Magazine
,
has, for many years past been conducted with much
ability; and is, at this moment, in my opinion, the best
publication
in Great Britain of the kind. The
New
Monthly, on
the contrary, is a mere collection of frivolous articles,
principally
composed of notices of second hand German literature;
letters from Grimus Short; abortive attempts at the pathetic,
and still more abortive attempts at wit and satire.
The Monthly Magazine has always displayed a most liberal
disposition towards our country, and dealt with us in the
spirit of friendly intercourse. It has, on all occasions, been
the advocate of rational freedom, and maintained, with equal
zeal and ability, those sober doctrines of political right, which
are as free from the license of anarchy, as they are from the
chains of despotism. It has always spoken with a just
discrimination
of our character, manners, and literature; neither
elevating us above the scale of human excellence, nor
debasing
us to the level of profligate boors. In short, if we are to
depend upon foreign periodical literature, the Monthly
Magazine
is, beyond doubt, in every point of view, entitled to the
first selection, since it neither pampers our vanity, nor outrages
our just feelings of pride and patriotism.
Besides Messrs. Gifford, Southey, Campbell, and others,
there are hundreds of inferior note, at least that are not so well
known on our side of the water, who are in the enjoyment of
places, pensions, and patronage, of some sort or other. I will
not trouble you with any more of these. It is sufficient for me
to assure you, that very little independence is to be looked for,
either in the reviews or Magazines, with few exceptions.
Almost
every one of these was either originally established for
certain religious or political objects, or has been seduced by
bribery and patronage to become a hot partisan. The
government
having the heaviest purse, and the most extensive
patronage
,
is, of course, the best paymaster, and consequently retains
by far the greater proportion of authors, either as apologists of
itself, or calumniators of others. Hence it is, that we see
them industriously employing all their learning and talents in
propping up old abuses, and recommending new ones;
mingling
the praises of religion with the grossest flattery of those
whose whole conduct belies its precepts; covering the
indulgence
of the bitterest, most malignant passions, with the thin
pretext of orthodox piety; making a parade of their faith in
ribald farce and impious tragedies; spicing the keenest conflicts
of interest and ambition with an ample sprinkling of pure
ministerial
orthodoxy; and joining their voices to the full chorus
of cant, which, under the auspices of the Holy Alliance, now
echoes through half the world. It is in this way they either
repay the bounty of the ministry, or insinuate themselves into
the lap of new rewards, by means of new services.
When a writer once consents to receive a benefit, be it what
it may, the tenure of which is, that he shall not write any thing
not palatable to the patron, he sells his birth-right for a mess
of pottage; the wings of his genius are clipped by the sword
of power, and his intellectual faculties become cramped in
their exercise. When old Faustus, according to the story,
sold himself to Satan, he gained by his bargain, at least, an
enlargement of his powers, both of mind and body; his genius
expanded, and he was enabled to comprehend what was
before
beyond the reach of his mind. But when Messrs.
Southey and Campbell sold themselves, they seem to have
lost the talent they before possessed; and, like the traitor
Arnold
,
carried with them nothing but their disgrace. The
indifferent
poetry of the patriot Southey, has become ten times
more so since he became a pensioner; and the genius of
Thomas Campbell seems to have deserted him, the moment he
entered within the magic circle of ministerial patronage.
In an age of ignorance and superstition, it may be, that
literature will find it necessary to appeal to an enlightened
monarch, or his minister, for that support which the
indifference
of the public denies him; or for that protection which the
bigotry of ecclesiastical power renders necessary. But at this
time, when the taste and liberality of the people are amply
sufficient to remunerate the highest efforts of genius, it is not
necessary that it should grovel at the foot of power for
protection
,
nor prostitute its independence for bread. It is now but
seldom that talent appeals in vain to the patronage of nations,
when it comes recommended by independent principles and
honest patriotism. A people that wish to be free, must take
the exclusive controul of literature out of the hands of their
governments
.
LETTER XXIII.
Dear Brother
,
London.
Much
of the lighter kind of literature here, such as poetry,
novels, and the like, having no bearing on politics, is dependant
on the patronage of the booksellers, between whom, and the
authors, there is a good deal of bye-play and management. A
combination of booksellers can easily produce a gale of
popularity
,
that will frequently waft a book through half a dozen
editions. When they find a poet somewhat better at a rant
than his fellows, or a novel writer gifted with a more than
ordinary
talent for caricaturing human nature, they commonly
unite to give him a
run
, as it is called, for a season at least,
because it is indispensable to the profits of their business, that
there should be some few authors, whose names alone will
ensure
the sale of their works.
You are to understand, that there is abundance of second
and third rate reviews and magazines, in one way or other
partially
under the influence of booksellers, and who will, at any
time, say a good word for a book, if the author or publisher
will only send them a copy, with a polite note, complimenting
their taste, and calling their review or magazine, your
valuable
publication. These are set to work to inflate the
reputation
of the fortunate authors, selected by the trade for a run
for the season. The impulse given by these means in London,
soon extends to all the provincial towns. Edition after edition
is put forth with inconceivable rapidity, and the author
becomes
famous for at least nine days, while the booksellers
laugh, it may be, in their sleeves, and pocket the money.
Here, in London, the people of real taste, who are not led
away by this whiff of popularity, laugh at all this mummery.
The provincial towns, however, oftener yawn than laugh over
the book, without daring to dissent from the unquestionable
award of the London Literary Gazette, or the anonymous
testimony
of some newspaper critic. In a little while they wake
up, and after rubbing their eyes and yawning some twenty
times, begin to suspect that they want taste, rather than that
the author lacks talents, or the reviewer judgment. As no man,
however, can permanently cherish the idea of being a
blockhead
,
without becoming either a sage or a madman, these
doubts settle gradually into a conviction that the book is
deficient
in merit, rather than the reader in taste. The delusion
is then overthe bard or the novelist walks quietly into
oblivion
the
booksellers jingle their money, and prepare to start
another of these overgrown yearlings. Thus runs the race of
this species of literature, and thus are honest England and
simple America played with by reviewers and booksellers.
There was, a few months ago, a genius called the Rev. Mr.
Croly, that always wrote upon the hot crust of a volcano,
who was patted on the back, until he actually stood beside
some of the great poets without blushing. On the contrary,
he determined to make hay while the sun shone, in the true
spirit of a modern bard. He wrote poetry faster than the
great unknown; and, by means of divers blasts of the
reviewers'
trumpets, actually made a little fortune, before the
town discovered he had asses' ears, and was a most lusty
brayer.
Literature, like almost every other trade in this country, is
not only overstocked with workmen, but with a vast many very
indifferent ones, and it is with their books as with other
manufactures
if
they did not find an extensive market in our
country
,
one half of the artists would starve. It is inconceivable what
a vast literary taste there is in England; that is to say, a taste
for literary scandal, tittle-tattle, reviewing, and magazining.
The number of these publications are as the leaves of the trees,
the sands of the sea; and their contents of such a nature, that
to look into them is like looking for a grain of wheat in a
hundred
bushels of chaff. Opinions of books that the critics never
read, and of things they cannot comprehend; trumpery
provincial
antiquities; puffings of quack authors, quack
politicians
,
quack philanthropists, and quack doctorsnew revivals
of old absurdities, or new discoveries of exploded and forgotten
thingsanecdotes familiar to every general readertogether
with the fashions, lists of promotions, marriages and deaths,
murders and executionsthese constitute the great mass, among
which, however, will occasionally be found an able scientific
article, a well written essay, and a capital engraving. Indeed,
it may with great truth be said, that these publications owe
their greatest beauties to the engravers. The horses, dogs,
fiddlers, players, and great men, are beatifully done.
It may possibly be news in your retired village to tell you
that the editor of Blackwood's ferocious and bouncing
magazine
,
is the son-in-law of Sir Walter Scott, and that he exceeds
all living creatures in puffing his worthy father-in-law. It was
he that christened him the Great Unknown, if I do not
mistake
,
and on all occasions he is foremost in his offerings of
incense
at the shrine of his idol. One might suppose that a sense
of decorum would restrain him from this unblushing adulation;
but they don't mind these things here, where it is almost as
common for an author to puff his own book in the magazines,
as for a quack doctor to be his own trumpeter in the
newspapers
.
It is related to me, by persons whose opportunities of
information are unquestionable, that if you could trace the
approbation
or censures of these magazines and reviews to their
true source, they would, nine times in ten, be found to originate
in personal, political, and religious antipathies or attachments,
or in some holy alliance for mutual defence and mutual praises.
In fact, such is the notorious prostitution of these reviews, that
the real admirers of literature, who are not wedded to some
political party or other, pay no sort of attention to their
decisions
,
from a conviction that they originate in impure motives.
A great many books, which were barked at by the whole
pack, have attained an extensive circulation, in spite of the
hue and cry of canting hypocrisy, and canting criticism. Such
has been the case with Lady Morgan's late works, even in
spite of that fantastic affectation of style for which her
ladyship
is so notorious. On the other hand, a vast many books,
which they have attempted, with all their might, to impose
upon the patronage of the public, have already sunk into the
bottomless pit of oblivion. It begins to be understood that
this reviewing is a trade, and that their conductors must not
fail to please their customers at all hazards. Hence, when
any obnoxious opinions come abroad, and especially any that
smack of republicanism, if the book be written with the pen
of an angel, it stands no more chance of receiving quarter here,
than a heretic among so many monks of the twelfth century.
The author will be served by these literary judges like poor
Naboth; he will be accused of blasphemy, and lose at least
his reputation, if not, the harvest of this little vineyard. On
Voyages and Travels, No. XLV. Vol. VIII. s
the contrary, if he should happea to be the greatest blockhead
in the world, he may be sure of a good word, if he will only
calumniate the whole mass of mankind, except the rich and
noble, by calling them deluded wretches, and placing their
exertions to obtain bread to the account of an unprincipled
disregard of all human obligations. It is in this way that
writers attain to honours and rewards in England, just now,
without the display of a single talent, except the talent of
glossing over the corruptions of the higher, and insulting the
distresses of the lower, orders.
Sir W. S. owes much of his success, and still more of his
knighthood, to his politics, which are high tory. A curious
affair came to light the other day, which lets us into the secret
of Sir W.'s merits in the sight of my lord the king. People in
America think he was knighted for his genius. It seems a
paper was not long ago set up in Edinburgh, called the
Beacon
,
which turned out even more libellous than
Blackwood's
Magazine
,
and exceeded that excellent production in its praises
of Sir W. Almost every person of note, obnoxious on the
score of his opposition to the court politics, was libelled in
the grossest manner. Among these was a Mr. Stuart, who, in
the course of his inquiries as to the persons responsible for the
attack, discovered that the paper was patronised by an
association
of loyal persons, each of whom had signed a bond to
contribute a hundred guineas to its support in case of
necessity
.
Among these munificent patrons of literature were Sir
W. S., and the lord advocate, each of whom had subscribed
his hundred guineas. Upon this discovery, Stuart opened a
correspondence with the lord advocate, which resulted in his
lordship's discovering the libels on Mr. Stuart. The
association
for the encouragement of literature, hereupon finding the
affair was likely to turn out rather serious, cancelled the bond,
and dissolved partnership. The sole object of the
Beacon
was
to single out persons, obnoxious from their opposition to the
court, as objects for personal defamation. It attempted also a
contest with the
Scotsman
, the most powerful and ably
conducted
newspaper in the three kingdoms. As was to be
expected
,
it sunk under the struggle, and confined itself altogether
to libels afterwards.
I have seen it stated in print, and not contradicted, to my
knowledge, that Sir W. is actually co-proprietor and co-editor
of
Blackwood's Magazine
, which praises him so lustily. I
merely give you the fact, without vouching for any thing.
Thus much is certain, however, that this magazine is
considered
as the most virulent partisan of principles entirely at
war with the happiness and prosperity of our people; that it
has been convicted of at least a dozen libels upon the
characters
of private individuals; and that it is noted particularly for
its offensive articles concerning our country. In a late number
of this work, is a tale, called the Floridian Pirate, grossly
libelling and calumniating the people of the southern and
western States, and in which it is boldly insinuated, that to tie
a planter to a tree, set fire to his house, and commence a
piratical
warfare against white men, are not only justifiable, but
meritorious acts of heroism.
Of a similar character and principles, is the
New Monthly
Magazine
. It is not so open and offensive in its hostility, but
still there is scarcely a number appears, that does not squint
ill-naturedly towards our country and its institutions.
Ridicule
of the peculiar habits of the people, their sanguine
anticipations
of the future, and other little peculiarities, are fair
exercises
of ingenuity and wit enough. This is what all nations
indulge in towards each other. But when this satire
degenerates
into malignity, and proceeds, under the cover of various
disguises, to undermine the respect of foreigners for our
government
and its institutions; to give distorted and offensive
sketches of persons and things, calculated to degrade and
disgrace
a whole people, it passes the bounds of authorized
ridicule, and becomes a distorter of truth and a mis-stater of
facts. It becomes unworthy of our toleration, much more of
our patronage.
I regret to see Mr. Campbell lending his name to such a
publication as this. Though it may, perhaps, be for his
immediate
interest to implant in our country, a rooted antipathy
for his name, and a lasting contempt for his principles, it might
be worth his while to recollect, that the affectionate admiration
of a new world is not to be lightly forfeited by one who values
his immortal fame. To be read, admired, and cherished by
growing millions. as the author of Gertrude of Wyoming,
the Pleasures of Hope, and Erin go Bragh, is something
better in the end, than to be remembered hereafter, by perhaps
thrice as many human beings as Britian now holds, as the petty
editor of petty squibs and sarcasms, contemptible, indeed, in
themselves, but deriving point and consequence from peculiar
causes, that will possibly preserve them from merited oblivion.
Men like Mr. Campbell would do well to bear in mind, that
the time is not far distant, when they must look across the
Atlantic
for by far the greater proportion of their admirers, or
enemies; and that the people of the United States are among
those, of all others, the least likely to select, as objects of
respect
and veneration, writers who ridicule their institutions, or
caluminate their country.
Next to the trade of magazining and reviewing, I find the
biographers of the middling sort of great men in the greatest
profusion here, and every day reminds me of Cowper's
admirable
epigram:
O! fond attempt to give a deathless lot
To names ignoble, born to be forgot.
So when a child, as playful children use,
Has burnt to tinder a stale worn out News,
The flame extinct, he views the roving fire,
There goes my lady, and there goes the 'squire;
There goes the parson, most illustrious spark,
And there, scarce less illustrious, goes the clerk!
The particulars of these biographical budgets also call to
mind a passage in an old author, where Memory
complains
thus:
I remember, in the age of Assaracus and Ninus, and about
the wars of Thebes, and the siege of Troy, there were few
things committed to my care but those that were well worth
preserving; but now, every trifle must be wrapt up in the
volume of eternity. A rich pudding wife, or a cobbler, can't
die, but I must immortalize them in an epitaph. A dog cannot
commit in a nobleman's shoe, but it must be sprinkled in the
chronicles; so that I never could remember my treasury so
full, or so empty, of honourable and truly heroic actions.
One might be almost tempted to believe the writer of the
foregoing passage had anticipated the present taste of the
English public. If a clergyman, through the patronage of
some great man, rises to the distinction of a stall; if a doctor
practises physic with tolerable success; or a country squire
owns a famous racer, or hunts a pack of staunch hounds, he is,
in good time, pretty sure of a biography either in the
magazines
,
or in quarto. Indeed, any man can have a place in the
former, if he would only find his own likeness.
It is amazing to see with what facility a great book is here
compiled concerning a little man. The incidents of his life;
his good or evil actions; his importance, or his want of
importance
,
are of no sort of consequence. These biographers
are like French cooks, or Spanish inn-keepers, who can make
an excellent dish out of a tom-cat, or a cow's heel. If the
little man had any great men for his contemporaries, or was
cotemporary
with any great events; if he was at Oxford,
Cambridge
,
Eton, or Harrow, with any body of distinguished rank,
or who afterwards distinguished himself, and dropped him a
letter now and then; or if he was a member of some half-a-score
of learned societies, provincial or foreign; either of these
fortunate
coincidences is sufficient for a quarto royal. It he was
cotemporary with great men, a book can be made out of them;
if with great events, the author can pounce upon the history of
the times; if a member of learned societies, all the learned
persons
belonging to them may be made to contribute to the
dignity
of the hero; but if he corresponded with illustrious men
the lettersthe letters, my dear brother, are treasures of
biography. If they were written in confidence, so much the
better; the little tittle tattle, the free opinions, domestic
disclosures
,
and private scandal, are inestimable treasures, as
furnishing
irresistible attractions to the present literary taste.
Another characteristic feature of the present school of English
literature is, the incredible appetite for black letter books, and
old trash of every sort, which derives its sole value from its
scarcity. More than one nobleman here, owe all the eclat they
enjoy, independently of their rank and fortune, to their
munificence
in patronising old authors and printers, who have been
dead for centuries. The worse a book is printed, and the more
ridiculously quaint its title, the more they will give for the
treasure. If they meet with a book, for instance, entitled and
called The dolefulle Tragedye and delectable pleasaunte
and merrie Comedye of Goodye Twooe Shooes, or some
such trumpery, printed with wooden blocks, they will give a
couple of hundred guineas for it, provided it be the only copy
in the world. But if there should chance to be another extant,
its value is diminished a hundred fold. I happened, not long
ago, to be present at the sale of the Duke of Roxburgh's
library, where Locke, Newton, Milton, Shakspeare, and others,
went off for little or nothing, while a copy of Most righte,
rare, and truly dyvertynge Ballads, such as the beggars were
wont to sing of Yore about Tower Hill, was purchased by a
Mcenas for a few hundred guineas, and a most valuable
series of old play-bills brought still more. I must not omit to
mention, that the fortunate purchasers not only had the
pleasure
of gaining the valuable acquisitions, but also got
complimented
in all the periodicals and diurnals, for their munificence
in the encouragement of literature.
At this sale there was a most laughable contest between his
grace of  and the right honourable earl , for
no less a treasure than a black letter copy of the history of
the Three Wise Men of Gotham, printed by Wynkyn de
Worde, in his worst manner. These noblemen were just
beginning
to nibble at the treasure, and the auctioneer, as well as
the heirs of his grace of Roxburgh, were in expectation of a
great windfall, when Sir , a famous physician, who
is a sort of black letter oracle, observed, with an appearance
of great indifference, that he had seen a copy at Lackington's,
and another at a stall in Grub-street. The name of
Grub-street
was a death-blow to the Three Wise Men, who were
forth with knocked down to some obscure person for little more
than twenty times their real value. Since then it has been
ascertained, that neither Lackington nor Grub-street can boast
a copy, and it is shrewdly suspected Sir  raised the
report with a view of purchasing the book himself, had he not
been called off at the moment to attend the lap-dog of lady
D.
Let us now talk of little Walter Scott, who, though a tory
creature
,
is one of the most pleasant, unaffected specimens of the
Genus Irritabile
in the world. By the way, he is a little lame,
a circumstance that may account for the halting irregularity of
his verse. Lord Byron, too, labours under a similar
impediment
in his walk; and, as his verse partakes of the like
infirmity
,
it might be a curious speculation to inquire into the occult
connexion between a lame leg and a lame couplet. But I must
leave this matter to the dabblers in cause and effect. I believe
there is no doubt of Sir Walter Scott being the person, who, in
the bombastic phrase of the critics, is called the Great
Unknown
.
It is a fact tolerably well known, and if there were
any doubt, the extravagant adulation of Blackwood's Magazine
would resolve it. His reasons for preserving this affectation of
the incognito, are quite clear to me. He wrote himself down
in poetry before he began with prose, and that in a good
measure
by prematurely disclosing his name, and thus depriving his
readers of the pleasure of wondering, than which nothing
communicates
a higher zest to a book. The benefits of invisibility
are invaluable to authors, who can neither be hit by the critic,
nor wounded by personal attacks, so long as they remain unseen.
Besides, authors are a sort of divinity, very apt to turn out an
Egyptian stork, or arrant mumbo jumbo, if you approach them
too near. They should always keep out of the way, that the
public may see nothing but the beauties of their minds. Like
the famous chess-playing automaton, lately detected, genius loses
half the admiration of the vulgar, so soon as they find there is
a man in it.
Do not imagine, from these observations, that I am not a
potent
admirer of the Great Unknown, alias, Sir Walter
Scott. I have received too much pleasure from his prose
writings
not to feel grateful. Many an hour of ennui in this land
of blue devils hath he whiled awayand many a lonely day of
sickly confinement hath he made tolerable to me by the
exertions
,
or, as it would seem, the relaxations of his genius. Shall
not the sick man be grateful to him who administers to the mind,
as well as to him that administers to the body? Besides, every
soul that ever knew him bears testimony to the worth of his
private
character, notwithstanding his being somewhat obnoxious
on the score of his toryism. His pleasant, unaffected,
unpretending
manners are exemplary in a manbut, in a successful
author, they are little less than miraculous. His heart, I am
assured, is free from a single spark of that jealous irritability
which divides men of genius, and prevents them from
governing
the republic of letters more despotically than a senate of
Venice.
But for all this, I cannot allow him to be equal either to a
Fielding or an Edgeworth, whatever may be the fashionable
verdict of the day. In this opinion I am supported by the
authority of those judges of the secret tribunal I spoke of,
whose approbation, after all, is essentially necessary to the
permanent
fame of every living author. I will give you an abstract
of their opinions, mixed up with some of my own, which last I
desire you will hold in especial reverence. No doubt my fair
cousin * * * *, who, as you inform me, not long ago set
the bed-curtains on fire at two o'clock in the morning, by falling
asleep over the Abbot, will be greatly affronted at seeing the
Great Unknown so sacrilegiously undervalued.
The author of the Waverley novels has pursued a path,
which saved him, in a great measure, the trouble of invention.
The principal characters, as well as events, are historical; and
where he has filled up the chasm with incidents of his own, I
appeal to the judgment of reflecting persons, if he has not
deviated
into the wild impossibilities of romance? Where the
characters
are not absolutely historical, they are derived from old
plays and ballads, which also furnish models of language for the
actors. Indeed, it may be observed here, that not only the
Great Unknown, but a vast number of the present race of poets,
have poached pretty liberally in the old plays of Queen
Elizabeth
and James the First. These, after lying in oblivion,
except
in the care of these industrious poachers, for two centuries,
have at length begun to excite attention, and will probably
before
long be sufficiently known to ensure the detection of modern
plagiarists. Without descending to particularize these
borrowings
of the Great Unknown, it cannot but strike every reader,
who takes the trouble to reflect on the incidents of the tale of
Kenilworth, for instance, that they are principally taken from
Miss Aikin's Court of Elizabeth, where they are purely
historical
;
and that where the author has attempted to sketch from his
own resources, he has almost invariably deviated into common
place or caricature. Indeed, to me it appears, that through the
whole of the work there is an air of reckless extravagance, a
daring disregard to probability, that takes from the characters
every feature of historical likeness, and gives to historical facts
every characteristic of improbability.
With the exception of Sir Hugh Robsart and Tressilian,
there is almost a total absence of interesting characters. Queen
Elizabeth is nothing but a coarse virago; Leicester a miserable
dupe of a clumsy astrologer; and Sussex, Blount, Antony
Foster, and the rest, very common persons. The originals of
Lambourne, Giles Gosling, and Demetrius, may be found in a
dozen of the old plays; but where to find Wayland Smith, the
mysterious blacksmith, and Dicky Sledge, is more than I know;
not within the limits of nature, certainly. I cannot tell how it
is, but Dicky seems the identical Gilpin Horner of the Lay of
the Last Minstrel, merely divested of his supernatural features.
Raleigh is a fine personage in history; but apparently rather of
too high an aim for our author, since the only incident of any
consequence, illustrative of his character, introduced into the
work, is that of the cloak, familiar to every school-boy.
Raleigh
is, of all the personages in the piece, the one of whom the
author ought to have made the most, and he has made nothing.
The Pirate has just come out, and has shaken the popularity
of the author so sensibly, that it begins to be rumoured, he will
shortly proceed to give us a third edition of the old beauties of
his mind, in the shape of a series of plays. This is certainly
making the most of one's wealth, and reminds me of a cunning
fellow of the beau monde, who lately passed the same quantity
of silver through two editions, once in the shape of a service of
plate, and once as a beautiful tea set, after which he coined it
into money, dashed away in a curricle to the admiration of every
body, and died game at last.
But Julia Mannering, Mr. Pleydell, and every character in the
whole of this series of novels, which appertains to the class of
real, actually existing beings, such as we live and move amongst
at present, are destitute of all claim to vigour or originality. It
is only necessary to place them beside those of Miss Edgeworth,
to perceive at once, how much more easy it is to draw materials
from history and tradition than from actual observation of life
and manners. So with those incidents and events which can be
referred to beings like ourselves, and to which we can apply the
test of our own experience and observation. Nearly the same
deplorable tameness and common-place characterize them all;
and it is only when the author envelopes himself in the mists of
time, and the obscurity of provincial tradition, that he attains to
a new species of fiction, compounded of improbabilities stretched
on the rack, and characters not altogether human, nor yet quite
supernatural, such as abound in the records of popular
superstition
.
Hence the apparently wonderful facility with which the author
compiles these novels. The experience of a whole life furnished
Fielding with the characters and incidents of Tom Jones; but
traditions and ballads of old times supply the Great Unknown
with ample materials for this kind of writing. The very notes to
Walter Scott's different poems, contain a mass of border lore,
amply sufficient for half a-dozen novels like Guy Mannering and
Rob Roy. If there be any exception to these remarks, it is in
The Heart of Mid Lothian, which presents to us two
characters
that belong to all times, and are perfect in their kind: I
mean old Davie Deanes and his daughter Jeanie. They are
sufficient to redeem all the old half-bred witches, and half-bred
wizards, in the whole series, and possess an interest derived from
the purest springs of nature and probability, far more intense and
legitimate than all the rest of these extravagant creations of
ignorance
and superstition.
But with all these drawbacks, if such they be in the eyes of the
present age, the Great Unknown is still a pearl among swine. He
and Miss Edgeworth are the twin stars of Botia, and not
only shine by their own light, but by the reflection of
surrounding
darkness. The one, as a painter of life as it is, the other of
life as it was, is without a rival in the present times. The
author of Waverley is a great second-hand artist; a capital
pencil
in copying old pictures, and colouring them afresh. What I
particularly commend him for is, that though a friend to the
government
,
he does not think it necessary to
cant
. There is a
glow of vigourous freshness about him, so different from the
faded, sickly, green and yellow tribes of cotemporary novelists,
that to read one of his tales, is like contemplating a rich
landscape
,
with the flowers of the spring, and the dews of the clear
mellow morning, blooming and glittering upon it, and the pure
and fragrant breeze playing in our faces.
But I cannot help thinking it is placing him where he ought
not to be, to put him on a level with Fielding, Smollett,
Goldsmith
and Miss Edgeworth. He belongs, I imagine, to a
different
class of beings; to a class of authors, who, when the charm
of novelty expires, and curiosity is satisfied in the development
of the story, will never be much relished or sought after for other
and more lasting beauties.
SHACKELL AND ARROWSMITH, JOHNSON'S-COURT, FLEET-STREET.